


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Blackstone at the Cannery | New Homes in Hayward, CA | TRI Pointe Homes








































 














 


Northern California > Hayward
           > Blackstone at the Cannery
        

 



















View Gallery 



Now Selling
Blackstone at the Cannery





BlackstoneParks and RecreationSouthgate ParkCentennial ParkCannery ParkAlden E Oliver Sports ParkCity of Tracy Sports ComplexHayward PlungeGrocery and ServicesSafewayLucky's SupermarketsCostcoTargetHayward Public LibraryChase BankWells Fargo BankBank of AmericaUnited States Post OfficeThe Home DepotStarbucksEon CoffeeHayward AmtrakShopping Dining EntertainingSouthland MallUnion LandingCentury TheaterStonebraeMission Hills of Hayword Golf CourseBijou RestaurantVal's BurgerBuffalo Bill's BreweryEmergency and MedicalHayward PoliceHayword FirestationSaint Rose HospitalSaint Francis Urgent CareSchoolsBurbank Elementary SchoolWinton Middle SchoolHayward High School





 


Priced from the Low $600,000's
Here at Blackstone, it’s all about location, location, location.
Blackstone at The Cannery is perfectly located in the heart of the Bay Area for easy commuting to Silicon Valley and San Francisco. And just across the street, there’s an elementary school and an expansive park in which kids (and adults!) can play. Downtown Hayward, just a few minutes away, is enjoying an exciting revitalization with some great new restaurant additions.
These attached and detached single-family homes with private 2-car garages offer convenient living for active lifestyles.
 

Well-designed attached and detached homes with up to four bedrooms.
Living space ranging from approximately 1,344 to 1,995 square feet.
Balconies, porches and decks.
Located close to major freeways and bridges.
Lots of shopping choices, restaurants, offices and entertainment venues.



Location199 Burbank Street, Hayward, CA 94541

 Office Hours

Open Daily from 10 am - 6 pm



 


 Add to favorites
 Share
 Download Brochure
 Print
 Monthly Payment





Contact our New Home Specialist, Mariessa


(925) 804-2262NewHomesNorCal@TriPointeHomes.comBRE# 01733968Call for an AppointmentNew Home Gallery: (510) 340-9090 




Join the interest list 



 By providing your contact information, you consent to receive periodic emails, phone calls, text messages and other communications from us.  For mobile phones, standard text message and data charges apply. Consult our Privacy Policy for additional information, including unsubscribe options.














 

Mortgage Payment Calculator*
Your actual rate, payment, and costs could be higher. Get an official Loan Estimate before choosing a loan.




Enter Your Mortgage Amount $



Interest Rate (%)**




Amortization Period


1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
15 Years
25 Years
30 Years




Payment Frequency


Monthly
Semi-monthly
Weekly
Bi-weekly






**Assumptions. You are purchasing a single family home and primary residence. Rate is fixed. Debt-to-income ratio is less than 41% and excellent credit. These assumptions are subject to change without notice.




Your monthly payment would be*
$1750


Apply Here
*This mortgage calculator is for illustrative purposes only and is not a guarantee. The monthly payment illustration on this tool does not include amounts for property taxes, insurance premiums, homeowner’s association dues, or other factors that potentially could affect your monthly payment. Therefore, your actual monthly payment will be higher. Interest rates change frequently and without notice. Financing availability and terms will depend on your situation.




 

 

See all 45 photos

 

          Image 1 of 45




  
 

 


Floorplans for Blackstone at the Cannery Single-Family Detached



 


Residence 1
Starting from the high $700,000's
Single-Family Detached
Two Story, 3 Bedrooms, 2.5 Baths, Approximately 1,692 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage





 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 9




  
 


Residence 2
Starting from the high $700,000's
Single-Family Detached
Three Story, 3 Bedroom, Den, 3.5 Baths, 
Optional Bedroom 4 with Full Bath 
Approximately 1,922 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 7




  
 


Residence 3
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Detached
Three Story, 4 Bedrooms, 4 Baths, 
Optional Pocket Office, Optional Eat-In Kitchen Island
Approximately 1,995 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 8




  




*Prices subject to change


 


Floorplans for Blackstone at the Cannery Single-Family Attached



 


Residence 1
Starting from the low $600,000's
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 2 Bedrooms, 2.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,344 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage




 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 3




  
 


Residence 2
Sold Out
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 2.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,326 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 3




  
 


Residence 3
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 3.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,723 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 11




  
 


Residence 4
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 3.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,716 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 3




  
 


Residence 5
Starting from the high $600,000's
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, Den, 4 Baths
Optional Bedroom Suite
Approximately 1,716 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 7




  
 


Residence 6
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 3.5 Baths
Approximately 1,915 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 8




  




*Prices subject to change




Log in to add to Favorites
Log In

Create An Account




Share Blackstone at the Cannery




 






Explore the Area




 











 













 






  PEF1170 Quote - Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI LP Fund - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI LP   PEF1170:US      Inactive   PEF1170:US is inactive   USD             Fund Type   Private Equity Fund                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Fund Type   Private Equity Fund    Objective   -    Asset Class Focus   Private Equity    Geographic Focus   -    NAV (on -)   -    Total Assets (-) (on -)   -    Inception Date   -    Last Dividend (on -)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -    Fund Managers   -    Front Load Fee   -    Back Load Fee   -    Redemption Fee   -    12b-1 Fee   -    Current Mgmt Fee   -    Expense Ratio   -                     Profile   Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI LP is a 2007 private equity fund currently harvesting. The Fund makes opportunistic real estate investments in Asia Pacific, Europe, Latin America and Caribbean, and North America.    Address  -   Phone  -   Website   -                       
	Blackstone - Home
    





















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6



 


We practice the
Art of the Long View


For over 30 years


We build to last






  

Private Equity

  
  

Tactical
Opportunities

  
  

Strategic
Partners

  
  
  

Real Estate

  
  

Hedge Fund
Solutions (BAAM)

  
  

Credit (GSO)

  
  

Infrastructure

  
  

Blackstone
Charitable Foundation

  
  

Corporate
Social Responsibility


  



our
approach

 


  





Blackstone Reports Second Quarter 2017 Results


View Full Press Release
View Supplemental Financial Data: PDF | Excel
Listen to Webcast


















News and Views
view all




Market Commentary



A Reluctant Europe Looks at Prosperity



		The mood among investors in Europe is generally positive in spite of mixed cyclical and secular factors influencing the economies and the markets there.
	








(?)




























PRESS RELEASES



Blackstone Acquires Clarion



		London, July 24, 2017  – Private equity funds managed by Blackstone (“Blackstone”) announce the acquisition of Clarion Events, one of the world’s leading independent events organisers, from private equity funds managed by Providence Equity Partners (“Providence”).
	








(?)




























BLACKSTONE BLOG



Blackstone Named to Fortune’s “25 Best Workplaces in New York” List


	Blackstone has been named by Fortune Magazine as one of the 25 best places to work in New York. The list includes companies across industries in the state and greater NYC metropolitan area. Blackstone ranked among the highest companies in the financial services sector and was the top-ranked asset management firm on the list.









Highlights

view all
 





				Mondays at Blackstone
			




 







				The Power of Support: A film from TED and the Blackstone Charitable Foundation
			




 







				Why Hiring Veterans is Good for Business
			




 







				Blackstone President Tony James on Creating Value for Investors
			







Twitter

follow us
 


Tweets by @blackstone













Quick Links






Explore Blackstone






Get in Touch



























  Back to Top




 



© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)
Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer



プライバシー・ポリシー  | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号加入協会/日本証券業協会　一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会




×Stay up-to-dateEmail AlertsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here. email address (required) first name (required) last name (required) company name job title  Byron Wien Market Commentary
							  Blackstone Press Releases
							   Submit


Cookie Information and Consent RequestBlackstone Cookie PolicyThis website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.
Learn More Continue 


×
Contact UsGeneralFor office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000Email Alerts & Investor RelationsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.
Investor Relations Contact InformationUS: +1 888-756-8443International: +1 646-313-6590BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com Media ContactsFor media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.





 
         
	Careers
    


















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6






Careers
The extensive experience, talent and accomplishments of the Blackstone team give us a base of intellectual capital that is second to none.





  
Make an Impact
  
Experienced
  
University
  
Veterans
  
Blackstone Women
  
Open Positions
 





Phishing Email Alert

Blackstone has recently become aware of fraudulent emails purporting to offer employment at Blackstone and misusing the official Blackstone logo. These emails do not originate from Blackstone or any of our affiliates. If you have received any such email, you should not click any links in the email or provide any personal information (e.g., your social security number or scans of identity documents).






Make an Impact

Blackstone is a leading global alternative asset manager. As stewards of public funds we look to drive outstanding results for our investors and clients by deploying capital and ideas to help business succeed and grow. Our assets under management, which now total over approximately $371 billion, help secure the benefits of 29 million pensioners in the United States and millions more internationally, and advance the goals of charitable organizations, academic institutions and governments around the world.
While each of our four main business groups – private equity, real estate, hedge fund solutions, and credit – is already an acknowledged leader in its respective market, innovation and entrepreneurship are at the core of our business, and we are constantly developing new investment products and services. This approach, coupled with our strong focus on developing and keeping excellent relationships with all of our stakeholders, has paid off. For 30 years, we have delivered outstanding financial results for investors and clients while helping businesses around the world succeed and grow.
We invite you to join our team.








				Mondays at Blackstone
			







Ranked as a
“Best Place to Work”


For three years in a row, Blackstone has been named a “Best Place to Work” in our sector by Pensions & Investments









Opportunities

						We encourage independent thinking and reward initiative while providing services to help employees grow professionally. Our global business platform and brand reputation provide an unparalleled launch pad for growing your career.
					




External Relations & Strategy
 Managing communications with shareholders, the media and governments, as well as analyzing strategic development opportunities. 





External Relations & Strategy
The Group has primary responsibility for setting the strategy for shareholder, media and government relations and the Blackstone Foundation, including communicating and maintaining relationships with several constituents. These range from unit holders and the research analysts who cover Blackstone for major financial institutions to the media and Federal, State and local Government officials to not-for-profit organizations around the world.  The team is responsible for the firm’s social media presence, including Facebook, Twitter, blogs and Blackstone’s internal and external website. It drives communications to and amongst our employees and manages all aspects of the firm’s brand. The Group runs the Blackstone Charitable Foundation which is focused on job creation and entrepreneurship and also facilitates employee volunteer and intermural activities globally.


Roles in  External Relations & Strategy
  Analyst: External Relations & Strategy An analyst in External Relations and Strategy will assist in the day-to-day functions of the group and have the opportunity to gain hands-on experience in financial communications, government relations, internal communications, corporate philanthropy and/or investor relations. The small nature of the team lends itself to offering significant exposure to all Blackstone’s business groups and participation in high-level initiatives.  
View Roles in External Relations & Strategy







Finance
 Managing the firm’s global finance, accounting, tax and treasury functions.





Finance
The Blackstone Finance team provides analyses for the firm’s senior leaders to assist them in making strategic business decisions, in addition to maintaining the books and records of the firm and its funds and financial controls. The team manages the firm’s liquidity and is instrumental in maximizing returns on the firm’s investments while minimizing risk. The Blackstone finance team also provides extensive, critical financial information to all investors. There are many exciting career opportunities within the finance team; you will work in a dynamic environment with a group of people dedicated to leveraging and protecting the firm’s balance sheet to the benefit of our investors, clients, shareholders and employees.


Roles in Finance
  Summer Internship: Chief Financial Office Interns will have the opportunity to focus on a particular area within the Chief Financial Office such as financial planning and analysis, Audit, Business finance, Treasury and Affiliated investor reporting.  
View Roles in Finance








GSO Capital
Providing unique credit solutions to enhance corporations financial flexibility with most solutions not available elsewhere in the credit market.





GSO Capital
Our credit business, GSO Capital Partners LP, is one of the largest credit-focused alternative asset managers in the world. GSO provides a broad array of credit services, including leveraged loans and mezzanine financing, and plays a strong role in providing rescue financing to companies experiencing liquidity problems.
Learn more about GSO Capital


Roles in GSO
  Analyst: Customized Credit Strategies GSO customized credit strategies analysts are responsible for identifying, analyzing and monitoring investments across multiple portfolios, then proactively communicating recommendations to portfolio managers. The experience guarantees a unique understanding of companies and capital structures across a wide range of industries.   Analyst: GSO Mezzanine Fund The GSO mezzanine group focuses primarily on providing private investment capital to upper middle market companies and private equity sponsors in connection with leveraged buyouts, mergers and acquisitions, recapitalizations, growth financing and other corporate transactions. Analysts will develop both quantitative and qualitative skills through the investment process and will have the opportunity to gain exposure to a wide range of industries and investment types. As a result of the breadth of the experience, the analyst will develop a unique understanding of companies and capital structures.   Analyst: GSO Client Operations GSO Client Operations and will provide client service and support to Investors in all the various GSO Funds. The team liaises with numerous internal groups (Accounting, Legal, Operations, Compliance and Technology) and third party service providers (Fund administrators, etc.). Analysts create and distribute capital call and distribution notices to limited partners.   Analyst: Investor Relations & Business Development Analysts will be involved in supporting GSO’s ongoing fundraising efforts and client relations functions. Responsibilities will include developing and maintaining marketing presentations, diligence materials, drafting of investor letters, preparing for and attending investor meetings, completing DDQs and RFPs, and supporting the marketing operations team with respect to account set up, monitoring liquidity and fund flows. In addition, the role will entail close communication and coordination with Blackstone Marketing professionals to help facilitate cross-fertilization and cross-selling.  
View Roles in GSO







Hedge Fund Solutions (BAAM)
Serving the world’s largest institutional investors by striving to protect downside and reduce volatility.





Blackstone Alternative Asset Management

Our hedge fund solutions business, (“BAAM”), serves many of the world’s leading institutional investors, including corporate, public and union pension funds, sovereign wealth funds and insurance companies. These investors look to BAAM to protect their assets through custom-tailored investment strategies.

Learn more about Blackstone Alternative Asset Management


Roles in Hedge Fund Solutions
  Analyst: Business & Financial Evaluation The Business and Financial Evaluation group is responsible for performing due diligence, focusing on the operational risks of managing a hedge fund. Analysts will participate in meetings with senior management and perform extensive research on funds and industry trends, learning about hedge funds and the financial industry from an operational perspective.   Analyst: Legal and Product Development The Legal and Product Development group plays a critical role in providing the best possible information to help hedge fund managers. Analysts work on a variety of projects, reviewing and summarizing key legal documents and analyzing fund and regulatory research.   Analyst: Global Client Operations and Reporting Team The Investment Team uses a comprehensive approach to constructing portfolios, relying on investment-level analysis and macroeconomic perspectives. Analysts work on a variety of tasks, including modeling investment strategies, conducting macroeconomic research and analyzing risk to ensure Blackstone portfolios continually generate value for investors.   Analyst: Investment Team The Global Client Operations and Reporting Team sits within BAAM’s Investor Solutions Group, providing essential infrastructure support across BAAM’s global platform and working as internal consultants. Among other things, the team aims to streamline, centralize and quality-control information delivered to clients, prospects and investment management consultants. The comparatively small size of the team offers employees the opportunity to work closely with senior investor relations/business development professionals, interface with all other BAAM teams and assume significant responsibility.
    Analysts provide an essential support role in an all-encompassing capacity to the rest of the team. Analysts are assigned as secondary contacts on a select group of clients and are responsible for supporting all aspects of the relationship with these investors. The comparatively small size of this group offers analysts the opportunity to work closely with senior team members, assume significant responsibility and play integral roles. Analysts at Blackstone often have the opportunity to participate in all aspects of projects and be staffed on a number of assignments at one time.   Summer Analyst: Business & Financial Evaluation BAAM’s BFE team is responsible for performing initial and ongoing operational due diligence with respect to BAAM’s underlying hedge fund managers. BFE evaluates a manager based upon all non-investment aspects of the business, and specifically focuses on the operational risks associated with managing an alternative asset investment firm. A manager’s size and strategy, along with industry best practices are taken into account when performing this evaluation. Additionally, BFE supports BAAM’s various products and platforms, including BAAM’s hedge fund seeding platform and long only platform. BFE will also be involved in due diligence matters pertaining to other groups within Blackstone as needed. A Summer Analyst’s responsibilities will include a variety of tasks associated with the team’s evaluation of a hedge fund manager from an operational risk perspective. Specific tasks may include: participating in operational due diligence meetings on both hedge funds and hedge fund service providers, performing various types of research on the hedge fund industry (including regulatory, news sources, industry periodicals and ad hoc research projects), analyzing manager financial statements, performing queries to analyze industry trends, and preparing information for internal or client reports. The Summer Analyst will also be expected to assist with, and/or lead, as necessary, any ad hoc projects. In addition to working at one of the world's leading alternative investment firms, Summer Analysts gain the opportunity to access and learn about the dynamic and unique hedge fund market. Meetings are often conducted with CFOs, COOs, etc. of the respective funds, giving Summer Analysts exposure to seasoned industry professionals. The BFE team works closely with the COO, and other senior members of BAAM, leading to a fast-paced and exciting work environment.  Summer Analyst: Global Client Operations and Reporting The Global Client Operations and Reporting Team sits within BAAM’s Investor Solutions Group, providing essential infrastructure support across BAAM’s global platform and working as internal consultants. Among other things, the team aims to streamline, centralize and quality-control information delivered to clients, prospects and investment management consultants. The comparatively small size of the team offers Summer Analysts the opportunity to work closely with senior investor relations/business development professionals, interface with all other BAAM teams and assume significant responsibility. Summer Analysts play an integral role in developing tools to assist the global Investor Solutions Group with on-boarding, branding, message control and efficiency. Responsibilities include maintaining standard marketing materials, developing a marketing language library, overseeing client reporting, managing BAAM’s entries into consultant databases and coordinating responses to consultant questionnaires. Summer Analysts may also assist in subscription and redemption processing and distribution of key client reporting.   Summer Analyst: Legal & Product Development The Summer Analyst will work with BAAM’s Legal & Product Development team on a variety of different matters relating to hedge funds and hedge fund solutions. Primary job responsibilities include: review offering documents of underlying hedge fund managers and prepare summaries of key terms or issues relating to investments in hedge fund managers; assist in evaluation of manager terms and negotiation of side letters; assist in compiling various databases relating to Blackstone managers and Blackstone funds; provide support relating to the offering of any new funds or structured products; analyze manager and portfolio liquidity, fees, and other terms to produce internal and external reports; assess current and prospective regulatory risk through industry and government-focused research; and perform research on market trends within the hedge fund industry.   Summer Analyst: Investment Team The Investment Team, comprised of Investment Research and Risk Management professionals, combines a top-down and bottom-up approach to portfolio construction by using both macroeconomic views and investment-level analysis to manage portfolios of hedge funds. The Investment Team is responsible for the sourcing, due diligence and ongoing monitoring of hedge fund managers, as well as asset allocation and portfolio construction. Due to the relatively small size of the professional staff, research teams are typically small and Summer Analysts are therefore expected to assume important and integral roles.  
View open roles and apply online







Human Resources
Driving the firm’s growth and development by attracting, retaining, and developing the best talent.





Human Resources
Human Resources acts as a strategic partner to all Blackstone businesses in fostering culture, developing talent, and strengthening the capability of our global team. In addition to hiring, integrating, assessing, training and rewarding employees, we provide a wide range of services and counsel – from Benefits to Employee Relations – that ensure Blackstone is an “employer of choice” and harnesses the full potential of our overall human capital. We look for HR professionals who can deliver strategic, creative, and commercial solutions in an entrepreneurial and dynamic environment.







Innovations – Technology
Deploying technological innovations to support our growing business.





Innovations & Infrastructure Technology

The Blackstone Innovations & Infrastructure Technology team seeks to drive improvements across Blackstone’s businesses through technology. Technologists thrive on the sharing of ideas while designing and building world class technology through an iterative process. The group facilitates individual growth through meritocracy and creating a challenging team-oriented environment. There are several exciting opportunities within the technology team including software development, database administration, storage and networking, information security and design.
 
Blackstone technologists play an integral part in helping to bring innovative technology solutions to a fast paced growing firm. If you are interested in technology we can offer exciting career opportunities.

Learn more about Innovations & Infrastructure Technology


Roles in  Innovations & Infrastructure Technology
  Analyst: Business Analyst As a member of the Innovations & Infrastructure Technology team at Blackstone, you will work with a group of talented individuals in a highly team-oriented environment to create the next generation of innovative solutions for Blackstone and the financial community at large.
     Our Business Analysts are involved in the full development lifecycle and will work very closely with all stakeholders during the conceptual, design, development, quality assurance and production stages of each project. You will be expected to take ownership of specific functionality areas within our applications, and write detailed design documents to outline specifications, workflow and user interface. Then you will perform quality assurance tasks to ensure stability and thoroughness of the platform as you help manage each project with the technical lead and the developers and roll out the products to our users to ensure that we have met our goals. You will also be responsible for performing market research and analysis and conducting user interviews to identify specific areas of improvement as well as presenting designs of proposed functionality improvements to internal teams as well as clients.   Analyst: Software Engineer Our Software Engineers are expected to take ownership of projects, determine technical design, and flush out business design holes with the business analysts and code and support the system. They serve as contributors during the concept and design phase, and are the project owners during the development, stabilization and support phases.   Summer Intern: Business Analyst As a summer intern on the technology innovation team at Blackstone, you will work with a group of talented individuals in a highly team-oriented environment to create the next generation of innovative solutions for a growing business. Our Business Summer Analysts are involved in the full development lifecycle and will work very closely with all stakeholders during the conceptual, design, development, and production stages of each project. You will be expected to take ownership of specific functionality areas within our applications, write detailed design documents to outline specifications, workflow and user interface. Then you will perform quality assurance tasks to ensure stability and thoroughness of the platform as you help manage each project with the technical lead and the developers and roll out the products to our users to ensure that we have met our goals. You will also be responsible for performing market research and analysis and conducting user interviews to identify specific areas of improvement as well as presenting designs of proposed functionality improvements to internal teams as well and clients.   Summer Intern: Software Engineer As a software engineer summer intern in the technology innovation team at Blackstone, you will work with a group of talented individuals in a highly team-oriented environment to create the next generation of innovative solutions for Blackstone. Summer Software Engineers are involved in the full development lifecycle. They will serve as contributors during the concept and design phase, and as the project owners during the development, stabilization and support phases. Summer Software Engineers will be expected to take ownership of projects, determine technical design, flush out business design holes with the business analysts and code and support the system. Success as a Summer Software Engineer on our team means delivering business value and great code.  
Roles in Innovations & Infrastructure








Investor Relations & Business Development
 Managing outreach to investors on existing and new products.





Investor Relations & Business Development
Our Investor Relations & Business Development (IRBD) teams work directly with some of the largest and most sophisticated institutional investors in the world. IRBD team members support Blackstone investor relationships and manage all fundraising efforts, interfacing often with our other business groups to deliver value for our investors.


Roles in IRBD
  Analyst: Real Estate Investor Relations & Business Development The Real Estate Investor Relations & Business Development Team supports relationships with limited partners as well as fundraising efforts. The group has a significant interface with members of the firm’s global real estate group, legal/compliance department as well as other groups within the firm. An Analyst will assist with multiple projects at one time such as constructing investor presentations, assisting with investor due diligence requests, conducting market research, and supporting the fund closing process. An Analyst will be expected to understand the basic fundamentals of real estate investments, the global real estate environment, and private equity fund structures. An Analyst will also be exposed to legal issues associated with fund raising and fund documents.   Analyst: Private Equity Investor Relations & Business Development The Private Equity Investor Relations & Business Development Team supports relationships with limited partners as well as fundraising efforts. The group has a significant interface with members of the firm’s global private equity group, legal/compliance department as well as other groups within the firm. An Analyst will model alternative fund structure, maintain a database of due diligence information, work on the deal summaries and due diligence processes, and draft updates to limited partners, private placement memoranda, and marketing materials.   Analyst: GSO Investor Relations GSO Client Operations and will provide client service and support to Investors in all the various GSO Funds. The team liaises with numerous internal groups (Accounting, Legal, Operations, Compliance and Technology) and third party service providers (Fund administrators, etc.). Analysts will create and distribute Capital Call and Distribution Notices to limited partners.   Analyst: BAAM Client Relations The Marketing Communications & Client Operations Team sits within BAAM’s Investor Solutions Group, providing essential infrastructure support across BAAM’s global platform and working as internal consultants. Among other things, the team aims to streamline, centralize and quality-control information delivered to clients, prospects and investment management consultants. The comparatively small size of the team offers employees the opportunity to work closely with senior investor relations/business development professionals, interface with all other BAAM teams and assume significant responsibility. Analysts provide an essential support role in an all-encompassing capacity to the rest of the team. Analysts are assigned as secondary contacts on a select group of clients and are responsible for supporting all aspects of the relationship with these investors. The comparatively small size of this group offers analysts the opportunity to work closely with senior team members, assume significant responsibility and play integral roles. Analysts at Blackstone often have the opportunity to participate in all aspects of projects and be staffed on a number of assignments at one time.  
Roles in IRBD







Legal and Compliance
Providing legal services and advice to the firm and implementing global compliance policies and procedures.





Blackstone Legal and Compliance
Legal and Compliance acts as a strategic business partner with Blackstone business and corporate teams to support the firm’s objectives, ensure regulatory compliance, minimize risk, and preserve the legal and ethical integrity of the firm: 

Our legal team provides advice and counsel to facilitate the firm’s investments, governance, and other objectives. Whether by assisting our investment professionals in negotiating investments, forming and marketing a fund or representing the firm in litigation, the legal professionals at Blackstone play an integral role in advancing the firm’s business and its relationships with clients, unitholders and regulators.  
The firm’s compliance professionals are dedicated to protecting’s the firm’s reputation and managing legal, compliance and reputational risks.  By monitoring developments in jurisdictions around the globe, the compliance team provides informed and practical guidance that enables Blackstone to achieve its objectives appropriately while successfully navigating today’s increasingly complex regulatory environment.

Across Blackstone’s Legal and Compliance team, we look for professionals who have the drive, experience and judgment to be trusted advisors and who will be commercially effective and protect the reputation of the firm. 







Private Equity
 Identifying investment opportunities to grow companies and enhance their value.





Private Equity
We operate one of the world’s largest private equity fund businesses. With an exclusive focus on friendly transactions, and on partnering with accomplished management teams to drive results, we have worked for more than 25 years to identify, invest in and enhance the value of great businesses.
Learn more about Private Equity


Roles in  Private Equity
  Analyst: Private Equity Blackstone’s private equity group expects analysts to assist in the direct acquisition of large and midsized companies across a variety of sectors worldwide. The investment process requires both the financial skills of investment banking and the strategic thinking of management consulting. As a result, this analyst program is a unique experience; our analysts develop a well-rounded business mind that is fine-tuned by the challenge of putting to work the firm’s and its professionals’ own money.   Analyst: Investor Relations & Business Development The Private Equity Investor Relations & Business Development Team supports relationships with limited partners as well as fundraising efforts. The group has a significant interface with members of the firm’s global private equity group, legal/compliance department as well as other groups within the firm. An Analyst will model alternative fund structure, maintain a database of due diligence information, work on the deal summaries and due diligence processes, and draft updates to limited partners, private placement memorandum, and marketing materials.   Associate: Private Equity Associates will work in a wide range of industries on potential investments, acquisitions, analysis of potential exit opportunities, and the monitoring and management of current portfolio companies. The relatively small size of this group offers Associates the opportunity to work closely with senior members of the firm and to have extensive interaction with management teams and external advisors. We look to attract post-MBAs to this position.   Summer Analyst: Private Equity Blackstone’s private equity group offers Summer Analysts the chance to engage in the direct acquisition of large and midsized companies in a variety of sectors worldwide. The investment process develops both the financial skills of investment banking and the strategic thinking of management consulting. As a result, this Summer Analyst program is a unique experience among financial firms, enabling our Summer Analysts to develop a well-rounded business mind. Summer Analysts at Blackstone have the opportunity to participate in all aspects of projects and be staffed on a number of assignments at one time. Due to the relatively small size of the professional staff, Summer Analysts are able to assume integral roles on deal teams. Summer Analysts are involved with the development, structuring and financing of transactions and regularly attend internal meetings, negotiations and due diligence sessions. 
    Typically, Summer Analyst work will include financial analysis, computer modeling, research, competitive analysis, assistance in the execution of transactions and drafting of memoranda for internal and external use. Summer Analysts will work on a wide range of transactions including acquisitions, divestitures, restructurings, recapitalizations, joint ventures and leveraged buyouts.  Summer Associate: Private Equity Summer Associates will work on companies in a wide range of industries on potential investments, acquisitions, analysis of potential exit opportunities, and the monitoring of current portfolio companies. Summer Associates are involved in transaction due diligence, valuation analysis, and the negotiating of contracts and other agreements. The relatively small size of this group offers Summer Associates the opportunity to work closely with senior members of the firm and to have extensive interaction with management teams and external advisors.  Summer Analyst: Investor Relations & Business Development Summer Analysts will be involved in supporting investor relations and potential fundraising efforts for the Private Equity business. Summer Analysts will model alternative fund structure economics, maintain a database of due diligence information, work on the deal summaries and due diligence processes, and draft updates to limited partners, private placement memoranda, and marketing materials. Summer Analysts will also be exposed to legal issues associated with fund raising and fund documents.  
Roles in Private Equity







Real Estate 
Deploying a ‘buy it, fix it, sell it’ strategy by acquiring assets that need improving, and providing unparalleled expertise and capital.





Real Estate
Our real estate business is a global investor in a wide variety of property types. We acquire high quality assets, and then add value through the insight of our in-house experts and skilled real estate operators. We are also large investors in debt secured by high quality real estate assets.
Learn more about Real Estate


Roles in Real Estate
  Analyst: Real Estate Debt Strategies Analysts in the Real Estate Debt Strategies group participate in a wide range of real estate debt transactions, a critical Blackstone initiative started in 2008 following major shifts in the global real estate market. Analysts’ work typically includes financial analysis and modeling, transaction and industry research and support in the execution of transactions.   Analyst: Real Estate Partners Blackstone’s Real Estate Private Equity group expects analysts to engage in the direct acquisition of large portfolios of real estate assets as well as individual properties worldwide. Typically, analysts assist teams across a wide range of real estate transactions, working on real estate valuation analysis, computer modeling and research.   Analyst: Real Estate Asset Management Blackstone’s Real Estate Asset Management group expects analysts to engage in all aspects of asset management including post acquisition transition, valuation, budgeting and working closely with Blackstone's portfolio companies and deal team. Analysts are also involved in underwriting, financial modeling and discussions related to restructuring, refinancing and disposition strategies.   Analyst: Investor Relations & Business Development The Real Estate Investor Relations & Business Development Team supports relationships with limited partners as well as fundraising efforts. The group has a significant interface with members of the firm’s global real estate group, legal/compliance department as well as other groups within the firm. An Analyst will assist with multiple projects at one time such as constructing investor presentations, assisting with investor due diligence requests, conducting market research, and supporting the fund closing process. An Analyst will be expected to understand the basic fundamentals of real estate investments, the global real estate environment, and private equity fund structures. An Analyst will also be exposed to legal issues associated with fund raising and fund documents.  Associate: Real Estate Partners Associates at Blackstone participate in all aspects of real estate investing and are staffed on a number of transactions at one time. Due to the relatively small size of the professional staff, Associates assume integral roles on deal teams. Associates are involved with the development, structuring, and financing of transactions and regularly attend both external and internal meetings, negotiations and due diligence sessions.  Summer Analyst: Real Estate Partners Blackstone’s Real Estate Private Equity Group offers Summer Analysts the chance to engage in the direct acquisition of real estate-related companies, portfolios of real estate assets, and individual properties worldwide. Summer Analysts at Blackstone have the opportunity to participate in all aspects of real estate investing and can expect to be staffed on a number of transactions at one time. Due to the relatively small size of the professional staff, Summer Analysts are expected to assume integral roles on deal teams. Summer Analysts are involved with the development, structuring, and financing of transactions and regularly attend both external and internal meetings, negotiations and due diligence sessions. Typically, Summer Analyst work will include real estate valuation analysis, computer modeling, research, competitive analysis, development of presentations, assistance in the execution of transactions, and drafting of memoranda for internal and external use. Summer Analysts will work on a wide range of transactions including acquisitions, divestitures, restructurings, recapitalizations, joint ventures, and leveraged buyouts.   Summer Analyst: Real Estate Debt Strategies Summer Analysts in the Blackstone Real Estate Debt Strategies Group have the opportunity to participate in a wide range of real estate debt transactions including restructurings, recapitalizations, new loan originations, and acquisition of legacy loans, CMBS and other forms of public and private debt. Due to the relatively small size of the professional staff, Summer Analysts are expected to assume integral roles on deal teams and can expect to be staffed on a number of assignments at one time. Summer Analysts are involved with the development, structuring, and financing of transactions and regularly attend client and internal meetings, negotiations and due diligence sessions. Summer Analyst work will typically include financial analysis and modeling, market research, competitive analysis, development of client presentations, assistance in the execution of transactions, and drafting of memoranda for internal and external use.  
View Roles in Real Estate








Strategic Partners
Acquiring interests in high-quality, private investment funds from investors seeking liquidity.





Strategic Partners
Strategic Partners Fund Solutions is a leader in the secondary private equity market. Our goal is to provide institutional and individual investors the opportunity to monetize and manage their illiquid investment portfolios. We evaluate both single fund positions and complex, structured portfolios. We work hard to understand the unique circumstances of each transaction and offer thoughtful solutions. Through our global reach, extensive access to the private equity markets and deep relationships, Strategic Partners is a leading provider of liquidity in the secondary market.
Learn more about Strategic Partners


Roles in  Strategic Partners
  Summer Analyst Strategic Partners offers Summer Analysts a unique opportunity to achieve a valuable learning experience working in the secondary private equity industry. Summer Analysts in Strategic Partners develop an in-depth knowledge of company analysis and valuation. Through analysis of leveraged buyout, real estate, venture capital, mezzanine and distressed private equity funds, Summer Analysts gain exposure to a wide array of companies, industries and capital structures, and become accustomed to a variety of private equity funds and investment strategies. Strategic Partners Summer Analysts will be involved in extensive financial modeling of portfolio companies and funds, preparing memoranda presented to the Investment Committee and structuring and executing investments.   Full-time Analyst Strategic Partners expects Analysts to participate and assist in the evaluating and closing secondary private equity transactions. As an Analyst in Strategic Partners, you will develop an in-depth knowledge of company analysis and valuation. Through analysis of leveraged buyout, real estate, venture capital, mezzanine and distressed private equity funds, you will gain exposure to a wide array of companies, industries and capital structures. In addition, you will become accustomed to a variety of private equity funds and investment strategies. Strategic Partners Analysts will be involved in extensive financial modeling of portfolio companies and funds, preparing memoranda presented to the Investment Committee and structuring and executing investments.  
View Roles in Strategic Partners







Tactical Opportunities
Leveraging Blackstone’s entire platform to provide solutions that meet institutional investors’ different risk-return goals.





Tactical Opportunities
Few other alternative managers, if any, possess the experience and breadth of our investment platform. Our Tactical Opportunities team harnesses this competitive advantage by leveraging the synergies that exist across our businesses to source, execute and capitalize on investment opportunities that others cannot. Their highly flexible mandate allows them to pursue investments that fall outside our other alternative fund strategies.
Learn more about Tactical Opportunities


Roles in Tactical Opportunities
  Analyst: Tactical Opportunities Analysts on the Tactical Opportunities work closely with the investment team on deals and investment opportunities. They will work alongside the research function in finding information sources, synthesizing data, and summarizing findings for the investment team. This is an opportunity for an extraordinary performer who has already mastered fundamental research skills through extensive personal investing, academic work and professional experience.   Associate: Tactical Opportunities Associates on the Tactical Opportunities work closely with the investment team on deals and investment opportunities. They will work alongside the research function in finding information sources, synthesizing data, and summarizing findings for the investment team. This is an opportunity for an extraordinary performer who has already mastered fundamental research skills through extensive personal investing, academic work and professional experience.  
View Roles in Tactical Opportunities










Hilton
USA

Hilton Hotels has long been a leader in the hospitality industry. Blackstone Real Estate Partners acquired Hilton in 2007 on behalf of its investors and has helped the company expand into new geographies and improve efficiency of day-to-day operations.
 



Patria Investments
Brazil

Blackstone has partnered with Patria Investments, leveraging the firm's vast knowledge of the Brazilian market to invest in attractive private equity, real estate and credit opportunities in Latin America's fastest-growing economy.
 



Harbourmaster
Ireland

In 2011, Blackstone acquired Harbourmaster, a leading European investment advisor of secured corporate and infrastructure-based bank loans. Providing in-depth research necessary for these investments, Harbourmaster strengthens Blackstone's position in the region.
 



Bujagali
Uganda

Blackstone portfolio company, Sithe Global, in partnership with the Government of Uganda and the Aga Khan Fund for Economic Development, completed construction of a 250 Megawatt hydroelectric power station on the Nile River. Construction of the facility employed 3,000 people and doubled the country's effective generation capacity, stimulating economic development in the region.




Moser Baer
India

Moser Baer, a Blackstone portfolio company, is addressing India's need for secure energy infrastructure to meet the needs of its rapidly growing economy. Blackstone has applied its expertise and its investors’ capital to fund thermal, solar and hydroelectric projects.




RMB Fund
China

In 2009 Blackstone established a private equity fund with the Government of Pudong China to facilitate economic development in the Shanghai Area. The Fund provides Blackstone investors with unparalleled access to China's growing economy and demonstrates the firm's interest in international markets.






 One World, Unique Opportunities... 
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                 




 
“Now when I think about my career, it seems limitless. Five years into this, I’ve already joined the board of directors of one of our investments. If you asked me four years ago if I thought I’d be on the board and actually be making a difference, I would have said ‘no.’ So I don’t know exactly where it is that my career would ultimately end up, but I don’t see a road block and I don’t see an end to the opportunity right now.”
Scott Eisenberg - Managing Director, GSO      
“Blackstone is the largest alternative investment manager in the world, but what that really means is that we’re investing on behalf of pension plans and pensioners. Just about anywhere you go in the world, you can see real estate Blackstone owns on behalf of our limited partners.”
Kathleen McCarthy - Senior Managing Director, Real Estate      
“A lot of my engineering background was about problem solving, how do you come at a solution and how do you think about it in a new way, and a lot of that is really translatable into finance and working with clients.”
Viral Patel - Managing Director, Tactical Opportunities      




             

















   Back to Top
 








Quick Links



Explore Blackstone



Get in Touch




























© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)

Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer


プライバシー・ポリシー   | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社
金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号
加入協会/ 一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会







Cookie Information and Consent Request
Blackstone Cookie Policy

This website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.

 Learn More 
Continue 







×
Stay up-to-date
Email Alerts


To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
 
 email address (required)  

 first name (required)  
 last name (required)  


 company name  
 job title  



  
Byron Wien Market Commentary
 
  
Blackstone Press Releases
 




    Submit 






 ×
Contact Us
General

For office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. 
 Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000

Email Alerts & Investor Relations

To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.


For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.

Investor Relations Contact Information
  US: +1 888-756-8443
 International: +1 646-313-6590
 BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com 

Media Contacts

For media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.











 


	Blackstone Investor Relations -  








































































Shareholders















Investors


At Blackstone, we take the long view. It is vital to who we are and how we deliver market-leading performance.





NYSE: BX

				$34.81





Jul 26, 2017 11:57 AM 


Last
34.55$


Change
+0.26


% Change
+0.75%


Volume
2,503,580


Day High
34.95


Day Low
34.57

Additional Stock Information




NYSE:BX




Price

Today's Open
34.70


52 Week High
35.09


52 Week Low
23.33

Pricing delayed 20 minutes














Latest Financials

Upcoming Events
Past Events






July 20, 2017

Blackstone Second Quarter 2017 Earnings Call






Press Release and Presentation
PDF
779 KB




Supplemental Financial Data PDF
PDF
811 KB




Supplemental Financial Data Excel
XLSX
290 KB




View Investor Call Transcript
PDF
230 KB




View Media Call Transcript
PDF
114 KB




Listen to Webcast



View in Dial-InformationClose in Dial-Information
11:00 AM ET
Investor Call
Listen to Replay:
+1 (888) 286-8010 (U.S. domestic)
+1 (617) 801-6888 (international)
Passcode: 756 128 72
 
9:30 AM ET
Media Call
Listen to Replay:
+1 (888) 286-8010 (U.S. domestic)
+1 (617) 801-6888 (international)
Passcode: 530 159 41












Latest Annual Letter










View the 2016 Annual Chairman’s Message  (PDF  721 KB)












Read now: Letter from Our Chairman on the 10th Anniversary of the BX IPO







Total Distributions Paid since IPO
$13.73





Total Return4 since IPO
distributions reinvested







Contact Information 


Shareholders’ annual K-1 tax forms for 2016 are now available here1
SHAREHOLDER RELATIONS

    The Blackstone Group L.P.
    345 Park Avenue
    New York, NY 10154 
US: +1 888-756-8443
International: +1 646-313-6590
BlackstoneShareholderRelations@Blackstone.com


Stock Transfer Agent

    American Stock Transfer & Trust Company Operations Center
    6201 15th Avenue
    Brooklyn, NY 11219 
+1 800-937-5449
www.amstock.com







Upcoming Events

Upcoming Events
Past Events







There are no upcoming events currently scheduled.












1Shareholders refers to common unitholders of Blackstone Group L.P.
    2Shares refers to common units of Blackstone Group L.P.
    3Historical dividend yield based on most recent closing price and Last Twelve Months Cash Distributions to shareholders of $2.11 per unit; past performance is no indication of future results.
    4Calculation of distributions since IPO and Total Return figures include $0.59/unit of value distributed to shareholders upon spin-off of PJT on October 1, 2015. Total return assumes reinvestment of distributions, including the value of the PJT spin-off. Past performance is not indicative of future results.
    
















Quick Links










Explore Blackstone










Get in Touch


























 
 Back to Top



Quick Links
										


The Firm


Shareholders


Investors


Our People




Get in Touch
										


Careers


Our Offices


Investor Login


Contact Us




Explore Blackstone
										


Private Equity


Tactical Opportunities


Strategic Partners


Real Estate


Hedge Fund Solutions (BAAM)


Credit (GSO)


Innovations and Infrastructure


Registered Funds









 





English | 官话 (Chinese) | 日本語 (Japanese)


									© 2017 The Blackstone Group L.P.
								

Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | 
🍪s
Cookie Notice




































         
	Overview
    



















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6






Investors
A trusted partner to the world’s top institutional investors





Who We Serve

As a leader in alternative asset management, we are a trusted partner to many of the world’s top institutional and individual investors, including retirement systems which represent 29 million pensioners in the United States and millions more internationally. As careful stewards of capital, we strive to provide solutions that create lasting value for our investors, the companies in which we invest and society at large. 

By making companies stronger and better positioned for long-term growth, we can help create good jobs, support local communities and, ultimately, secure the future of millions of people around the world.

To access our Limited Partner Portal, BXAccess, click here.







				Blackstone President Tony James on Creating Value for Investors
			






LONG TERM Returns & Capital Preservation  The firm’s goal is to deliver enhanced returns and capital preservation over the long term through a rigorous application of our intellectual and financial capital. All of our businesses reflect Blackstone’s strong partnership culture, commitment to exceptional performance and uncompromising integrity. 


OUR CLIENTS
First

Putting our clients’ interests first is at the core of our asset management philosophy. We also custom-tailor our investment strategies to clients’ specific needs. This approach has led to a high level of client satisfaction: based on committed capital, 87% of our investor base has reinvested in successive Blackstone funds and approximately 83% have reinvested in other funds across our brand.





“ “Practicing the art of the long view has enabled us to outperform across the broad spectrum of alternative asset classes for three decades. We are sharply focused on delivering excellent investment performance, being responsible stewards of our investors’ capital, managing risk, seeking out new opportunities, and innovating. ”  - STEPHEN A. SCHWARZMAN CHAIRMAN, CEO & CO-FOUNDER   













 
 



$371b
Assets Under Management

clicktap for more details




$100b
Assets Under Management

Private Equity




$94.5b
Assets Under Management

Credit




$104b
Assets Under Management

Real Estate




$72.5b
Assets Under Management

Hedge Fund Solutions 





 
 








Our Scale
Global Reach across Asset Classes


Through our various investment vehicles we preserve and protect $371 billion* in assets for public and corporate pension funds, academic, cultural and charitable organizations, among others. Our diverse range of funds make private equity, real estate, credit and hedge fund investments all over the world. In addition, we provide investment advice and management services to institutional investors through a variety of separately managed accounts.







 Our Priority  Everything we do is guided by a set of principles that define our character and culture; they have been at the core of Blackstone since its inception. These enduring qualities are the shared convictions that we bring to our professional and personal conduct – they are a fundamental strength of our business.  Above all, we have made it our No. 1 priority to serve the needs of our investors and clients. This commitment is reflected in a culture that values integrity, professionalism and a passion for excellence. It also leads us to operate with prudence, financial discipline, a long-term perspective, and a clear understanding that trust is something we must earn every day.  




 Guiding Principles    Accountability Our capital and reputation are always on the line   Excellence Anything else is never acceptable   Integrity Leadership demands responsibility   Teamwork Always makes us better   Entrepreneurship Using creativity to find opportunities overlooked by others    













Quick Links






Explore Blackstone






Get in Touch



























  Back to Top




 



© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)
Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer



プライバシー・ポリシー  | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号加入協会/日本証券業協会　一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会




×Stay up-to-dateEmail AlertsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here. email address (required) first name (required) last name (required) company name job title  Byron Wien Market Commentary
							  Blackstone Press Releases
							   Submit


Cookie Information and Consent RequestBlackstone Cookie PolicyThis website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.
Learn More Continue 


×
Contact UsGeneralFor office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000Email Alerts & Investor RelationsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.
Investor Relations Contact InformationUS: +1 888-756-8443International: +1 646-313-6590BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com Media ContactsFor media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.





 
         
	Press Releases
    





















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6






Media
Stay up to date with the latest Blackstone news





  
Overview
  
Press Releases
  
Market Commentary
  
Videos
  
Blog
 
Press Releases    Receive Press Releases by Email







		Select year
		


All

2017201620152014201320122011201020092008200720062005200420032002200120001998









                Jul 24, 2017
          

Blackstone Acquires Clarion



		London, July 24, 2017  – Private equity funds managed by Blackstone (“Blackstone”) announce the acquisition of Clarion Events, one of the world’s leading independent events organisers, from private equity funds managed by Providence Equity Partners (“Providence”).
	








(?)























                Jul 20, 2017
          

Blackstone Reports Second Quarter 2017 Results



		Blackstone will host a conference call on July 20th, 2017 at 11:00 a.m. ET to discuss second quarter 2017 results. 
	








(?)























                Jul 06, 2017
          

Blackstone to Acquire International Market Centers, Inc. 



		High Point, NC & Las Vegas, NV, July 6, 2017 – Blackstone announced today that funds managed by Blackstone Real Estate Partners and Blackstone Tactical Opportunities entered into a definitive agreement to acquire International Market Centers, Inc. (“IMC”), the world's largest owner and operator of premier showroom space for the furnishings, home decor and gift industries, from Bain Capital Private Equity, LP and funds managed by Oaktree Capital Management, L.P.  Fireside Investments is also expected to partner with Blackstone in the acquisition. Financial terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
	








(?)























                Jun 29, 2017
          

Blackstone Announces Second Quarter 2017 Media Call



		Blackstone (NYSE:BX) announced today that it will host a conference call for the media on Thursday, July 20, 2017 at 9:30 a.m. ET to review second quarter 2017 results.
	








(?)























                Jun 29, 2017
          

Blackstone Announces Second Quarter 2017 Investor Call



		Blackstone (NYSE:BX) announced today that it will host its second quarter 2017 investor conference call on Thursday, July 20, 2017 at 11:00 a.m. ET.
	








(?)























                Jun 23, 2017
          

Blackstone Energy Partners and Fisterra Energy Announce the Financial Closing of the Tierra Mojada Power Plant in Guadalajara, Mexico



		New York, June 23, 2017 – Fisterra Energy, a company majority owned by Blackstone’s (NYSE: BX) energy-focused private equity fund, Blackstone Energy Partners, and global private equity fund, Blackstone Capital Partners, today announced it has achieved a financial closing for the Tierra Mojada combined-cycle gas turbine (CCGT) power plant in Guadalajara, Mexico. 
	








(?)























                Jun 19, 2017
          

Blackstone Invests in TOG



		The Office Group (“TOG”) and Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe V (“Blackstone”) are pleased to announce that Blackstone has agreed to acquire a majority interest in TOG from Lloyd Dorfman CBE putting an enterprise value on TOG of approximately £500m.
	








(?)























                Jun 19, 2017
          

Celanese and Blackstone To Form Joint Venture in Acetate Tow 



		Celanese Corporation (NYSE: CE), a global technology and specialty materials company, and funds managed by Blackstone (NYSE: BX), one of the world’s leading investment firms, today announced a definitive agreement to form a JV that will create a global acetate tow supplier. Celanese and Blackstone will own 70 percent and 30 percent of the JV, respectively.
	








(?)























                Jun 08, 2017
          

Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe V Raises €7.8 Billion



		Blackstone (NYSE:BX) today announced that it has held its final close on its fifth European opportunistic real estate fund, Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe V (“BREP Europe V”). Together with commitments from Blackstone and its affiliates, BREP Europe V has €7.8 billion of capital commitments, making it the largest ever dedicated European Real Estate fund. 
	








(?)























                Jun 05, 2017
          

Blackstone Invests in Ascenty to Fuel Data Center Expansion Plans



		New York, June 5, 2017 – Blackstone (NYSE: BX) announced today that funds managed by Blackstone Tactical Opportunities have made an equity investment in Ascenty, the leading provider of data center & telecom services in Brazil.
	








(?)























                Jun 02, 2017
          

Mayor Emanuel, Blackstone Charitable Foundation and World Business Chicago Announce First Blackstone Inclusive Entrepreneurship Challenge Cohort



		Organizations Awarded $1 Million in Grants as part of $3 Million Commitment to Support Chicago Entrepreneurs
	








(?)























                Jun 02, 2017
          

Blackstone Announces €12.25 billion Sale of Logicor to China Investment Corporation



		June 2, 2017 – Blackstone (NYSE:BX) announces that real estate funds managed by Blackstone (“Blackstone”) have agreed to sell their pan European logistics company, Logicor, to affiliates of China Investment Corporation (“CIC”) for €12.25 billion. 
	








(?)























                May 25, 2017
          

Blackstone Reaches 50,000 American Military Veterans Hiring Target Ahead of Schedule; Commits to New, Additional 50,000 Veterans Hiring Goal



		Blackstone today announced that it has reached its goal of hiring 50,000 American military veterans, caregivers and spouses across its portfolio of companies, one year ahead of its original five-year target. The firm also announced it has committed to a new goal of hiring 50,000 additional military veterans, caregivers, and spouses in the next five years.
	








(?)























                May 20, 2017
          

Blackstone to Launch $40 Billion Infrastructure Investment Vehicle and New Infrastructure Business



		New York, May 20, 2017 – Blackstone and the Public Investment Fund (“PIF”) of Saudi Arabia announced today the execution of a memorandum of understanding in relation to the launch of a new investment vehicle dedicated to infrastructure with an anchor $20 billion contribution by PIF.
	








(?)























                May 01, 2017
          

Blackstone completes acquisition of Aon Hewitt’s Technology-Enabled Benefits & Cloud-Based HR Service Platform



		New York, May 1, 2017 – Blackstone (NYSE: BX) today announced that private equity funds affiliated with Blackstone have completed the acquisition of Aon plc’s (NYSE: AON) technology-enabled benefits and human resources platform for a cash consideration of up to $4.8 billion, including $4.3 billion at closing and an additional consideration of up to $500 million based on future performance.
	








(?)























                Apr 20, 2017
          

Blackstone Reports First Quarter 2017 Results



		Blackstone will host a conference call on April 20th, 2017 at 11:00 a.m. ET to discuss first quarter 2017 results. 
	








(?)























                Apr 17, 2017
          

Blackstone Energy Partners to Acquire EagleClaw Midstream Ventures



		EagleClaw Midstream Ventures, LLC (“EagleClaw”) and its financial sponsor, EnCap Flatrock Midstream, announced today that they have entered into a binding agreement to sell the company to funds managed by Blackstone Energy Partners and Blackstone Capital Partners for approximately $2 billion. 
	








(?)























                Apr 12, 2017
          

Blackstone Invests in De Nora



		Blackstone (NYSE: BX) announces that funds managed by Blackstone Tactical Opportunities, have agreed to make a substantial investment in De Nora, the leading global designer, manufacturer and supplier of electrode and water technology. 
	








(?)























                Mar 31, 2017
          

Blackstone Completes Acquisition of OfficeFirst



		OfficeFirst Immobilien AG (“OfficeFirst”), a leading German real estate investor and manager, announces that European real estate funds managed by Blackstone have completed the acquisition of the company.
	








(?)























                Mar 30, 2017
          

Blackstone Announces First Quarter 2017 Media Call



		 Blackstone (NYSE:BX) announced today that it will host a conference call for the media on Thursday, April 20, 2017 at 9:30 a.m. ET to review first quarter 2017 results.
	








(?)
























12345678910...














Quick Links






Explore Blackstone






Get in Touch



























  Back to Top




 



© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)
Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer



プライバシー・ポリシー  | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号加入協会/日本証券業協会　一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会




×Stay up-to-dateEmail AlertsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here. email address (required) first name (required) last name (required) company name job title  Byron Wien Market Commentary
							  Blackstone Press Releases
							   Submit


Cookie Information and Consent RequestBlackstone Cookie PolicyThis website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.
Learn More Continue 


×
Contact UsGeneralFor office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000Email Alerts & Investor RelationsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.
Investor Relations Contact InformationUS: +1 888-756-8443International: +1 646-313-6590BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com Media ContactsFor media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.





 
         
	Private Equity
    


















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6






Private Equity
Putting Capital to Work, Making Companies Stronger.





Overview Our investments span a wide range of industries around the world in established and growth-oriented businesses alike. Playing a vital role in helping companies realize their growth potential, we uncover value by identifying great companies and enhancing their performance by providing patient capital and operating support to strong management teams. Our approach helps our portfolio companies grow core businesses, launch new initiatives, make transformative acquisitions and upgrade technologies and systems to support their long-term strategy.   
We provide more than just capital. We seek to make the companies we invest in stronger through a bottoms-up strategy of transformation. Crucially, we bring the expertise of our Portfolio Operations Group to provide strategic guidance on a variety of operational improvements, including revenue growth, procurement, leadership development, lean process and IT optimization, energy sustainability, and employee health care.
  







				A Message from Joe Baratta, Global Head of Private Equity
			










DRIVING
Transformative Impact  We strive to create value by investing in great businesses where our capital, strategic insight, global relationships and operational support can drive transformation that unlocks the company’s potential. In addition to benefiting our investors, the improvements in growth and global competitiveness benefit workers, communities and other stakeholders. 
We are patient investors who practice the art of the long view, and are committed to achieving the best long-term outcomes for our businesses and our investors. 
 


DISCIPLINED
Due Diligence  Our investment approach is based on a disciplined due diligence process that measures risk while identifying the catalysts for increased value. We purposefully engage only in friendly transactions and work with talented management teams to achieve transformative results. Our specialized Portfolio Operations Group helps to maximize value by improving processes across varied elements of a business’s operations.    
The returns that these investments earn for our investors – pension funds, academic and charitable institutions, governments and other institutions, as well as retail investors – help to secure and grow the assets needed to support retirees and fund essential programs.
 











$100 billion AUM

Blackstone is a global leader in private equity, with $100 billion in assets under management through our opportunistic and private equity segments.






82 Portfolio 
Companies 
Our portfolio of 82 companies with over $66 billion in combined annual revenue employs more than 511,000 people around the world.


 
 Over 250 Private Equity 
Professionals

Our team of over 250 private equity professionals around the world are based out of offices in the U.S., Europe and Asia.
All numbers are as of June 30, 2017. 








 $37.5billion
Available Capital to Invest




“ “We are constantly looking for situations where we see something, or we are able to add value in a way that our competitors don't. Our people feel the obligation to go out there and find special situations where we can intervene to drive change.”  - Joseph Baratta Global Head of Private Equity   











   
Pro-active, targeted sourcing  Sector-based, theme-driven deal sourcing is the primary responsibility and mandate of our investment professionals. We aim to source high-quality and proprietary investment opportunities by proactively developing and leveraging strong relationships with companies and key deal intermediaries. At regular pipeline meetings with sector teams, we review potential opportunities and determine what resources – both internal and external – are best suited to pursue those opportunities.  




   
Value-oriented discipline In determining value for new investments, we focus on a business’s current outlook and judge the predictability of that outlook over time, while also factoring in what we can do for the business to drive even better outcomes after our acquisition. 
  




   
Transformational operating improvements 
We actively target companies in which significant value can be created through clear strategic and operational change, and created our Portfolio Operations Group to provide hands-on support to help our portfolio companies become more productive, efficient and valuable. Once a company joins the portfolio, we help management craft a plan to reach their full potential over the long term, and provide assistance as they put this plan into practice.  




Our Portfolio


We are proud of Blackstone’s role as a positive economic catalyst for the companies in our Corporate Private Equity portfolio. We work to identify, invest in and enhance the value of great businesses.


Global in scope, our Corporate Private Equity group has offices in Toronto, New York, London, Dusseldorf, Mumbai, Singapore, Hong Kong, and Sydney. As of June 30, 2017, our Corporate Private Equity funds held interests in 82 companies.








Growth Equity



Development Projects



Buy and Build Platforms



Traditional Leveraged Buyouts 












Traditional Leveraged Buyouts 

We pursue control leveraged buyouts of both large and mid-cap companies globally

                Our large buyouts tend to be in companies of global scale with strong brands and high relative market shares, where we can still drive growth and operating improvements.  Our mid-cap buyouts tend to be of companies that are differentiated vs. larger competitors and have protected market niches and multiple avenues of growth and operating improvements.
            










						December 2015



In December 2015, private equity funds managed by Blackstone, along with Corsair Capital and co-investors from each firm, acquired a majority stake in First Eagle Investment Management, a privately-held asset management firm focused on fundamental, flexible and benchmark-agnostic investing on behalf of institutional and individual clients.





Back


Website












						February 2014



In February 2014, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired from Deutsche Telekom a stake in Scout24, Germany’s leading online classifieds company. Scout24 operates two leading online classified websites in Germany as well other market-leading online businesses in 6 other Western European countries.
Photo Credit: ©Scout24 AG
				




Back


Website












						December 2011



In December 2011, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired Emdeon, now known as Change Healthcare, a leading provider of revenue and payment cycle management solutions connecting payers, providers, pharmacies, and patients.  Change Healthcare’s Intelligent Healthcare Network processes 7.4 billion claims transactions annually, worth $1 trillion in claims value.





Back


Website
















						February 2015



In February 2015, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired Ixom via a corporate carve-out from ASX listed Orica Limited. Ixom is the largest independent chemical distributor in Australia and New Zealand and is also Australia’s largest chlor-alkali manufacturer and marketer of caustic soda and chlorine based products.





Back


Website












						March 2014



In March 2014, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired Pactera Technology International, a leading IT outsourcing and consulting service provider in China.





Back


Website












						November 2012



In November 2012, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired Vivint, a leading provider of smart home technology and services in North America. In October 2014, we completed an initial public offering of sister company Vivint Solar (NYSE: VSLR), a leading provider of distributed solar energy in the U.S. with the nation’s second largest residential solar power portfolio.





Back


Website


Press Release












						April 2011



In April 2011, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired Mivisa, one of Spain’s largest manufacturers of metal cans for food products and Europe’s third-largest, which it helped continue expanding internationally through building two new factories and growing its emerging markets presence.





Back


Website













Buy and Build Platforms

Smaller companies, scalable platforms, backable management teams

                In our “buy-and-build” transactions we tend to invest in smaller companies that have scalable platforms and backable management teams in large, fragmented industries, where we believe there are substantial revenue and margin benefits from sector consolidation.
            














						August 2014



In August 2014, private equity funds managed by Blackstone invested in Service King, one of the largest and fastest growing collision repair networks in the U.S.





Back


Website












						April 2014



In April 2014, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired Accuvant, which, in January 2015, merged with FishNet Security to form Optiv, a leading provider of IT security technology and consulting services in the U.S.





Back


Website













Development Projects

Greenfield and later-stage development projects

                We make both control and non-control investments in greenfield and later-stage development projects in energy and power and related sectors.
            










						May 2012



In May 2012, private equity funds managed by Blackstone together made a $1.5bn equity commitment to Cheniere Energy Partners, L.P. in order to fund the construction of the Sabine Pass Liquefaction terminal, the first LNG liquefaction and export facility in the continental United States.





Back


Website
















						April 2011



In April 2011, private equity funds managed by Blackstone formed a joint venture with Alta Resources to pursue emerging oil and gas shale plays in North America.  The partnership acquired over 67,000 acres in the Duvernay shale play in Alberta, Canada, which were sold to Chevron (NYSE: CVX) in September 2013.





Back


Website












						November 2012



In November 2012, private equity funds managed by Blackstone formed a strategic partnership and made an investment with LLOG Exploration, one of the largest domestic, private oil and gas companies focused on exploration and development in the deep water Gulf of Mexico. In April 2015, the partnership’s Delta House floating production facility (“FPS”) achieved first production.





Back


Website













Growth Equity

Control and non-control growth equity investments

                We make both control and non-control growth equity investments where our capital and operating expertise can act as catalysts for substantial revenue and enterprise value growth
            










						December 2012



In December 2012, private equity funds managed by Blackstone invested in International Tractors Limited which manufactures Sonalika Farm Equipment and Tractors. It is one of the largest manufacturers in India with a strong presence in the tractor export market.







Back


Website
















						February 2014



In February 2014, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired a 20% minority stake in Versace to work alongside the Versace family to achieve the growth potential of the brand.





Back


Website












						December 2011



In December 2011, private equity funds managed by Blackstone acquired a 45% interest in Leica Camera, an iconic brand and a leading manufacturer of premium digital cameras and sport optics.





Back


Website







 












 Investor Documents Distribution History Corporate Governance 




SHARESNAV/Share: $1,268.99  As of 05/31/2015
 Prospectus Statement of Additional Information Privacy Notice Semi-Annual Report 


 SHARES NAV/Share: $1,268.99  As of 05/31/2015
 SEC Filings Documents for Tender Offer on Sept 20, 2015 Fact Card 2014 Distribution Information 




 Investor Documents Distribution History Corporate Governance 




SHARESNAV/Share: $1,268.99  As of 05/31/2015
 Prospectus Statement of Additional Information Privacy Notice Semi-Annual Report 


 SHARES NAV/Share: $1,268.99  As of 05/31/2015
 SEC Filings Documents for Tender Offer on Sept 20, 2015 Fact Card 2014 Distribution Information 





























   Back to Top
 








Quick Links



Explore Blackstone



Get in Touch




























© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)

Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer


プライバシー・ポリシー   | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社
金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号
加入協会/ 一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会







Cookie Information and Consent Request
Blackstone Cookie Policy

This website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.

 Learn More 
Continue 







×
Stay up-to-date
Email Alerts


To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
 
 email address (required)  

 first name (required)  
 last name (required)  


 company name  
 job title  



  
Byron Wien Market Commentary
 
  
Blackstone Press Releases
 




    Submit 






 ×
Contact Us
General

For office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. 
 Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000

Email Alerts & Investor Relations

To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.


For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.

Investor Relations Contact Information
  US: +1 888-756-8443
 International: +1 646-313-6590
 BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com 

Media Contacts

For media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.












 
         
	Real Estate
    


















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6






Real Estate
 





Who We Are
We are the largest real estate private equity firm in the world today with $104 billion of assets under management. We operate around the globe with investments and people in North America, Europe, Asia and Latin America. We seek to generate attractive risk-adjusted returns for our investors across cycles and over the long term. The Blackstone Real Estate platform encompasses investments across the risk spectrum from opportunistic to core+ to debt. 

We seek to acquire high quality investments at discounts to replacement cost. We then improve the properties through hands-on management and targeted value-add initiatives. Our efforts result in solid returns for investors and strong economic assets for communities. Blackstone’s real estate portfolio includes office, retail, hotel, industrial and residential properties. Major holdings include Hilton Worldwide, Invitation Homes (single family homes), Logicor (pan-European logistics), SCPG (Chinese shopping malls), and prime office buildings in the world’s major cities. Blackstone real estate also operates one of the leading real estate finance platforms, including management of the publicly traded Blackstone Mortgage Trust (NYSE:BXMT).









				A Message from Jon Gray, Global Head of Real Estate
			






















 $104b of
Investor Capital
Blackstone’s proprietary data enables it to target specific themes with conviction and deploy significant amounts of discretionary capital. Blackstone Real Estate deployed more than $69.9b of discretionary capital since the global financial crisis.




 
Approximately $200b
Value of Gross Assets

The breadth of Blackstone Real Estate’s portfolio provides valuable real-time proprietary market data. We believe this information enables Blackstone to identify mispriced and/or out-of-favor asset classes more rapidly than its competitors.






 451+ Real Estate
Professionals

The team consists of over 451 real estate professionals in 12 offices around the globe. We believe this breadth enables Blackstone to identify and evaluate opportunities worldwide.






$104billion
Total Assets Under Management




“ “By investing in real estate assets around the globe, we’re helping to build a secure financial future for millions of employees, retirees, schools, non-profit organizations and others. We’re enhancing the value of properties that anchor communities and create good jobs.”   - Jonathan D. Gray Global Head of Real Estate   








 
 
Opportunistic 
 Buy it, Fix it, Sell it. Our opportunistic platform employs a straightforward investment strategy. We seek to acquire high quality, well located assets at discounts to replacement cost, address any property or business issues through aggressive asset management, and sell the assets once Blackstone Real Estate’s objectives are accomplished.


 




 
 
Core+

Blackstone Real Estate’s Core+ business seeks to leverage Blackstone’s “buy it, fix it” strategy to deliver compelling risk-adjusted returns in the core+ space. We target high quality assets in gateway cities with a more modest risk profile, longer hold periods, and a significant current income component. 
 




 
 
Debt 

With over $41 billion of loans made or acquired since its inception in 2008, Blackstone Real Estate’s debt strategies group has established itself as a leading platform providing creative lending solutions.
 



our approach


    




      




      ×    watch video     



 









Blackstone Real Estate Strategy
                





Buy it
We acquire high-quality, income-producing assets at discounts to replacement cost.





Fix it
We unlock value by proactively addressing any physical or operating issues through aggressive asset management.





Sell it
Once assets are stabilized we sell the investments to long term real estate holders and return capital to our investors.



 


 
 
One Global Organization

Blackstone Real Estate is a deeply integrated global business that relies on constant communication, frequent asset strategy reviews with the entire global team, and relocations of professionals among its offices in order to effectively instill its process and culture worldwide. Blackstone Real Estate has one centralized investment committee that meets weekly to carefully review and challenge every investment around the world. This committee is comprised of the 27 real estate partners who average 12 years at the firm (SMDs).
 




 
 
Blackstone Advantage

Blackstone Real Estate’s unparalleled relationships within the industry allow Blackstone to identify and execute large complicated transactions with speed and certainty at attractive pricing metrics. Blackstone has operating platforms dedicated to logistics, office, hotel, retail, residential and loan servicing. These platforms provide invaluable real-time proprietary market data informing our team of market and property conditions and trends.
 




 
 
Uniquely Positioned

Our large discretionary capital base, global footprint, and dominant competitive position support our strategy of investing with conviction. The ability to execute in scale with speed and certainty makes Blackstone Real Estate a compelling solution for sellers and borrowers.
 



 

Our Portfolio




Retail



Residential



Industrial



Office



Hotel




 







Office

222 million square feet of office space globally

                One of the largest owners of office properties in the U.S. 

* As of June 30, 2017
















Willis Tower is a 3.8 million square foot, 110-story mixed use tower in downtown Chicago. The iconic property is the second tallest office building in the U.S, and its SkyDeck/Ledge is the most popular tourist attraction in the city. Blackstone Real Estate has embarked on an extensive renovation plan that includes a comprehensive repositioning of the building’s retail space, state-of-the-art amenities, and new entertainment options that we believe will complement and enhance the building’s standing as one of Chicago’s premier tourist destinations.





Back


Website


Press Release












						November 2006



Blackstone is a leading owner of office space in India, spanning over 30 million square feet across all major cities. Since our first investment in 2011, Blackstone has built a portfolio of Grade-A office parks that provide best-in-class facilities and infrastructure to ensure a comfortable and enriching environment for our largely multinational tenants. 





Back













Retail

79 million square feet of retail assets 

                One of the most active investors in retail since 2011

* As of June 30, 2017















						October 2015



With Multi Corp, Blackstone was able to acquire control of the company through multiple purchases of its distressed corporate debt beginning in 2012, and converted these positions into the equity ownership of one of Europe’s leading owners and managers of high quality shopping centers. Multi owns and/or manages a portfolio of 161 shopping centers, factory outlets, and retail parks in 13 countries across Europe. After acquiring control, Blackstone strengthened the company’s balance sheet, transforming Multi into a well-capitalized, growth-oriented platform.





Back


Website













Through its investment in SCP Group, China’s largest non-family controlled mall company, Blackstone controls a portfolio of 21 mass-market malls across 17 first and second-tier Chinese cities.  The portfolio offers the opportunity to capitalize on China’s emerging consumer and the country’s shift towards a consumption-driven economy.  The malls have continued to achieve compelling sales growth despite a slowdown in China’s overall GDP growth rate.





Back


Website













Hotel

211,000 hotel keys globally

                One of the largest hospitality investors in the U.S. 

* As of June 30, 2017











						May 2012



We recognized an opportunity in Motel 6 to transform an undermanaged company by implementing a system-wide renovation and franchise growth program.   The company has benefited from our successful track record in the branded, limited service / economy hotel segment, achieving significant growth since we acquired Motel 6 in 2012. Today Motel 6 is the largest owner/operator in the U.S. economy lodging segment with more than 1,100 motels nationwide.





Back


Website


Press Release
















						July 2007



With Hilton, Blackstone’s largest-ever investment, we chose a great business and put in place an outstanding management team, focused on accelerating the company’s global growth. Seven years after our initial investment, we brought Hilton back to the public market, with 44% more hotels than when we acquired it. 





Back


Website












						December 2014



The Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas is an iconic, luxury resort hotel and casino located in the heart of the Las Vegas Strip. Since acquiring the property at a 60% discount to its construction cost in 2014, we have been focused on driving operating performance. We are converting underutilized space into new rooms and retail, introducing fresh restaurant concepts, and upgrading the high-end gaming experience. Our “fix it” plan is working as the resort was recently named to the Conde Nast Traveller Gold List as one of the “Top Hotels in the World”.





Back


Website


Press Release













Industrial

252 million square feet in industrial properties

                 One of the most active investors in the sector since 2010

* As of June 30, 2017















						February 2015



Logicor is the largest owner of European modern logistics and distribution properties, spanning over 133 million square feet across 18 countries including the United Kingdom, France and Germany. The platform has benefitted from our continued focus on operational improvements and commitment to creating a best-in-class operating platform since our first investment in 2012





Back


Website













Residential

145,000 multifamily units

                Major investor across the U.S. and globally

* As of June 30, 2017
















Stuyvesant Town / Peter Cooper Village is an irreplaceable apartment community totaling 11,200 units in 56 buildings on 80 acres in Manhattan’s East Village. The community was developed to provide affordable housing for returning World War II veterans and has been an important part of New York City ever since. Blackstone Real Estate leveraged its relationships and ability to transact in scale with speed and certainty to acquire the property at a highly compelling basis. The most important aspect of the transaction was Blackstone’s partnership with the City of New York to protect 5,000 affordable apartments for 20 years – the most units preserved for affordability ever at one time in the city’s history. Our agreement also limited rent increases on an additional 1,400 units that otherwise would have lost rent protection in 2020.





Back


Website












						December 2014



Invitation Homes is the leading provider of single-family homes for rent in 13 markets across the U.S. Blackstone created a leading single-family home rental platform in 13 metropolitan markets across the U.S. The platform creates jobs and provides high quality, affordable housing for families nationwide.





Back


Website






















































   Back to Top
 








Quick Links



Explore Blackstone



Get in Touch




























© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)

Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer


プライバシー・ポリシー   | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社
金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号
加入協会/ 一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会







Cookie Information and Consent Request
Blackstone Cookie Policy

This website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.

 Learn More 
Continue 







×
Stay up-to-date
Email Alerts


To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
 
 email address (required)  

 first name (required)  
 last name (required)  


 company name  
 job title  



  
Byron Wien Market Commentary
 
  
Blackstone Press Releases
 




    Submit 






 ×
Contact Us
General

For office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. 
 Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000

Email Alerts & Investor Relations

To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.


For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.

Investor Relations Contact Information
  US: +1 888-756-8443
 International: +1 646-313-6590
 BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com 

Media Contacts

For media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.












 


Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI, L.P.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 26, 2017 12:23 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI, L.P.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI, L.P. specializes in real estate investments. The fund seeks to invest in public-to-private acquisitions of real estate companies, recovering office markets, hotel repositioning, and non-US properties. It seeks to invest globally with a focus on North America, Europe, and Asia.


345 Park AvenueNew York, NY 10154United StatesFounded in 2007



Phone: 212-583-5000

Fax: 212-583-5749

www.blackstone.com







Key Executives for Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI, L.P.




Mr. Robert Christopher Heady


      	Senior Managing Director, Chairman of Asia Pacific, and Head of Real Estate Asia
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      October 24, 2016
			    
Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc.





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI, L.P., please visit www.blackstone.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























The Blackstone Group - Wikipedia






















 







The Blackstone Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Blackstone Group)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Not to be confused with BlackRock Inc, an investment management firm.

The Blackstone Group L.P.





Type

Master limited partnership


Traded as
NYSE: BX


Industry
Financial services


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Founder
Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman


Headquarters
345 Park Avenue, Manhattan, New York City, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen A. Schwarzman
(Chairman and CEO)
Hamilton E. James
(President & COO)
J. Tomilson Hill
(Vice Chairman)
Jonathan D. Gray
(Global Head of Real estate)


Products
Private equity
Investment management
Asset management


Revenue
 US$ 7.484 billion (2014)



Net income

 US$ 1.584 billion (2014)


AUM
 US$ 311 billion (2015)[1][2]


Total assets
 US$ 31.510 billion (2014)



Number of employees

2,190 (2014)


Website
www.blackstone.com


The Blackstone Group L.P. is an American multinational private equity, alternative asset management and financial services firm based in New York City. As the largest alternative investment firm in the world,[3] Blackstone specializes in private equity, credit and hedge fund investment strategies.[4]
Blackstone's private equity business has been one of the largest investors in leveraged buyout transactions over the last decade, while its real estate business has actively acquired commercial real estate. Since its inception, Blackstone has completed investments in such notable companies as Hilton Worldwide, Merlin Entertainments Group, Performance Food Group, Equity Office Properties, Republic Services, AlliedBarton, United Biscuits, Freescale Semiconductor, Vivint,[5] and Travelport.[6]
Blackstone was founded in 1985 as a mergers and acquisitions boutique by Peter G. Peterson and Stephen A. Schwarzman, who had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. Over the course of two decades, Blackstone has evolved into one of the world's largest private equity investment firms.[3] In 2007, Blackstone completed a $4 billion initial public offering to become one of the first major private equity firms to list shares in its management company on a public exchange.[7][8] Blackstone is headquartered at 345 Park Avenue in Manhattan, New York City, with eight additional offices in the United States, as well as offices in London, Paris, Düsseldorf, Sydney, Tokyo, Hong Kong, Singapore, Beijing, Shanghai, Madrid, Mumbai, and Dubai.[9]



Contents


1 Business segments

1.1 Corporate private equity
1.2 Real estate
1.3 Marketable alternative asset management
1.4 Financial advisory services


2 History

2.1 Founding and early history
2.2 1990s
2.3 Early 2000s
2.4 Buyout boom (2005–2007)
2.5 Initial public offering in 2007
2.6 2008 to 2010
2.7 Investments since 2011


3 Self-dealing
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Business segments[edit]
Blackstone is organized into four business segments:[10]

Corporate private equity – Management of Blackstone's family of private equity funds investing in leveraged buyout transactions;
Investment Banking and Financial Advisory – Includes Blackstone's mergers and acquisitions advisory services, restructuring and reorganization advisory services, and fund placement services for alternative investment funds;
Marketable Alternative Asset Management – Management of Blackstone's funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, and closed-end mutual funds;
Real Estate – Management of Blackstone's family of real estate investment funds.

Corporate private equity[edit]
As of 2011[update], Blackstone is the world's fifth-largest private equity firm by committed capital, focusing primarily on leveraged buyouts of more mature companies.[7] The firm also invests through minority investments, corporate partnerships, and industry consolidations, and occasionally, start-up investments in new entrants into existing industries. The firm focuses on friendly investments in large capitalization companies.[10]
Blackstone's private equity business employs approximately 120 investment employees in New York City; London; Menlo Park, California; Mumbai; Hong Kong; and Beijing.[6]
Historically, Blackstone has primarily relied on private equity funds, pools of committed capital from pension funds, insurance companies, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investors.[11] As of the end of 2008, Blackstone had completed fundraising for six funds with total investor commitments of over $36 billion, including five traditional private equity fund and a separate fund focusing on telecommunications investments.
Below is a summary of Blackstone's private equity funds raised from its inception through the beginning of 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Capital Partners I
1987
$0.8


Blackstone Capital Partners II
1994
$1.27


Blackstone Capital Partners III
1997
$3.78


Blackstone Communications Partners I
2000
$2.02


Blackstone Capital Partners IV
2003
$6.45


Blackstone Capital Partners V
2006
$21.7


Blackstone Capital Partners VI
2010
$13.5


From 1987 to the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested approximately $20 billion in capital in 109 private equity transactions.[10]
Blackstone's most notable investments include Allied Waste,[13] AlliedBarton Security Services, Graham Packaging, Celanese, Nalco, HealthMarkets, Houghton Mifflin, American Axle, TRW Automotive, Catalent Pharma Solutions, Prime Hospitality, Legoland, Madame Tussauds,[14] Luxury Resorts (LXR), Pinnacle Foods, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Apria Healthcare, Travelport, The Weather Channel (United States) and The PortAventura Resort. In 2009 Blackstone purchased Busch Entertainment (comprising the Sea World Parks, Busch Garden Parks and the 2 water parks).[15]
In 2012, Blackstone acquired a controlling interest in Utah-based Vivint, Inc., a home automation, security, and energy company.[16]
Former notable investments include Universal Studios Parks, which was sold to Comcast.
Real estate[edit]
Blackstone began building its real estate investment business in 1992 with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses and has built it into a global operation with 122 investment professionals in the United States, Europe and Asia. The real estate business has raised approximately $28 billion for a variety of fund vehicles, including six US-focused funds and three International opportunity funds. Blackstone also raised a real estate special situations fund focusing on non-controlling debt and equity investment opportunities. The special situations fund invests directly in real estate as well as private and publicly traded real estate-related securities.[10][17]
The following is a summary of Blackstone's real estate funds raised from inception through November 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Real Estate Partners I
1994
$0.48


Blackstone Real Estate Partners II
1996
$1.3


Blackstone Real Estate Partners III
1999
$1.5


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe)
2001
€0.8


Blackstone Real Estate Partners IV
2003 (alt value 2004)[18]
$2.5 (alt value €6.7bn)[18]


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe) II
2006
€1.55


Blackstone Real Estate Partners V
2006
$5.25


Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI
2007
$10.9


Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations PE Fund
2008
$1.0


Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe III
2009
€3.1


From 1987 through the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested more than $13 billion in 212 real estate transactions and is a major owner of real estate throughout the US and Europe.[10] Blackstone's most notable real estate investments have included Equity Office Properties, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Trizec Properties, Center Parcs UK, La Quinta Inns & Suites, Motel 6, Wyndham Worldwide, Southern Cross Healthcare and Vicinity Centres.[19]
The purchase and subsequent profitable IPO of Southern Cross led to controversy in the UK. Part of the purchase involved splitting the business into a property company, NHP, and a care home business, which Blackstone claimed would become "the leading company in the elderly care market". In May 2011, Southern Cross, now independent, was almost bankrupt, jeopardising 31,000 elderly residents in 750 care homes. It denied blame, although Blackstone was widely accused in the media for selling on the company with an unsustainable business model and crippled with an impossible sale and leaseback strategy.[20][21]
After the subprime mortgage crisis, Blackstone Group LP has bought more than $5.5 billion single-family homes for rent, to be sold when the prices rise.[22]
Blackstone has agreed to sell a selection of Northern California office buildings for the sum of $3.5 billion, in the latest sale of real estate by the firm.[23]
Marketable alternative asset management[edit]
Main article: GSO Capital Partners
In 1990, Blackstone created a fund of hedge funds business to manage the internal assets for Blackstone and its senior managers. Over the years, this business evolved into Blackstone's marketable alternative asset management segment, which was opened to institutional investors. Among the investments included in this segment are funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, proprietary hedge funds and closed-end mutual funds.[10]
In March 2008, Blackstone acquired GSO Capital Partners, a credit-oriented alternative asset manager, for $620 million in cash and stock and up to $310 million through an earnout over the next five years based on certain earnings targets. The combination of Blackstone and GSO created one of the largest credit platforms in the alternative asset management business, with over $21 billion of total assets under management.[24] GSO was founded in 2005 by Bennett Goodman, Tripp Smith and Doug Ostrover. The GSO team had previously managed the leveraged finance businesses at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette and later Credit Suisse First Boston, after the acquisition of DLJ. Blackstone had existing relationships with the GSO team as an original investor in GSO's funds. Following the completion of the acquisition, Blackstone merged GSO's operations with its existing debt investment operations.[25][26]
Financial advisory services[edit]
Blackstone's financial advisory business is composed of three businesses:[10]

Corporate and Mergers and Acquisitions Advisory
Restructuring & Reorganization Advisory
Private Placement Advisory

Blackstone was founded by Peterson and Schwarzman in 1985 as a boutique investment banking firm that provides mergers and acquisitions advisory services. Among Blackstone's most notable corporate and mergers and acquisitions, advisory clients include Microsoft, Procter & Gamble, Verizon, Comcast, Sony and AIG.[27][28]
In 1991, with the collapse of the 1980s buyout boom, Blackstone began to offer advisory services in corporate restructurings as well. Blackstone's most notable restructuring clients have included General Motors[29] Xerox, Enron,[30] Bally Total Fitness and Global Crossing.
Blackstone's fund placement advisory group, The Park Hill Group, was formed in 2005 with a team of professionals from Atlantic-Pacific Capital and Credit Suisse. The group focuses on raising capital from institutional investors for private investment vehicles that invest in private equity, mezzanine, real estate, venture capital, and hedge funds.[31] Park Hill Group also provides secondary advisory services to investors seeking portfolio liquidity and unfunded commitment relief.[32]
In 2006 John Studzinski joined The Blackstone Group as the senior managing director in its investment and advisory group and as a member of the firm's executive committee.[33][34] He was recruited to oversee and develop Blackstone’s mergers-and-acquisitions advisory business, Blackstone Advisory Partners, in the United States and Europe, and to open an office in London.[34][35] His primary role as global head of Blackstone Advisory Partners was to oversee Blackstone's corporate M&A advisory services business in the U.S., and further develop the corporate M&A advisory business in Europe and Asia.[36][37] In early 2015, Blackstone began spinning off three of its divisions, including its M&A advisory group, to avoid any potential conflicts of interest with its primary private-equity business.[38][39][40] After assisting with the transition,[41] Studzinski became Vice Chairman of Investor Relations and Business Development at The Blackstone Group.[42][43] In this capacity, he holds responsibility for a number of sovereign and international institutional relationships, as well as ultra high-net-worth families outside the U.S.[42]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
The Blackstone Group was founded in 1985 by Peter G. Peterson & Stephen A. Schwarzman and Richard Bennett with $400,000 in seed capital.[44][45] The founders named their firm "Blackstone", which was a cryptogram derived from the names of the two founders (Schwarzman and Peterson): "Schwarz" is German for "black"; "Peter", or "Petra" in Greek, means "stone" or "rock".[46] The two founders had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. At Lehman, Schwarzman served as head of Lehman Brothers' global mergers and acquisitions business.[47] Prominent investment banker Roger C. Altman, another Lehman veteran, left his position as a managing director of Shearson Lehman Brothers to join Peterson and Schwarzman at Blackstone in 1987, but left in 1992 to join the Clinton Administration as Deputy Treasury Secretary.
Blackstone was originally formed as a mergers and acquisitions advisory boutique. Blackstone advised on the 1987 merger of investment banks E. F. Hutton & Co. and Shearson Lehman Brothers, collecting a $3.5 million fee.[48][49]




Blackstone co-founder Peter Peterson was former chairman of Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc.


From the outset in 1985, Schwarzman and Peterson planned to enter the private equity business, but had difficulty in raising their first fund because neither had ever led a leveraged buyout.[50] Blackstone finalized fundraising for its first private equity fund in the aftermath of the October 1987 stock market crash. After two years of providing strictly advisory services, Blackstone decided to pursue a merchant banking model after its founders determined that many situations required an investment partner rather than just an advisor. The largest investors in the first fund included Prudential Insurance Company, Nikko Securities and the General Motors pension fund.[51]
Blackstone also ventured into other businesses, most notably investment management. In 1987 Blackstone entered into a 50–50 partnership with the founders of BlackRock, Larry Fink and Ralph Schlosstein. The two founders, who had previously run the mortgage-backed securities divisions at First Boston and Lehman Brothers Kuhn Loeb, respectively, initially joined Blackstone to manage an investment fund and provide advice to financial institutions. They also planned to use a Blackstone fund to invest in financial institutions and help build an asset management business specializing in fixed income investments.[10][52]
As the business grew, Japanese bank Nikko Securities acquired a 20% interest in Blackstone for a $100 million investment in 1988 (valuing the firm at $500 million). Nikko's investment allowed for a major expansion of the firm and its investment activities.[53] The growth firm also recruited politician and investment banker David Stockman from Salomon Brothers in 1988. Stockman led many key deals in his time at the firm, but had a mixed record with his investments.[54] He left Blackstone in 1999 to start his own private equity firm, Heartland Industrial Partners, based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[55][56]
The firm advised CBS Corporation on its 1988 sale of CBS Records to Sony to form what would become Sony Music Entertainment.[57] In June 1989, Blackstone acquired freight railroad operator, CNW Corporation.[58] That same year, Blackstone partnered with Salomon Brothers to raise $600 million to acquire distressed thrifts in the midst of the savings and loan crisis.[59]
1990s[edit]




The Blackstone Group logo in use prior to the firm's rebranding as simply Blackstone


As the 1990s began, Blackstone continued its growth and expansion into new businesses. In 1990, Blackstone launched its fund of hedge funds business, initially intended to manage investments for Blackstone senior management. Also in 1990, Blackstone extended its ambitions to Europe, forming a partnership with J. O. Hambro Magan in the UK and Indosuez in France. In 1991, Blackstone created its Europe unit to enhance the firm's presence internationally.[60][61]
In 1991, Blackstone launched its real estate investment business with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses under the leadership of Henry Silverman. In 1990, Blackstone and Silverman acquired a 65% interest in Prime Motor Inn's Ramada and Howard Johnson franchises for $140 million, creating Hospitality Franchise Systems as a holding company.[62] In October 1991, Blackstone and Silverman added Days Inns of America for $250 million.[63] Then, in 1993, Hospitality Franchise Systems acquired Super 8 Motels for $125 million.[64] Silverman would ultimately leave Blackstone to serve as CEO of HFS, which would later become Cendant Corporation.
Blackstone made a number of notable investments in the early and mid-1990s, including Great Lakes Dredge and Dock Company (1991), Six Flags (1991), US Radio (1994), Centerplate (1995), MEGA Brands (1996). Also, in 1996, Blackstone partnered with the Loewen Group, the second largest funeral home and cemetery operator in North America, to acquire funeral home and cemetery businesses. The partnership's first acquisition was a $295 million buyout of Prime Succession from GTCR.[65][66][67]
Through the mid and late 1990s, Blackstone continued to grow. In 1997, Blackstone completed fundraising for its third private equity fund, with approximately $4 billion of investor commitments[68] and a $1.1 billion real estate investment fund.[69] In the following year, in 1998, Blackstone sold a 7% interest in its management company to AIG, replacing Nikko Securities as its largest investor and valuing Blackstone at $2.1 billion.[70] Then, in 1999, Blackstone launched its mezzanine capital business. Blackstone brought in five professionals, led by Howard Gellis from Nomura Holding America's Leveraged Capital Group to manage the business.[71]
Blackstone's investments in the late 1990s included AMF Group (1996), Haynes International (1997), American Axle (1997), Premcor (1997), CommNet Cellular (1998), Graham Packaging (1998), Centennial Communications (1999), Bresnan Communications (1999), PAETEC Holding Corp. (1999). Haynes and Republic Technologies International, a specialty steel maker in which Blackstone invested in 1996, both had problems and ultimately filed bankruptcy.[72]
Also, in 1997, Blackstone made its first investment in Allied Waste. Two years later, in 1999, Blackstone, together with Apollo Management provided capital for Allied Waste's acquisition of Browning-Ferris Industries in 1999 to create the second largest waste management company in the US. Blackstone's investment in Allied was one of its largest to that point in the firm's history.[13]
Its investments in telecommunications businesses—four cable TV systems in rural areas (TW Fanch 1 and 2, Bresnan Communications and Intermedia Partners IV) and a cell phone operator in the Rocky Mountain states (CommNet Cellular) were among the most successful of the era, generating $1.5 billion of profits for Blackstone's funds.[73]
Blackstone Real Estate Advisers, its real estate affiliate, bought the Watergate Complex in Washington D.C. in July 1998 for $39 million[74] and sold it to Monument Reality in August 2004.[75]
Early 2000s[edit]
Blackstone acquired the mortgage for 7 World Trade Center in October 2000 from the Teachers Insurance and Annuity Association.[76]




Schwarzman's Blackstone Group completed the first major IPO of a private equity firm in June 2007.[77]


In July 2002, Blackstone completed fundraising for a $6.45 billion private equity fund, Blackstone Capital Partners IV, the largest private equity fund ever raised to that point. More than $4 billion of the capital was raised by the end of 2001 and Blackstone was able to secure the remaining commitments despite adverse market conditions.[78]
With a significant amount of capital in its new fund, Blackstone was one of a handful of private equity investors capable of completing large transactions in the adverse conditions of the early 2000s recession. At the end of 2002, Blackstone, together with Thomas H. Lee Partners and Bain Capital, acquired Houghton Mifflin Company for $1.28 billion. The transaction represented one of the first large club deals, completed since the collapse of the Dot-com bubble.[79]
In 2002, Hamilton E. James joined global alternative asset manager Blackstone, where he currently serves as president and chief operating officer. He also serves on the firm's executive and management committees, and its board of directors.[80] In late 2002, Blackstone remained active acquiring TRW Automotive in a $4.7 billion buyout, the largest private equity deal announced that year (the deal was completed in early 2003). TRW's parent was acquired by Northrop Grumman, while Blackstone purchased its automotive parts business, a major supplier of automotive systems.[81][82] Blackstone also purchased a majority interest in Columbia House, a music buying club, in mid-2002.[83]
Blackstone made a significant investment in Financial Guaranty Insurance Company (FGIC), a monoline bond insurer alongside PMI Group, The Cypress Group and CIVC Partners. FGIC incurred heavy losses, along with other bond insurers in the 2008 credit crisis.[84]
Two years later, in 2005, Blackstone was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. Blackstone's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco at the end of the 1980s leveraged buyout boom. Also, at the time of its announcement, SunGard would be the largest buyout of a technology company in history, a distinction it would cede to the buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction is also notable in the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point.[85] The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[86][87]
In 2006, Blackstone launched its new long / short equity hedge fund business, Kailix Advisors. According to Blackstone, as of September 30, 2008, Kailix Advisors had $1.9 billion of assets under management. In December 2008, Blackstone announced that Kailix would be spun off to its management team to form a new fund as an independent entity backed by Blackstone.[26]
While Blackstone was active on the corporate investment side, it was also busy pursuing real estate investments. Blackstone acquired Prime Hospitality[88] and Extended Stay America in 2004. Blackstone followed these investments with the acquisition of La Quinta Inns & Suites in 2005. Blackstone's largest transaction, the buyout of Hilton Hotels Corporation occurred in 2007. Extended Stay Hotels was sold to The Lightstone Group in July 2007 and Prime Hospitality's Wellesley Inns were folded into La Quinta.[89] La Quinta Inns & Suites went public in 2014 and is now controlled by La Quinta Holdings as the parent organization.[90]
Buyout boom (2005–2007)[edit]
During the buyout boom of 2006 and 2007, Blackstone completed some of the largest leveraged buyouts. Blackstone's most notable transactions during this period included the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


TDC
2005
In December 2005, Blackstone together with a group of firms, including Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Permira, Apax Partners and Providence Equity Partners, acquired Tele-Denmark Communications. The firms acquired the former telecom monopoly in Denmark, under the banner Nordic Telephone Company (NTC) for approximately $11 billion.
[91]


Equity Office
2006
Blackstone completes the $37.7 billion acquisition of one of the largest owners of commercial office properties in the US. At the time of its announcement, the Equity Office buyout became the largest in history, surpassing the buyout of HCA. It would later be surpassed by KKR's buyout of TXU. Vornado Realty Trust bid against Blackstone, pushing up the final price.
[92][93]


Freescale Semiconductor
2006
A consortium led by Blackstone and including the Carlyle Group, Permira and the TPG Capital completed the $17.6 billion takeover of the semiconductor company. At the time of its announcement, Freescale would be the largest leveraged buyout of a technology company ever, surpassing the 2005 buyout of SunGard. The buyers were forced to pay an extra $800 million because KKR made a last minute bid as the original deal was about to be signed. Shortly after the deal closed in late 2006, cell phone sales at Motorola Corp., Freescale's former corporate parent and a major customer, began dropping sharply. In addition, in the recession of 2008–2009, Freescale's chip sales to automakers fell off, and the company came under great financial strain.
[94][95]


Michaels
2006
Blackstone, together with Bain Capital, acquired Michaels, the largest arts and crafts retailer in North America in a $6.0 billion leveraged buyout in October 2006. Bain and Blackstone narrowly beat out Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and TPG Capital in an auction for the company.
[96]


Nielsen Holdings
2006
Blackstone together with AlpInvest Partners, Carlyle Group, Hellman & Friedman, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and Thomas H. Lee Partners acquired the global information and media company formerly known as VNU.
[97][98][99]


Orangina[100]
2006
Blackstone, together with Lion Capital acquired Orangina, the bottler, distributor and franchisor of a number of carbonated and other soft drinks in Europe from Cadbury Schweppes for €1.85 billion
[101]


Travelport
2006
Travelport, the parent of the travel web site Orbitz.com, was acquired from Cendant by Blackstone and Technology Crossover Ventures in a deal valued at $4.3 billion. The sale of Travelport followed the spin-offs of Cendant's real estate and hospitality businesses, Realogy Corporation and Wyndham Worldwide Corporation, respectively, in July 2006. (Later in the year, TPG and Silver Lake would acquire Travelport's chief competitor Sabre Holdings.) Soon after the Travelport buyout, Travelport spun off part of its subsidiary Orbitz Worldwide in an IPO and bought a Travelport competitor, Worldspan.
[102][103][104]


United Biscuits
2006
In October 2006 Blackstone, together with PAI Partners announced the acquisition of the British biscuit producer. The deal was completed in December 2006.
[105][106]


RGIS Inventory Specialists
2007
In March 2007, RGIS announced that Blackstone Group purchased a controlling interest in the company, the terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
[107]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[108]


Hilton Worldwide
2007
Blackstone acquired the premium hotel operator for approximately $26 billion, representing a 25% premium to Hilton's all-time high stock price. The Hilton deal, announced on July 3, 2007 is often referred to as the deal that marked the "high water mark" and the beginning of the end of the multi-year boom in leveraged buyouts. The company restructured its debt in 2010.
[109][110][111]


Initial public offering in 2007[edit]
In 2004, Blackstone had explored the possibility of creating a business development company (BDC), Blackridge Investments, similar to vehicles pursued by Apollo Management.[112] However, Blackstone failed to raise capital through an initial public offering that summer, and the project was shelved.[113] It also planned to raise a fund on the Amsterdam stock exchange in 2006, but its rival, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., launched a $5 billion fund there that soaked up all demand for such funds, and Blackstone abandoned its project.[114]
By the summer of 2006, Blackstone had a more ambitious goal and secretly began laying the groundwork for an IPO of the firm itself, and managed to keep the project quiet for eight or nine months.[7][115] On March 22, 2007, Blackstone filed with the SEC[10] to raise $4 billion in an initial public offering. On June 3, 2007, Blackstone announced the acquisition of Alliant Insurance Services, Inc., one of the nation's largest insurance brokerage firms.[116] On June 21, Blackstone sold a 12.3% stake in its ownership for $4.13 billion in the largest U.S. IPO since 2002. Traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol BX, Blackstone priced at $31 per share on June 22, 2007.[8][117] In July 2007, less than two weeks after the Blackstone IPO, its rival private equity firm, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, filed with the SEC.[118] In October 2009, KKR listed its shares on the Euronext exchange and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange.[119]
2008 to 2010[edit]
Since the closure of the credit markets in 2007 and 2008, Blackstone has managed to close only a small number of sizable transactions. In January 2008, Blackstone made a small co-investment alongside TPG Capital and Apollo Management in their buyout of Harrah's Entertainment, although that transaction had been announced during the buyout boom period. Other notable investments that Blackstone completed in 2008 and 2009 included AlliedBarton, Performance Food Group,[120][121] Apria Healthcare and CMS Computers.
Among the firm's two largest investments since the buyout boom have been The Weather Channel and the announced acquisition of Busch Entertainment. In July 2008, Blackstone, together with NBC Universal and Bain Capital agreed to purchase The Weather Channel from Landmark Communications.[122][123] In October 2009, Anheuser-Busch InBev announced the sale of its Busch Entertainment Corporation theme parks division to Blackstone for $2.7 billion.[124][125] The Financial Times reported that Merlin Entertainments owned by Blackstone Group will file an IPO[126] in the 2nd quarter of 2010. Merlin will be listed on the London Stock Exchange. If true this would be the second of 8 reported IPOs Blackstone plans,[127] the first being Team Health Holdings, Inc.[128] Blackstone reported at the end of 2009 revenues of $1.8bln, compared to -$349mln revenues in 2008.[129] On August 13, 2010 Blackstone announced it would buy Dynegy, an energy firm, for nearly $5 billion.[130]
In 2010, Blackstone Alternative Asset Management, received Institutional Investor magazine's 8th Annual Hedge Fund Industry award for Large Fund of Hedge Funds of the Year.[131]
Investments since 2011[edit]

In February 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired 588 malls of Centro's U.S. shopping centers for $9.4 billion. Centro's Australian continues their operation independently.[132]
In August 2011 Blackstone Group LP bought Medical-Biller Emdeon Inc. for around $3 billion. Since Blackstone Group LP was the world's biggest private-equity firm, tender offer of Emdeon Inc. public company should be done with a cash payment of $19 a share, a 44 percent premium.[133]
In late 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired the German outdoor company Jack Wolfskin. Blackstone moved some of its accounting functions to India.
In 2012, Blackstone was part of a consortium that financed Knight Capital after a software glitch threatened Knight's ability to continue operations.
In October 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired G6 Hospitality better known as Motel 6 & Studio 6 motels for 1.9 billion.
In November 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired a controlling interest in Vivint, Vivint Solar, and 2GIG Technologies.[134]
In April 2013, the company confirmed that it backed out of the proposed Dell buyout.[135]
In September 2013, Blackstone announced a strategic investment in ThoughtFocus Technologies LLC, a leading IT Service provider. The investment will establish the 'Blackstone Center of Excellence', an IT outsourcing and offshore delivery center, to provide technology and other administrative service.[136]
In August 2013 Blackstone bought Strategic Partners, manager of secondaryfunds, from CreditSuisse, with which Blackstone is raising its 6th fund, targeting $4 billion.[137]
In February 2014, Blackstone purchased a 20 percent stake in the Italian luxury brand Versace for €150 million.[138][139]
In April 2014 Blackstone's charitable arm, the Blackstone Charitable Foundation, donated $4 million to create the Blackstone Entrepreneurs Network in Colorado. The program encourages increased collaboration among local business leaders with the goal of retaining high-growth companies in the state.[140]
In May 2014, Blackstone Group purchased the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas resort from Deutsche Bank for $1.73 billion.[141]
In August 2014, Blackstone Group was in advanced talks to acquire Royal Dutch Shell Plc (RDSA)'s 50 percent stake in a shale-gas field in Louisiana. Blackstone would pay about $1.2 billion for Shell’s half-interest in the Haynesville formation.[142]
In January 2015, Blackstone announced it would sell a Sydney-based office building to Dalian Wanda Group for around $327 million.[143]
In April 2015, Blackstone announced it would acquire Excel Trust Inc, a real estate investment trust, for around $2 billion.[144]
In October 2015, Blackstone agreed to purchase BioMed Realty Trust Inc for a sum of around $8 billion.[145]
In November 2015, Blackstone Group agreed to sell facility management firm GCA Services Group Inc to a consortium of Goldman Sachs’ private equity arm and Thomas H. Lee Partners.[146]
As of Q4 2015, the firm is in talks to sell of some of its trophy office assets in the Los Angeles market. Douglas Emmett Inc. is in advanced talks to purchase four buildings for more than $1 billion. The buildings total 1.7 million square feet and are located in the Westwood area.[147]
On February 10, 2017, Aon PLC agreed to sell its human resources outsourcing platform for $4.3 billion to Blackstone Group L.P., creating a new company.[148]
On June 19, 2017, Blackstone acquired the majority interest in The Office Group, valuing the whole company at $640 million.[149]

Self-dealing[edit]
In 2013, Bloomberg uncovered how the Blackstone Group was self-dealing after its affiliate GSO Capital Partners purchased debt and credit default swaps in Codere SA, a Spanish betting, online gambling and gaming company.[150]

In the first half of 2013, Blackstone GSO and another firm later purchased a €100 million bank loan (via secondary markets) that Codere already had on the books, and then convinced Codere to delay repayment on the debt related to the aforementioned credit default swaps. That delay triggered the CDS, resulting in upwards of $18.7 million in profit for GSO.[151]

The GSO director defended the move with "Codere (working with us...) had to trigger the credit default swaps, as it was the only way to compel certain bondholders to negotiate." and blamed credit default swap investors for their loss:

Unlike Blackstone, who invested directly into Codere, these financial investors [of hedge funds using credit default swaps] were not aligned with the interests of Codere, but instead through their use of credit default swaps, were betting on when the Company would default[...]having no interest in the outcome of the game.[151]

See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of outdoor industry parent companies
List of venture capital firms

References[edit]


^ Stephen Schwarzman speaks with Betty Liu and Erik Schatzke on "In the Loop" (April 16, 2015). Schwarzman Says Fundraising Environment Is 'Remarkable' (Television production). Bloomberg. Event occurs at 00:22 minutes in. Retrieved March 16, 2016. You've got assets now at three hundred billion dollars. 
^ "Blackstone Reports Third Quarter Results" (PDF). The Blackstone Group. January 31, 2013. Archived from the original (PDF) on October 30, 2014. 
^ a b Wiliam Alden (April 18, 2013). "Public Offering Values SeaWorld at $2.5 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 19, 2013. 
^ "The Blackstone Group". The New York Times. Retrieved 12 January 2016. 
^ Kim, Soyoung (September 19, 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 2013-03-23. 
^ a b Blackstone Group: Private Equity Archived February 4, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website). See also: Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website), Team (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20
^ a b c Blackstone Said to Prepare for I.P.O. New York Times, March 16, 2007
^ a b Anderson, Jenny. "Blackstone Founders Prepare to Count Their Billions." New York Times, June 12, 2007.
^ "Blackstone - Our Offices overview". Blackstone. 
^ a b c d e f g h i The Blackstone Group L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 22, 2007
^ New bosses, new rules. Los Angeles Times, August 12, 2007
^ a b Data collected from Preqin, a private equity database system
^ a b A trash hauler is buying a much bigger rival, a type of deal that makes Wall Street a bit nervous. New York Times, March 9, 1999
^ Equity Firm Attracted to Attractions. New York Times, March 6, 2007
^ Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Kim, Soyoung; Roumeliotis, Greg (9 September 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 4 January 2013. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Overview. (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 6, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ a b "Blackstone amasses more capital for latest Europe RE pool". AltAssets. 20 December 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-20. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Investment Portfolio ( at company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Alex Hawkes "Blackstone denies blame for Southern Cross's plight" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Nils Pratley "Was Southern Cross always sickly underneath?" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Karmin, Craig (August 12, 2013). "Blackstone to Buy Stakes in Apartment Complexes From GE Unit". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Alden, William (December 8, 2014). "Blackstone to Sell California Office Buildings for $3.5 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 2014-12-19. 
^ Blackstone to Buy GSO Capital. New York Times, January 10, 2008
^ Blackstone to Buy Hedge Fund to Strengthen Credit Operations. New York Times, January 11, 2008
^ a b Blackstone To Rationalize Single Manager Hedge Funds Businesses In Efficiency Move. Press Release, December 23, 2008
^ Schwarzman Unbowed. Bloomberg Markets, March 2009
^ Blackstone Financial Advisory: Selected Clients (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived February 16, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Moore, Heidi N. (December 12, 2008). "GM Hires Blackstone". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2008-12-12. 
^ "Blackstoin Restructuring & Reorganization: Selected Transactions". (Company website) Accessed 10/20/2012
^ Blackstone: Private Placement Advisory Overview (The Park Hill Group). Company website, Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Park Hill Group: About Us. Company website, Accessed 2011-1-26
^ Moyer, Liz. "Hitting A Brick Wall". Forbes. May 18, 2006.
^ a b "John Studzinski Joins Blackstone". The Blackstone Group. May 18, 2006.
^ Wachman, Richard. "Cracking the Studzinski code". The Observer. October 7, 2006.
^ John Studzinski CBE. FT Business of Luxury Summit, 30 May – 1 June 2012. Financial Times. 2012.
^ About John Studzinski. John Studzinski's blog.
^ "Blackstone to list advisory arm early 2015". Financial Times. October 2014.
^ Dezember, Ryan. "Blackstone Group to Spin Off Financial Advisory Business". Wall Street Journal. October 10, 2014.
^ Blackstone – History: 2014. Blackstone. Blackstone.com. Retrieved March 30, 2015.
^ Roumeliotis, Greg and Paritosh Bansal. "UPDATE 4-Blackstone gives up its roots in advisory unit spin-off". Reuters. October 10, 2014.
^ a b John Studzinski – Official profile, Blackstone.
^ "E.U. Estrangement Before The Divorce (a.k.a Volatility)". Fund Portfolio Management. January 23, 2015.
^ David Carey and John E. Morris, King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone (Crown 2010), pp. 45–56
^ Private equity power list: #1 The Blackstone Group. Fortune, July 2, 2007
^ Blackstone etymology. The Deal, June 26, 2007
^ Alden, William. "Blackstone's Chief Has a Warning for Wall Street's Entrepreneurs". DealBook. Retrieved 2017-01-27. 
^ Hutton-Shearson Deal Announced". New York Times, December 4, 1987.
^ "Hutton Sets Fees". New York Times, December 9, 1987
^ King of Capital, pp. 45-56
^ A Big Fund Ready to Capitalize on Hard Times. New York Times, November 13, 1987
^ "Mortgage Unit Leaders To Join Blackstone". New York Times, March 4, 1988
^ "Nikko Acquires 20% of Blackstone Group". New York Times, December 13, 1988
^ King of Capital, pp. 144–147
^ "Stockman Forming Own Buyout Concern". New York Times, September 17, 1999
^ "Stockman Is Charged With Fraud". New York Times, March 27, 2007
^ "Sony and CBS Records: What a Romance!". New York Times, September 18, 1988
^ "CNW Accepts Buyout Bid From Blackstone Group". New York Times, June 7, 1989
^ "2 Wall Street Firms Join To Buy Savings Units". New York Times, May 12, 1989
^ U.S. Mergers Firm Is Forming British Link. New York Times, April 23, 1990
^ Chairman Is Named For Blackstone Unit. New York Times, April 5, 1991
^ Prime to Sell Interest in Inns to Blackstone. New York Times, May 24, 1990
^ Blackstone Unit to Buy Days Inns. New York Times, October 1, 1991
^ Hospitality to Acquire Super 8 Motels. New York Times, February 17, 1993
^ The Loewen Group and Blackstone Capital Partners form corporate venture to acquire Prime Succession. Business Wire, June 17, 1996. Accessed 2009-02-20.
^ Loewen And Blackstone To Make Joint Purchase. New York Times, June 18, 1996
^ Loewen Buys Big Cemetery, And Its Suitor Criticizes Deal. New York Times, September 21, 1996
^ Blackstone Raises $4 Billion for Fund. New York Times, October 10, 1997
^ Red-Hot Revival in Real Estate; Overheating Is Feared With Surge in Vulture Investing. New York Times, November 6, 1997
^ A.I.G. Will Put $1.35 Billion Into Blackstone. New York Times, July 31, 1998
^ Blackstone to Form a New Financing Unit. New York Times, April 8, 1999
^ King of Capital, pp. 145-146
^ King of Capital, pp. 148–155
^ Cube, Christine (Nov 25, 2002). "Watergate Hotel For Sale". Washington Business Journal. 
^ Staff Report (Aug 19, 2004). "Monument Realty Buys Watergate Hotel". Commercial Real Estate Direct. 
^ "Blackstone Acquires Debt on 7 World Trade Center". Business Wire. October 17, 2000. 
^ Photographed at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland in January 2008.
^ Blackstone Amasses a Record Equity Fund. New York Times, July 17, 2002
^ Vivendi Finishes Sale of Houghton Mifflin To Investors. New York Times, January 1, 2003
^ Sender, Henny. "At Blackstone, James Builds A Following". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 March 2007. 
^ King of Capital, pp. 176, 197, 206-207
^ Blackstone Group May Purchase Auto Parts Business From TRW. New York Times, November 13, 2002
^ Blackstone Buys Majority Stake in Columbia House. New York Times, May 15, 2002
^ A Split-Up of Insurers of Bonds Is Considered. New York Times, February 16, 2008
^ King of Capital, p. 225
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal." Bloomberg L.P., March 29, 2005
^ Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?. New York Times, April 3, 2005
^ The Blackstone Group to Acquire Prime Hospitality Corp. Press Release, August 18, 2004. Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived March 8, 2005, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Private-Equity Firm Sees Room for Value in Hotels. Wall Street Journal, August 17, 2005
^ http://ir.lq.com/Cache/1500058950.PDF?Y=&O=PDF&D=&FID=1500058950&T=&IID=4424891
^ Equity Firms Buy Danish Phone Company. New York Times, December 1, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 239–254
^ Blackstone's Bid for Equity Office Prevails New York Times, February 8, 2007
^ King of Capital, 231-235
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Flynn, Laurie J. "Blackstone Alliance to Buy Chip Maker for $17.6 Billion." New York Times, September 16, 2006
^ Consortium Buys Michaels for $6 Billion. New York Times, July 1, 2006
^ VNU Shareholders Reject $8.9 Bln Offer From KKR Group. Bloomberg, March 8, 2006
^ Buyout Bid For Parent Of Nielsen. New York Times, January 17, 2006
^ VNU Agrees To Public Offer From Private Equity Group. Press Release, March 8, 2006
^ "Company News Headlines". NASDAQ.com. June 2, 2011. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Cadbury Sells Beverage Unit to Two Firms. New York Times, November 22, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 314-318
^ Sachdev, Ameet. " Orbitz travels to 4th owner: Blackstone Group to buy from Cendant.", Chicago Tribune, July 1, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Fineman, Josh. "Cendant to sell Orbitz to Blackstone for $4.3 Bln", Bloomberg.com, June 30, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Parkinson, Gary (October 26, 2006). "Private-equity companies snap up United Biscuits in a £1.6bn deal". The Independent. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ "Blackstone and PAI complete purchase of UB" (Press release). United Biscuits. December 15, 2006. Archived from the original on September 27, 2007. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ [1]. RGIS Press Release, March, 21st 2007
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer." New York Times, June 8, 2007.
^ Blackstone to Buy Hilton Hotels for $26 Billion. New York Times, July 4, 2007
^ High-Water Mark. New York Times, July 4, 2008
^ King of Capital, pp. 299–300
^ Private Firms Use Closed-End Funds to Tap the Market. New York Times, April 17, 2004
^ Blackstone Group Postpones Fund Offering. New York Times, July 16, 2004
^ King of Capital, pp. 221–223
^ King of Capital, pp. 255–267
^ Alliant Insurance Services, Inc. to be acquired by Blackstone and Management, June 3, 2007 Archived March 4, 2016, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and de la Merced, Michael J. "News Analysis Behind the Veil at Blackstone? Probably Another Veil." New York Times, March 19, 2007.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ KKR lists on Euronext; NYSE is next. Reuters, October 1, 2009[dead link]
^ Equity Firms Acquiring Food Supplier. Bloomberg, January 19, 2008
^ Blackstone, Wellspring to acquire Performance Food Group in $1.3bn deal. AltAssets, January 18, 2008 Archived June 11, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Michael J. de la Merced (July 7, 2008). "Weather Channel Is Sold to NBC and Equity Firms". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-09-17. 
^ Robert Marich. "The Weather Channel Sale Wraps". Broadcasting & Cable. Archived from the original on September 15, 2008. Retrieved 2008-09-26. 
^ Blackstone to buy A-B InBev's theme parks for $2.7 billion. MarketWatch, Oct. 7, 2009
^ InBev may sell US theme parks. Boston Globe, July 16, 2008[dead link]
^ "Blackstone's Merlin Entertainment to Go Public in '10, FT Says". Bloomberg. October 23, 2009. 
^ "Blackstone plans portfolio IPOs: source". Reuters. October 12, 2009. 
^ Wahba, Phil (October 6, 2009). "Blackstone-owned hospital staffing company files IPO". Reuters. 
^ Opalesque (26 February 2010). "Blackstone revenues in 2009 show strong bounce back from 2008". 
^ "Finance after the crisis: Survival of the richest". The Economist. The Economist Newspaper Limited. 396 (8696): 59. 21–27 August 2010. 
^ [2] Hedge Fund Industry Awards, The 8th Annual Hedge Fund Awards, Retrieved June 2011
^ Whitley, Angus; Saminather, Nichola (February 28, 2011). "Blackstone Said to Acquire Centro's U.S. Shopping Centers for $9.4 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ Nussbaum, Alex; Kelly, Jason (August 4, 2011). "Blackstone Group Agrees to Acquire Medical-Biller Emdeon for $3 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ De, Michael J. "The Blackstone Group News". New York Times. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Jolie O'Dell, VentureBeat. "Blackstone just backed out of its proposed Dell buyout." April 19, 2013. Retrieved on April 19, 2013.
^ Blackstone Announces Strategic Investment in ThoughtFocus Technologie. Wall Street Journal (2013-09-30). Retrieved on 2013-12-06.
^ Ryan, Dezember (April 24, 2014). "Bargain Bin Is Now Big Deal". WSJ. Retrieved 29 April 2014. 
^ Versace deal with Blackstone values group at 1 billion euros, Reuters, February 26, 2014
^ Zargani, Luisa (27 February 2014). "Versace Sells Minority Stake to Blackstone". Women's Wear Daily. Retrieved 27 February 2014. 
^ Vuong, Andy (April 20, 2014). "Blackstone grants $4 million to create Colorado entrepreneurs network". The Denver Post. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Arno Schuetze & Edward Taylor (May 15, 2014). "Deutsche Bank sells casino to Blackstone for $1.7 billion". Reuters. 
^ By David Carey, Bloomberg. "[3]." August 10, 2014. August 13, 2014.
^ Blackstone to sell prime Sydney property to Dalian Wanda for $327 million. Reuters, 26 January 2015
^ "Blackstone to buy Excel Trust for about $2 billion" (Press release). Reuters. 10 April 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to buy BioMed Realty in $8 billion deal". Reuters. 8 October 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to sell GCA Services to Thomas Lee, Goldman Sachs". Reuters. 16 November 2015. 
^ Brown, Eliot (24 November 2015). "Blackstone in Talks to Sell Four Los Angeles Office Towers". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2015-12-05. 
^ Jamerson, Joshua (February 10, 2017), Blackstone to Buy Aon’s Human Resources Outsourcing Platform for $4.3 Billion, New York City: The Wall Street Journal, retrieved February 12, 2017 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/uk-officegroup-m-a-blackstone-idUKKBN19A1J4
^ Stephanie Ruhle; Mary Childs; Julie Miecamp (22 October 2013). "Blackstone Unit Wins in No-Lose Codere Trade: Corporate Finance". Bloomberg News. 
^ a b Dan Primack (5 December 2013). "Blackstone responds to Jon Stewart". finance.fortune.cnn.com. 




David Carey, John E. Morris (2010). King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall, and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone.
The Making of a Wise Man. New York Times, November 28, 2004


External links[edit]

Official website







v
t
e


The Blackstone Group



Founders



Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman





Business Services



CMS Computers
RGIS
SunGard (minority shareholder)





Consumer/Retail



Michaels (Joint Control)
Performance Food Group
Pinnacle Foods
United Biscuits





Financial Services



BankUnited (minority stake)
HealthMarkets (minority stake)
FGIC (minority stake)





Healthcare



Biomet
Emcure Pharmaceuticals (investment)
Vanguard Health Systems





Industrial



Freescale (Joint Control)
Klöckner Pentaplast
TRW Automotive (Control)





Media/Telecommunications



eAccess (investment)
Nielsen Holdings (minority stake)
Axtel (minority stake)
Deutsche Telekom (minority stake)
TDC (minority stake)
The Weather Channel (minority stake)





Travel & Leisure



Hilton Worldwide
Center Parcs Europe (freehold)
Caesars Entertainment Corporation (minority stake)
Merlin Entertainments (minority stake)
SeaWorld Entertainment
Tragus Group
Travelport





Real estate



Extended Stay America (minority stake)
Equity Office
Luxury Resorts (LXR)
La Quinta Inns & Suites












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


The Weather Channel



Network information
and ownership



History
Landmark Communications (former)
NBCUniversal
Bain Capital
The Blackstone Group
List of meteorologists
International presence
Local on the 8s





Programs (list)





Live programs




AMHQ
PM Edition
Weather Center Live
Weather Geeks
Weather Underground
Weekend Recharge






Recorded programs




23.5° with Sam Champion
3 Scientists Walk Into a Bar
100 Biggest Weather Moments (2007 miniseries)
American Super/Natural
Fat Guys in the Woods
Highway Thru Hell
Natural Born Monsters
Prospectors
Raging Nature
Secrets of the Earth
So You Think You'd Survive?
Strangest Weather on Earth
Storm Stories
Tornado Alley
Weather Caught on Camera
Weather Gone Viral
Why Planes Crash








Weather Stars



III
4000
XL
IntelliStar





Related operations



Local Now
Weatherscan





Albums



The Best of Smooth Jazz
Smooth Jazz II










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=The_Blackstone_Group&oldid=788560248"					
Categories: Blackstone GroupCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies established in 1985Investment banks in the United StatesPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Good articlesPages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2011All articles containing potentially dated statements 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàDeutschEestiفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaTürkçe中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 03:13.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









The Blackstone Group - Wikipedia






















 







The Blackstone Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Blackstone Group)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Not to be confused with BlackRock Inc, an investment management firm.

The Blackstone Group L.P.





Type

Master limited partnership


Traded as
NYSE: BX


Industry
Financial services


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Founder
Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman


Headquarters
345 Park Avenue, Manhattan, New York City, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen A. Schwarzman
(Chairman and CEO)
Hamilton E. James
(President & COO)
J. Tomilson Hill
(Vice Chairman)
Jonathan D. Gray
(Global Head of Real estate)


Products
Private equity
Investment management
Asset management


Revenue
 US$ 7.484 billion (2014)



Net income

 US$ 1.584 billion (2014)


AUM
 US$ 311 billion (2015)[1][2]


Total assets
 US$ 31.510 billion (2014)



Number of employees

2,190 (2014)


Website
www.blackstone.com


The Blackstone Group L.P. is an American multinational private equity, alternative asset management and financial services firm based in New York City. As the largest alternative investment firm in the world,[3] Blackstone specializes in private equity, credit and hedge fund investment strategies.[4]
Blackstone's private equity business has been one of the largest investors in leveraged buyout transactions over the last decade, while its real estate business has actively acquired commercial real estate. Since its inception, Blackstone has completed investments in such notable companies as Hilton Worldwide, Merlin Entertainments Group, Performance Food Group, Equity Office Properties, Republic Services, AlliedBarton, United Biscuits, Freescale Semiconductor, Vivint,[5] and Travelport.[6]
Blackstone was founded in 1985 as a mergers and acquisitions boutique by Peter G. Peterson and Stephen A. Schwarzman, who had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. Over the course of two decades, Blackstone has evolved into one of the world's largest private equity investment firms.[3] In 2007, Blackstone completed a $4 billion initial public offering to become one of the first major private equity firms to list shares in its management company on a public exchange.[7][8] Blackstone is headquartered at 345 Park Avenue in Manhattan, New York City, with eight additional offices in the United States, as well as offices in London, Paris, Düsseldorf, Sydney, Tokyo, Hong Kong, Singapore, Beijing, Shanghai, Madrid, Mumbai, and Dubai.[9]



Contents


1 Business segments

1.1 Corporate private equity
1.2 Real estate
1.3 Marketable alternative asset management
1.4 Financial advisory services


2 History

2.1 Founding and early history
2.2 1990s
2.3 Early 2000s
2.4 Buyout boom (2005–2007)
2.5 Initial public offering in 2007
2.6 2008 to 2010
2.7 Investments since 2011


3 Self-dealing
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Business segments[edit]
Blackstone is organized into four business segments:[10]

Corporate private equity – Management of Blackstone's family of private equity funds investing in leveraged buyout transactions;
Investment Banking and Financial Advisory – Includes Blackstone's mergers and acquisitions advisory services, restructuring and reorganization advisory services, and fund placement services for alternative investment funds;
Marketable Alternative Asset Management – Management of Blackstone's funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, and closed-end mutual funds;
Real Estate – Management of Blackstone's family of real estate investment funds.

Corporate private equity[edit]
As of 2011[update], Blackstone is the world's fifth-largest private equity firm by committed capital, focusing primarily on leveraged buyouts of more mature companies.[7] The firm also invests through minority investments, corporate partnerships, and industry consolidations, and occasionally, start-up investments in new entrants into existing industries. The firm focuses on friendly investments in large capitalization companies.[10]
Blackstone's private equity business employs approximately 120 investment employees in New York City; London; Menlo Park, California; Mumbai; Hong Kong; and Beijing.[6]
Historically, Blackstone has primarily relied on private equity funds, pools of committed capital from pension funds, insurance companies, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investors.[11] As of the end of 2008, Blackstone had completed fundraising for six funds with total investor commitments of over $36 billion, including five traditional private equity fund and a separate fund focusing on telecommunications investments.
Below is a summary of Blackstone's private equity funds raised from its inception through the beginning of 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Capital Partners I
1987
$0.8


Blackstone Capital Partners II
1994
$1.27


Blackstone Capital Partners III
1997
$3.78


Blackstone Communications Partners I
2000
$2.02


Blackstone Capital Partners IV
2003
$6.45


Blackstone Capital Partners V
2006
$21.7


Blackstone Capital Partners VI
2010
$13.5


From 1987 to the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested approximately $20 billion in capital in 109 private equity transactions.[10]
Blackstone's most notable investments include Allied Waste,[13] AlliedBarton Security Services, Graham Packaging, Celanese, Nalco, HealthMarkets, Houghton Mifflin, American Axle, TRW Automotive, Catalent Pharma Solutions, Prime Hospitality, Legoland, Madame Tussauds,[14] Luxury Resorts (LXR), Pinnacle Foods, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Apria Healthcare, Travelport, The Weather Channel (United States) and The PortAventura Resort. In 2009 Blackstone purchased Busch Entertainment (comprising the Sea World Parks, Busch Garden Parks and the 2 water parks).[15]
In 2012, Blackstone acquired a controlling interest in Utah-based Vivint, Inc., a home automation, security, and energy company.[16]
Former notable investments include Universal Studios Parks, which was sold to Comcast.
Real estate[edit]
Blackstone began building its real estate investment business in 1992 with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses and has built it into a global operation with 122 investment professionals in the United States, Europe and Asia. The real estate business has raised approximately $28 billion for a variety of fund vehicles, including six US-focused funds and three International opportunity funds. Blackstone also raised a real estate special situations fund focusing on non-controlling debt and equity investment opportunities. The special situations fund invests directly in real estate as well as private and publicly traded real estate-related securities.[10][17]
The following is a summary of Blackstone's real estate funds raised from inception through November 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Real Estate Partners I
1994
$0.48


Blackstone Real Estate Partners II
1996
$1.3


Blackstone Real Estate Partners III
1999
$1.5


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe)
2001
€0.8


Blackstone Real Estate Partners IV
2003 (alt value 2004)[18]
$2.5 (alt value €6.7bn)[18]


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe) II
2006
€1.55


Blackstone Real Estate Partners V
2006
$5.25


Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI
2007
$10.9


Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations PE Fund
2008
$1.0


Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe III
2009
€3.1


From 1987 through the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested more than $13 billion in 212 real estate transactions and is a major owner of real estate throughout the US and Europe.[10] Blackstone's most notable real estate investments have included Equity Office Properties, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Trizec Properties, Center Parcs UK, La Quinta Inns & Suites, Motel 6, Wyndham Worldwide, Southern Cross Healthcare and Vicinity Centres.[19]
The purchase and subsequent profitable IPO of Southern Cross led to controversy in the UK. Part of the purchase involved splitting the business into a property company, NHP, and a care home business, which Blackstone claimed would become "the leading company in the elderly care market". In May 2011, Southern Cross, now independent, was almost bankrupt, jeopardising 31,000 elderly residents in 750 care homes. It denied blame, although Blackstone was widely accused in the media for selling on the company with an unsustainable business model and crippled with an impossible sale and leaseback strategy.[20][21]
After the subprime mortgage crisis, Blackstone Group LP has bought more than $5.5 billion single-family homes for rent, to be sold when the prices rise.[22]
Blackstone has agreed to sell a selection of Northern California office buildings for the sum of $3.5 billion, in the latest sale of real estate by the firm.[23]
Marketable alternative asset management[edit]
Main article: GSO Capital Partners
In 1990, Blackstone created a fund of hedge funds business to manage the internal assets for Blackstone and its senior managers. Over the years, this business evolved into Blackstone's marketable alternative asset management segment, which was opened to institutional investors. Among the investments included in this segment are funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, proprietary hedge funds and closed-end mutual funds.[10]
In March 2008, Blackstone acquired GSO Capital Partners, a credit-oriented alternative asset manager, for $620 million in cash and stock and up to $310 million through an earnout over the next five years based on certain earnings targets. The combination of Blackstone and GSO created one of the largest credit platforms in the alternative asset management business, with over $21 billion of total assets under management.[24] GSO was founded in 2005 by Bennett Goodman, Tripp Smith and Doug Ostrover. The GSO team had previously managed the leveraged finance businesses at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette and later Credit Suisse First Boston, after the acquisition of DLJ. Blackstone had existing relationships with the GSO team as an original investor in GSO's funds. Following the completion of the acquisition, Blackstone merged GSO's operations with its existing debt investment operations.[25][26]
Financial advisory services[edit]
Blackstone's financial advisory business is composed of three businesses:[10]

Corporate and Mergers and Acquisitions Advisory
Restructuring & Reorganization Advisory
Private Placement Advisory

Blackstone was founded by Peterson and Schwarzman in 1985 as a boutique investment banking firm that provides mergers and acquisitions advisory services. Among Blackstone's most notable corporate and mergers and acquisitions, advisory clients include Microsoft, Procter & Gamble, Verizon, Comcast, Sony and AIG.[27][28]
In 1991, with the collapse of the 1980s buyout boom, Blackstone began to offer advisory services in corporate restructurings as well. Blackstone's most notable restructuring clients have included General Motors[29] Xerox, Enron,[30] Bally Total Fitness and Global Crossing.
Blackstone's fund placement advisory group, The Park Hill Group, was formed in 2005 with a team of professionals from Atlantic-Pacific Capital and Credit Suisse. The group focuses on raising capital from institutional investors for private investment vehicles that invest in private equity, mezzanine, real estate, venture capital, and hedge funds.[31] Park Hill Group also provides secondary advisory services to investors seeking portfolio liquidity and unfunded commitment relief.[32]
In 2006 John Studzinski joined The Blackstone Group as the senior managing director in its investment and advisory group and as a member of the firm's executive committee.[33][34] He was recruited to oversee and develop Blackstone’s mergers-and-acquisitions advisory business, Blackstone Advisory Partners, in the United States and Europe, and to open an office in London.[34][35] His primary role as global head of Blackstone Advisory Partners was to oversee Blackstone's corporate M&A advisory services business in the U.S., and further develop the corporate M&A advisory business in Europe and Asia.[36][37] In early 2015, Blackstone began spinning off three of its divisions, including its M&A advisory group, to avoid any potential conflicts of interest with its primary private-equity business.[38][39][40] After assisting with the transition,[41] Studzinski became Vice Chairman of Investor Relations and Business Development at The Blackstone Group.[42][43] In this capacity, he holds responsibility for a number of sovereign and international institutional relationships, as well as ultra high-net-worth families outside the U.S.[42]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
The Blackstone Group was founded in 1985 by Peter G. Peterson & Stephen A. Schwarzman and Richard Bennett with $400,000 in seed capital.[44][45] The founders named their firm "Blackstone", which was a cryptogram derived from the names of the two founders (Schwarzman and Peterson): "Schwarz" is German for "black"; "Peter", or "Petra" in Greek, means "stone" or "rock".[46] The two founders had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. At Lehman, Schwarzman served as head of Lehman Brothers' global mergers and acquisitions business.[47] Prominent investment banker Roger C. Altman, another Lehman veteran, left his position as a managing director of Shearson Lehman Brothers to join Peterson and Schwarzman at Blackstone in 1987, but left in 1992 to join the Clinton Administration as Deputy Treasury Secretary.
Blackstone was originally formed as a mergers and acquisitions advisory boutique. Blackstone advised on the 1987 merger of investment banks E. F. Hutton & Co. and Shearson Lehman Brothers, collecting a $3.5 million fee.[48][49]




Blackstone co-founder Peter Peterson was former chairman of Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc.


From the outset in 1985, Schwarzman and Peterson planned to enter the private equity business, but had difficulty in raising their first fund because neither had ever led a leveraged buyout.[50] Blackstone finalized fundraising for its first private equity fund in the aftermath of the October 1987 stock market crash. After two years of providing strictly advisory services, Blackstone decided to pursue a merchant banking model after its founders determined that many situations required an investment partner rather than just an advisor. The largest investors in the first fund included Prudential Insurance Company, Nikko Securities and the General Motors pension fund.[51]
Blackstone also ventured into other businesses, most notably investment management. In 1987 Blackstone entered into a 50–50 partnership with the founders of BlackRock, Larry Fink and Ralph Schlosstein. The two founders, who had previously run the mortgage-backed securities divisions at First Boston and Lehman Brothers Kuhn Loeb, respectively, initially joined Blackstone to manage an investment fund and provide advice to financial institutions. They also planned to use a Blackstone fund to invest in financial institutions and help build an asset management business specializing in fixed income investments.[10][52]
As the business grew, Japanese bank Nikko Securities acquired a 20% interest in Blackstone for a $100 million investment in 1988 (valuing the firm at $500 million). Nikko's investment allowed for a major expansion of the firm and its investment activities.[53] The growth firm also recruited politician and investment banker David Stockman from Salomon Brothers in 1988. Stockman led many key deals in his time at the firm, but had a mixed record with his investments.[54] He left Blackstone in 1999 to start his own private equity firm, Heartland Industrial Partners, based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[55][56]
The firm advised CBS Corporation on its 1988 sale of CBS Records to Sony to form what would become Sony Music Entertainment.[57] In June 1989, Blackstone acquired freight railroad operator, CNW Corporation.[58] That same year, Blackstone partnered with Salomon Brothers to raise $600 million to acquire distressed thrifts in the midst of the savings and loan crisis.[59]
1990s[edit]




The Blackstone Group logo in use prior to the firm's rebranding as simply Blackstone


As the 1990s began, Blackstone continued its growth and expansion into new businesses. In 1990, Blackstone launched its fund of hedge funds business, initially intended to manage investments for Blackstone senior management. Also in 1990, Blackstone extended its ambitions to Europe, forming a partnership with J. O. Hambro Magan in the UK and Indosuez in France. In 1991, Blackstone created its Europe unit to enhance the firm's presence internationally.[60][61]
In 1991, Blackstone launched its real estate investment business with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses under the leadership of Henry Silverman. In 1990, Blackstone and Silverman acquired a 65% interest in Prime Motor Inn's Ramada and Howard Johnson franchises for $140 million, creating Hospitality Franchise Systems as a holding company.[62] In October 1991, Blackstone and Silverman added Days Inns of America for $250 million.[63] Then, in 1993, Hospitality Franchise Systems acquired Super 8 Motels for $125 million.[64] Silverman would ultimately leave Blackstone to serve as CEO of HFS, which would later become Cendant Corporation.
Blackstone made a number of notable investments in the early and mid-1990s, including Great Lakes Dredge and Dock Company (1991), Six Flags (1991), US Radio (1994), Centerplate (1995), MEGA Brands (1996). Also, in 1996, Blackstone partnered with the Loewen Group, the second largest funeral home and cemetery operator in North America, to acquire funeral home and cemetery businesses. The partnership's first acquisition was a $295 million buyout of Prime Succession from GTCR.[65][66][67]
Through the mid and late 1990s, Blackstone continued to grow. In 1997, Blackstone completed fundraising for its third private equity fund, with approximately $4 billion of investor commitments[68] and a $1.1 billion real estate investment fund.[69] In the following year, in 1998, Blackstone sold a 7% interest in its management company to AIG, replacing Nikko Securities as its largest investor and valuing Blackstone at $2.1 billion.[70] Then, in 1999, Blackstone launched its mezzanine capital business. Blackstone brought in five professionals, led by Howard Gellis from Nomura Holding America's Leveraged Capital Group to manage the business.[71]
Blackstone's investments in the late 1990s included AMF Group (1996), Haynes International (1997), American Axle (1997), Premcor (1997), CommNet Cellular (1998), Graham Packaging (1998), Centennial Communications (1999), Bresnan Communications (1999), PAETEC Holding Corp. (1999). Haynes and Republic Technologies International, a specialty steel maker in which Blackstone invested in 1996, both had problems and ultimately filed bankruptcy.[72]
Also, in 1997, Blackstone made its first investment in Allied Waste. Two years later, in 1999, Blackstone, together with Apollo Management provided capital for Allied Waste's acquisition of Browning-Ferris Industries in 1999 to create the second largest waste management company in the US. Blackstone's investment in Allied was one of its largest to that point in the firm's history.[13]
Its investments in telecommunications businesses—four cable TV systems in rural areas (TW Fanch 1 and 2, Bresnan Communications and Intermedia Partners IV) and a cell phone operator in the Rocky Mountain states (CommNet Cellular) were among the most successful of the era, generating $1.5 billion of profits for Blackstone's funds.[73]
Blackstone Real Estate Advisers, its real estate affiliate, bought the Watergate Complex in Washington D.C. in July 1998 for $39 million[74] and sold it to Monument Reality in August 2004.[75]
Early 2000s[edit]
Blackstone acquired the mortgage for 7 World Trade Center in October 2000 from the Teachers Insurance and Annuity Association.[76]




Schwarzman's Blackstone Group completed the first major IPO of a private equity firm in June 2007.[77]


In July 2002, Blackstone completed fundraising for a $6.45 billion private equity fund, Blackstone Capital Partners IV, the largest private equity fund ever raised to that point. More than $4 billion of the capital was raised by the end of 2001 and Blackstone was able to secure the remaining commitments despite adverse market conditions.[78]
With a significant amount of capital in its new fund, Blackstone was one of a handful of private equity investors capable of completing large transactions in the adverse conditions of the early 2000s recession. At the end of 2002, Blackstone, together with Thomas H. Lee Partners and Bain Capital, acquired Houghton Mifflin Company for $1.28 billion. The transaction represented one of the first large club deals, completed since the collapse of the Dot-com bubble.[79]
In 2002, Hamilton E. James joined global alternative asset manager Blackstone, where he currently serves as president and chief operating officer. He also serves on the firm's executive and management committees, and its board of directors.[80] In late 2002, Blackstone remained active acquiring TRW Automotive in a $4.7 billion buyout, the largest private equity deal announced that year (the deal was completed in early 2003). TRW's parent was acquired by Northrop Grumman, while Blackstone purchased its automotive parts business, a major supplier of automotive systems.[81][82] Blackstone also purchased a majority interest in Columbia House, a music buying club, in mid-2002.[83]
Blackstone made a significant investment in Financial Guaranty Insurance Company (FGIC), a monoline bond insurer alongside PMI Group, The Cypress Group and CIVC Partners. FGIC incurred heavy losses, along with other bond insurers in the 2008 credit crisis.[84]
Two years later, in 2005, Blackstone was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. Blackstone's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco at the end of the 1980s leveraged buyout boom. Also, at the time of its announcement, SunGard would be the largest buyout of a technology company in history, a distinction it would cede to the buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction is also notable in the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point.[85] The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[86][87]
In 2006, Blackstone launched its new long / short equity hedge fund business, Kailix Advisors. According to Blackstone, as of September 30, 2008, Kailix Advisors had $1.9 billion of assets under management. In December 2008, Blackstone announced that Kailix would be spun off to its management team to form a new fund as an independent entity backed by Blackstone.[26]
While Blackstone was active on the corporate investment side, it was also busy pursuing real estate investments. Blackstone acquired Prime Hospitality[88] and Extended Stay America in 2004. Blackstone followed these investments with the acquisition of La Quinta Inns & Suites in 2005. Blackstone's largest transaction, the buyout of Hilton Hotels Corporation occurred in 2007. Extended Stay Hotels was sold to The Lightstone Group in July 2007 and Prime Hospitality's Wellesley Inns were folded into La Quinta.[89] La Quinta Inns & Suites went public in 2014 and is now controlled by La Quinta Holdings as the parent organization.[90]
Buyout boom (2005–2007)[edit]
During the buyout boom of 2006 and 2007, Blackstone completed some of the largest leveraged buyouts. Blackstone's most notable transactions during this period included the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


TDC
2005
In December 2005, Blackstone together with a group of firms, including Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Permira, Apax Partners and Providence Equity Partners, acquired Tele-Denmark Communications. The firms acquired the former telecom monopoly in Denmark, under the banner Nordic Telephone Company (NTC) for approximately $11 billion.
[91]


Equity Office
2006
Blackstone completes the $37.7 billion acquisition of one of the largest owners of commercial office properties in the US. At the time of its announcement, the Equity Office buyout became the largest in history, surpassing the buyout of HCA. It would later be surpassed by KKR's buyout of TXU. Vornado Realty Trust bid against Blackstone, pushing up the final price.
[92][93]


Freescale Semiconductor
2006
A consortium led by Blackstone and including the Carlyle Group, Permira and the TPG Capital completed the $17.6 billion takeover of the semiconductor company. At the time of its announcement, Freescale would be the largest leveraged buyout of a technology company ever, surpassing the 2005 buyout of SunGard. The buyers were forced to pay an extra $800 million because KKR made a last minute bid as the original deal was about to be signed. Shortly after the deal closed in late 2006, cell phone sales at Motorola Corp., Freescale's former corporate parent and a major customer, began dropping sharply. In addition, in the recession of 2008–2009, Freescale's chip sales to automakers fell off, and the company came under great financial strain.
[94][95]


Michaels
2006
Blackstone, together with Bain Capital, acquired Michaels, the largest arts and crafts retailer in North America in a $6.0 billion leveraged buyout in October 2006. Bain and Blackstone narrowly beat out Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and TPG Capital in an auction for the company.
[96]


Nielsen Holdings
2006
Blackstone together with AlpInvest Partners, Carlyle Group, Hellman & Friedman, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and Thomas H. Lee Partners acquired the global information and media company formerly known as VNU.
[97][98][99]


Orangina[100]
2006
Blackstone, together with Lion Capital acquired Orangina, the bottler, distributor and franchisor of a number of carbonated and other soft drinks in Europe from Cadbury Schweppes for €1.85 billion
[101]


Travelport
2006
Travelport, the parent of the travel web site Orbitz.com, was acquired from Cendant by Blackstone and Technology Crossover Ventures in a deal valued at $4.3 billion. The sale of Travelport followed the spin-offs of Cendant's real estate and hospitality businesses, Realogy Corporation and Wyndham Worldwide Corporation, respectively, in July 2006. (Later in the year, TPG and Silver Lake would acquire Travelport's chief competitor Sabre Holdings.) Soon after the Travelport buyout, Travelport spun off part of its subsidiary Orbitz Worldwide in an IPO and bought a Travelport competitor, Worldspan.
[102][103][104]


United Biscuits
2006
In October 2006 Blackstone, together with PAI Partners announced the acquisition of the British biscuit producer. The deal was completed in December 2006.
[105][106]


RGIS Inventory Specialists
2007
In March 2007, RGIS announced that Blackstone Group purchased a controlling interest in the company, the terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
[107]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[108]


Hilton Worldwide
2007
Blackstone acquired the premium hotel operator for approximately $26 billion, representing a 25% premium to Hilton's all-time high stock price. The Hilton deal, announced on July 3, 2007 is often referred to as the deal that marked the "high water mark" and the beginning of the end of the multi-year boom in leveraged buyouts. The company restructured its debt in 2010.
[109][110][111]


Initial public offering in 2007[edit]
In 2004, Blackstone had explored the possibility of creating a business development company (BDC), Blackridge Investments, similar to vehicles pursued by Apollo Management.[112] However, Blackstone failed to raise capital through an initial public offering that summer, and the project was shelved.[113] It also planned to raise a fund on the Amsterdam stock exchange in 2006, but its rival, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., launched a $5 billion fund there that soaked up all demand for such funds, and Blackstone abandoned its project.[114]
By the summer of 2006, Blackstone had a more ambitious goal and secretly began laying the groundwork for an IPO of the firm itself, and managed to keep the project quiet for eight or nine months.[7][115] On March 22, 2007, Blackstone filed with the SEC[10] to raise $4 billion in an initial public offering. On June 3, 2007, Blackstone announced the acquisition of Alliant Insurance Services, Inc., one of the nation's largest insurance brokerage firms.[116] On June 21, Blackstone sold a 12.3% stake in its ownership for $4.13 billion in the largest U.S. IPO since 2002. Traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol BX, Blackstone priced at $31 per share on June 22, 2007.[8][117] In July 2007, less than two weeks after the Blackstone IPO, its rival private equity firm, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, filed with the SEC.[118] In October 2009, KKR listed its shares on the Euronext exchange and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange.[119]
2008 to 2010[edit]
Since the closure of the credit markets in 2007 and 2008, Blackstone has managed to close only a small number of sizable transactions. In January 2008, Blackstone made a small co-investment alongside TPG Capital and Apollo Management in their buyout of Harrah's Entertainment, although that transaction had been announced during the buyout boom period. Other notable investments that Blackstone completed in 2008 and 2009 included AlliedBarton, Performance Food Group,[120][121] Apria Healthcare and CMS Computers.
Among the firm's two largest investments since the buyout boom have been The Weather Channel and the announced acquisition of Busch Entertainment. In July 2008, Blackstone, together with NBC Universal and Bain Capital agreed to purchase The Weather Channel from Landmark Communications.[122][123] In October 2009, Anheuser-Busch InBev announced the sale of its Busch Entertainment Corporation theme parks division to Blackstone for $2.7 billion.[124][125] The Financial Times reported that Merlin Entertainments owned by Blackstone Group will file an IPO[126] in the 2nd quarter of 2010. Merlin will be listed on the London Stock Exchange. If true this would be the second of 8 reported IPOs Blackstone plans,[127] the first being Team Health Holdings, Inc.[128] Blackstone reported at the end of 2009 revenues of $1.8bln, compared to -$349mln revenues in 2008.[129] On August 13, 2010 Blackstone announced it would buy Dynegy, an energy firm, for nearly $5 billion.[130]
In 2010, Blackstone Alternative Asset Management, received Institutional Investor magazine's 8th Annual Hedge Fund Industry award for Large Fund of Hedge Funds of the Year.[131]
Investments since 2011[edit]

In February 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired 588 malls of Centro's U.S. shopping centers for $9.4 billion. Centro's Australian continues their operation independently.[132]
In August 2011 Blackstone Group LP bought Medical-Biller Emdeon Inc. for around $3 billion. Since Blackstone Group LP was the world's biggest private-equity firm, tender offer of Emdeon Inc. public company should be done with a cash payment of $19 a share, a 44 percent premium.[133]
In late 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired the German outdoor company Jack Wolfskin. Blackstone moved some of its accounting functions to India.
In 2012, Blackstone was part of a consortium that financed Knight Capital after a software glitch threatened Knight's ability to continue operations.
In October 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired G6 Hospitality better known as Motel 6 & Studio 6 motels for 1.9 billion.
In November 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired a controlling interest in Vivint, Vivint Solar, and 2GIG Technologies.[134]
In April 2013, the company confirmed that it backed out of the proposed Dell buyout.[135]
In September 2013, Blackstone announced a strategic investment in ThoughtFocus Technologies LLC, a leading IT Service provider. The investment will establish the 'Blackstone Center of Excellence', an IT outsourcing and offshore delivery center, to provide technology and other administrative service.[136]
In August 2013 Blackstone bought Strategic Partners, manager of secondaryfunds, from CreditSuisse, with which Blackstone is raising its 6th fund, targeting $4 billion.[137]
In February 2014, Blackstone purchased a 20 percent stake in the Italian luxury brand Versace for €150 million.[138][139]
In April 2014 Blackstone's charitable arm, the Blackstone Charitable Foundation, donated $4 million to create the Blackstone Entrepreneurs Network in Colorado. The program encourages increased collaboration among local business leaders with the goal of retaining high-growth companies in the state.[140]
In May 2014, Blackstone Group purchased the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas resort from Deutsche Bank for $1.73 billion.[141]
In August 2014, Blackstone Group was in advanced talks to acquire Royal Dutch Shell Plc (RDSA)'s 50 percent stake in a shale-gas field in Louisiana. Blackstone would pay about $1.2 billion for Shell’s half-interest in the Haynesville formation.[142]
In January 2015, Blackstone announced it would sell a Sydney-based office building to Dalian Wanda Group for around $327 million.[143]
In April 2015, Blackstone announced it would acquire Excel Trust Inc, a real estate investment trust, for around $2 billion.[144]
In October 2015, Blackstone agreed to purchase BioMed Realty Trust Inc for a sum of around $8 billion.[145]
In November 2015, Blackstone Group agreed to sell facility management firm GCA Services Group Inc to a consortium of Goldman Sachs’ private equity arm and Thomas H. Lee Partners.[146]
As of Q4 2015, the firm is in talks to sell of some of its trophy office assets in the Los Angeles market. Douglas Emmett Inc. is in advanced talks to purchase four buildings for more than $1 billion. The buildings total 1.7 million square feet and are located in the Westwood area.[147]
On February 10, 2017, Aon PLC agreed to sell its human resources outsourcing platform for $4.3 billion to Blackstone Group L.P., creating a new company.[148]
On June 19, 2017, Blackstone acquired the majority interest in The Office Group, valuing the whole company at $640 million.[149]

Self-dealing[edit]
In 2013, Bloomberg uncovered how the Blackstone Group was self-dealing after its affiliate GSO Capital Partners purchased debt and credit default swaps in Codere SA, a Spanish betting, online gambling and gaming company.[150]

In the first half of 2013, Blackstone GSO and another firm later purchased a €100 million bank loan (via secondary markets) that Codere already had on the books, and then convinced Codere to delay repayment on the debt related to the aforementioned credit default swaps. That delay triggered the CDS, resulting in upwards of $18.7 million in profit for GSO.[151]

The GSO director defended the move with "Codere (working with us...) had to trigger the credit default swaps, as it was the only way to compel certain bondholders to negotiate." and blamed credit default swap investors for their loss:

Unlike Blackstone, who invested directly into Codere, these financial investors [of hedge funds using credit default swaps] were not aligned with the interests of Codere, but instead through their use of credit default swaps, were betting on when the Company would default[...]having no interest in the outcome of the game.[151]

See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of outdoor industry parent companies
List of venture capital firms

References[edit]


^ Stephen Schwarzman speaks with Betty Liu and Erik Schatzke on "In the Loop" (April 16, 2015). Schwarzman Says Fundraising Environment Is 'Remarkable' (Television production). Bloomberg. Event occurs at 00:22 minutes in. Retrieved March 16, 2016. You've got assets now at three hundred billion dollars. 
^ "Blackstone Reports Third Quarter Results" (PDF). The Blackstone Group. January 31, 2013. Archived from the original (PDF) on October 30, 2014. 
^ a b Wiliam Alden (April 18, 2013). "Public Offering Values SeaWorld at $2.5 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 19, 2013. 
^ "The Blackstone Group". The New York Times. Retrieved 12 January 2016. 
^ Kim, Soyoung (September 19, 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 2013-03-23. 
^ a b Blackstone Group: Private Equity Archived February 4, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website). See also: Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website), Team (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20
^ a b c Blackstone Said to Prepare for I.P.O. New York Times, March 16, 2007
^ a b Anderson, Jenny. "Blackstone Founders Prepare to Count Their Billions." New York Times, June 12, 2007.
^ "Blackstone - Our Offices overview". Blackstone. 
^ a b c d e f g h i The Blackstone Group L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 22, 2007
^ New bosses, new rules. Los Angeles Times, August 12, 2007
^ a b Data collected from Preqin, a private equity database system
^ a b A trash hauler is buying a much bigger rival, a type of deal that makes Wall Street a bit nervous. New York Times, March 9, 1999
^ Equity Firm Attracted to Attractions. New York Times, March 6, 2007
^ Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Kim, Soyoung; Roumeliotis, Greg (9 September 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 4 January 2013. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Overview. (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 6, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ a b "Blackstone amasses more capital for latest Europe RE pool". AltAssets. 20 December 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-20. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Investment Portfolio ( at company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Alex Hawkes "Blackstone denies blame for Southern Cross's plight" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Nils Pratley "Was Southern Cross always sickly underneath?" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Karmin, Craig (August 12, 2013). "Blackstone to Buy Stakes in Apartment Complexes From GE Unit". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Alden, William (December 8, 2014). "Blackstone to Sell California Office Buildings for $3.5 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 2014-12-19. 
^ Blackstone to Buy GSO Capital. New York Times, January 10, 2008
^ Blackstone to Buy Hedge Fund to Strengthen Credit Operations. New York Times, January 11, 2008
^ a b Blackstone To Rationalize Single Manager Hedge Funds Businesses In Efficiency Move. Press Release, December 23, 2008
^ Schwarzman Unbowed. Bloomberg Markets, March 2009
^ Blackstone Financial Advisory: Selected Clients (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived February 16, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Moore, Heidi N. (December 12, 2008). "GM Hires Blackstone". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2008-12-12. 
^ "Blackstoin Restructuring & Reorganization: Selected Transactions". (Company website) Accessed 10/20/2012
^ Blackstone: Private Placement Advisory Overview (The Park Hill Group). Company website, Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Park Hill Group: About Us. Company website, Accessed 2011-1-26
^ Moyer, Liz. "Hitting A Brick Wall". Forbes. May 18, 2006.
^ a b "John Studzinski Joins Blackstone". The Blackstone Group. May 18, 2006.
^ Wachman, Richard. "Cracking the Studzinski code". The Observer. October 7, 2006.
^ John Studzinski CBE. FT Business of Luxury Summit, 30 May – 1 June 2012. Financial Times. 2012.
^ About John Studzinski. John Studzinski's blog.
^ "Blackstone to list advisory arm early 2015". Financial Times. October 2014.
^ Dezember, Ryan. "Blackstone Group to Spin Off Financial Advisory Business". Wall Street Journal. October 10, 2014.
^ Blackstone – History: 2014. Blackstone. Blackstone.com. Retrieved March 30, 2015.
^ Roumeliotis, Greg and Paritosh Bansal. "UPDATE 4-Blackstone gives up its roots in advisory unit spin-off". Reuters. October 10, 2014.
^ a b John Studzinski – Official profile, Blackstone.
^ "E.U. Estrangement Before The Divorce (a.k.a Volatility)". Fund Portfolio Management. January 23, 2015.
^ David Carey and John E. Morris, King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone (Crown 2010), pp. 45–56
^ Private equity power list: #1 The Blackstone Group. Fortune, July 2, 2007
^ Blackstone etymology. The Deal, June 26, 2007
^ Alden, William. "Blackstone's Chief Has a Warning for Wall Street's Entrepreneurs". DealBook. Retrieved 2017-01-27. 
^ Hutton-Shearson Deal Announced". New York Times, December 4, 1987.
^ "Hutton Sets Fees". New York Times, December 9, 1987
^ King of Capital, pp. 45-56
^ A Big Fund Ready to Capitalize on Hard Times. New York Times, November 13, 1987
^ "Mortgage Unit Leaders To Join Blackstone". New York Times, March 4, 1988
^ "Nikko Acquires 20% of Blackstone Group". New York Times, December 13, 1988
^ King of Capital, pp. 144–147
^ "Stockman Forming Own Buyout Concern". New York Times, September 17, 1999
^ "Stockman Is Charged With Fraud". New York Times, March 27, 2007
^ "Sony and CBS Records: What a Romance!". New York Times, September 18, 1988
^ "CNW Accepts Buyout Bid From Blackstone Group". New York Times, June 7, 1989
^ "2 Wall Street Firms Join To Buy Savings Units". New York Times, May 12, 1989
^ U.S. Mergers Firm Is Forming British Link. New York Times, April 23, 1990
^ Chairman Is Named For Blackstone Unit. New York Times, April 5, 1991
^ Prime to Sell Interest in Inns to Blackstone. New York Times, May 24, 1990
^ Blackstone Unit to Buy Days Inns. New York Times, October 1, 1991
^ Hospitality to Acquire Super 8 Motels. New York Times, February 17, 1993
^ The Loewen Group and Blackstone Capital Partners form corporate venture to acquire Prime Succession. Business Wire, June 17, 1996. Accessed 2009-02-20.
^ Loewen And Blackstone To Make Joint Purchase. New York Times, June 18, 1996
^ Loewen Buys Big Cemetery, And Its Suitor Criticizes Deal. New York Times, September 21, 1996
^ Blackstone Raises $4 Billion for Fund. New York Times, October 10, 1997
^ Red-Hot Revival in Real Estate; Overheating Is Feared With Surge in Vulture Investing. New York Times, November 6, 1997
^ A.I.G. Will Put $1.35 Billion Into Blackstone. New York Times, July 31, 1998
^ Blackstone to Form a New Financing Unit. New York Times, April 8, 1999
^ King of Capital, pp. 145-146
^ King of Capital, pp. 148–155
^ Cube, Christine (Nov 25, 2002). "Watergate Hotel For Sale". Washington Business Journal. 
^ Staff Report (Aug 19, 2004). "Monument Realty Buys Watergate Hotel". Commercial Real Estate Direct. 
^ "Blackstone Acquires Debt on 7 World Trade Center". Business Wire. October 17, 2000. 
^ Photographed at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland in January 2008.
^ Blackstone Amasses a Record Equity Fund. New York Times, July 17, 2002
^ Vivendi Finishes Sale of Houghton Mifflin To Investors. New York Times, January 1, 2003
^ Sender, Henny. "At Blackstone, James Builds A Following". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 March 2007. 
^ King of Capital, pp. 176, 197, 206-207
^ Blackstone Group May Purchase Auto Parts Business From TRW. New York Times, November 13, 2002
^ Blackstone Buys Majority Stake in Columbia House. New York Times, May 15, 2002
^ A Split-Up of Insurers of Bonds Is Considered. New York Times, February 16, 2008
^ King of Capital, p. 225
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal." Bloomberg L.P., March 29, 2005
^ Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?. New York Times, April 3, 2005
^ The Blackstone Group to Acquire Prime Hospitality Corp. Press Release, August 18, 2004. Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived March 8, 2005, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Private-Equity Firm Sees Room for Value in Hotels. Wall Street Journal, August 17, 2005
^ http://ir.lq.com/Cache/1500058950.PDF?Y=&O=PDF&D=&FID=1500058950&T=&IID=4424891
^ Equity Firms Buy Danish Phone Company. New York Times, December 1, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 239–254
^ Blackstone's Bid for Equity Office Prevails New York Times, February 8, 2007
^ King of Capital, 231-235
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Flynn, Laurie J. "Blackstone Alliance to Buy Chip Maker for $17.6 Billion." New York Times, September 16, 2006
^ Consortium Buys Michaels for $6 Billion. New York Times, July 1, 2006
^ VNU Shareholders Reject $8.9 Bln Offer From KKR Group. Bloomberg, March 8, 2006
^ Buyout Bid For Parent Of Nielsen. New York Times, January 17, 2006
^ VNU Agrees To Public Offer From Private Equity Group. Press Release, March 8, 2006
^ "Company News Headlines". NASDAQ.com. June 2, 2011. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Cadbury Sells Beverage Unit to Two Firms. New York Times, November 22, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 314-318
^ Sachdev, Ameet. " Orbitz travels to 4th owner: Blackstone Group to buy from Cendant.", Chicago Tribune, July 1, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Fineman, Josh. "Cendant to sell Orbitz to Blackstone for $4.3 Bln", Bloomberg.com, June 30, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Parkinson, Gary (October 26, 2006). "Private-equity companies snap up United Biscuits in a £1.6bn deal". The Independent. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ "Blackstone and PAI complete purchase of UB" (Press release). United Biscuits. December 15, 2006. Archived from the original on September 27, 2007. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ [1]. RGIS Press Release, March, 21st 2007
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer." New York Times, June 8, 2007.
^ Blackstone to Buy Hilton Hotels for $26 Billion. New York Times, July 4, 2007
^ High-Water Mark. New York Times, July 4, 2008
^ King of Capital, pp. 299–300
^ Private Firms Use Closed-End Funds to Tap the Market. New York Times, April 17, 2004
^ Blackstone Group Postpones Fund Offering. New York Times, July 16, 2004
^ King of Capital, pp. 221–223
^ King of Capital, pp. 255–267
^ Alliant Insurance Services, Inc. to be acquired by Blackstone and Management, June 3, 2007 Archived March 4, 2016, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and de la Merced, Michael J. "News Analysis Behind the Veil at Blackstone? Probably Another Veil." New York Times, March 19, 2007.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ KKR lists on Euronext; NYSE is next. Reuters, October 1, 2009[dead link]
^ Equity Firms Acquiring Food Supplier. Bloomberg, January 19, 2008
^ Blackstone, Wellspring to acquire Performance Food Group in $1.3bn deal. AltAssets, January 18, 2008 Archived June 11, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Michael J. de la Merced (July 7, 2008). "Weather Channel Is Sold to NBC and Equity Firms". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-09-17. 
^ Robert Marich. "The Weather Channel Sale Wraps". Broadcasting & Cable. Archived from the original on September 15, 2008. Retrieved 2008-09-26. 
^ Blackstone to buy A-B InBev's theme parks for $2.7 billion. MarketWatch, Oct. 7, 2009
^ InBev may sell US theme parks. Boston Globe, July 16, 2008[dead link]
^ "Blackstone's Merlin Entertainment to Go Public in '10, FT Says". Bloomberg. October 23, 2009. 
^ "Blackstone plans portfolio IPOs: source". Reuters. October 12, 2009. 
^ Wahba, Phil (October 6, 2009). "Blackstone-owned hospital staffing company files IPO". Reuters. 
^ Opalesque (26 February 2010). "Blackstone revenues in 2009 show strong bounce back from 2008". 
^ "Finance after the crisis: Survival of the richest". The Economist. The Economist Newspaper Limited. 396 (8696): 59. 21–27 August 2010. 
^ [2] Hedge Fund Industry Awards, The 8th Annual Hedge Fund Awards, Retrieved June 2011
^ Whitley, Angus; Saminather, Nichola (February 28, 2011). "Blackstone Said to Acquire Centro's U.S. Shopping Centers for $9.4 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ Nussbaum, Alex; Kelly, Jason (August 4, 2011). "Blackstone Group Agrees to Acquire Medical-Biller Emdeon for $3 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ De, Michael J. "The Blackstone Group News". New York Times. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Jolie O'Dell, VentureBeat. "Blackstone just backed out of its proposed Dell buyout." April 19, 2013. Retrieved on April 19, 2013.
^ Blackstone Announces Strategic Investment in ThoughtFocus Technologie. Wall Street Journal (2013-09-30). Retrieved on 2013-12-06.
^ Ryan, Dezember (April 24, 2014). "Bargain Bin Is Now Big Deal". WSJ. Retrieved 29 April 2014. 
^ Versace deal with Blackstone values group at 1 billion euros, Reuters, February 26, 2014
^ Zargani, Luisa (27 February 2014). "Versace Sells Minority Stake to Blackstone". Women's Wear Daily. Retrieved 27 February 2014. 
^ Vuong, Andy (April 20, 2014). "Blackstone grants $4 million to create Colorado entrepreneurs network". The Denver Post. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Arno Schuetze & Edward Taylor (May 15, 2014). "Deutsche Bank sells casino to Blackstone for $1.7 billion". Reuters. 
^ By David Carey, Bloomberg. "[3]." August 10, 2014. August 13, 2014.
^ Blackstone to sell prime Sydney property to Dalian Wanda for $327 million. Reuters, 26 January 2015
^ "Blackstone to buy Excel Trust for about $2 billion" (Press release). Reuters. 10 April 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to buy BioMed Realty in $8 billion deal". Reuters. 8 October 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to sell GCA Services to Thomas Lee, Goldman Sachs". Reuters. 16 November 2015. 
^ Brown, Eliot (24 November 2015). "Blackstone in Talks to Sell Four Los Angeles Office Towers". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2015-12-05. 
^ Jamerson, Joshua (February 10, 2017), Blackstone to Buy Aon’s Human Resources Outsourcing Platform for $4.3 Billion, New York City: The Wall Street Journal, retrieved February 12, 2017 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/uk-officegroup-m-a-blackstone-idUKKBN19A1J4
^ Stephanie Ruhle; Mary Childs; Julie Miecamp (22 October 2013). "Blackstone Unit Wins in No-Lose Codere Trade: Corporate Finance". Bloomberg News. 
^ a b Dan Primack (5 December 2013). "Blackstone responds to Jon Stewart". finance.fortune.cnn.com. 




David Carey, John E. Morris (2010). King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall, and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone.
The Making of a Wise Man. New York Times, November 28, 2004


External links[edit]

Official website







v
t
e


The Blackstone Group



Founders



Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman





Business Services



CMS Computers
RGIS
SunGard (minority shareholder)





Consumer/Retail



Michaels (Joint Control)
Performance Food Group
Pinnacle Foods
United Biscuits





Financial Services



BankUnited (minority stake)
HealthMarkets (minority stake)
FGIC (minority stake)





Healthcare



Biomet
Emcure Pharmaceuticals (investment)
Vanguard Health Systems





Industrial



Freescale (Joint Control)
Klöckner Pentaplast
TRW Automotive (Control)





Media/Telecommunications



eAccess (investment)
Nielsen Holdings (minority stake)
Axtel (minority stake)
Deutsche Telekom (minority stake)
TDC (minority stake)
The Weather Channel (minority stake)





Travel & Leisure



Hilton Worldwide
Center Parcs Europe (freehold)
Caesars Entertainment Corporation (minority stake)
Merlin Entertainments (minority stake)
SeaWorld Entertainment
Tragus Group
Travelport





Real estate



Extended Stay America (minority stake)
Equity Office
Luxury Resorts (LXR)
La Quinta Inns & Suites












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


The Weather Channel



Network information
and ownership



History
Landmark Communications (former)
NBCUniversal
Bain Capital
The Blackstone Group
List of meteorologists
International presence
Local on the 8s





Programs (list)





Live programs




AMHQ
PM Edition
Weather Center Live
Weather Geeks
Weather Underground
Weekend Recharge






Recorded programs




23.5° with Sam Champion
3 Scientists Walk Into a Bar
100 Biggest Weather Moments (2007 miniseries)
American Super/Natural
Fat Guys in the Woods
Highway Thru Hell
Natural Born Monsters
Prospectors
Raging Nature
Secrets of the Earth
So You Think You'd Survive?
Strangest Weather on Earth
Storm Stories
Tornado Alley
Weather Caught on Camera
Weather Gone Viral
Why Planes Crash








Weather Stars



III
4000
XL
IntelliStar





Related operations



Local Now
Weatherscan





Albums



The Best of Smooth Jazz
Smooth Jazz II










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=The_Blackstone_Group&oldid=788560248"					
Categories: Blackstone GroupCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies established in 1985Investment banks in the United StatesPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Good articlesPages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2011All articles containing potentially dated statements 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàDeutschEestiفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaTürkçe中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 03:13.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









The Blackstone Group - Wikipedia






















 







The Blackstone Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Blackstone Group)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Not to be confused with BlackRock Inc, an investment management firm.

The Blackstone Group L.P.





Type

Master limited partnership


Traded as
NYSE: BX


Industry
Financial services


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Founder
Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman


Headquarters
345 Park Avenue, Manhattan, New York City, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen A. Schwarzman
(Chairman and CEO)
Hamilton E. James
(President & COO)
J. Tomilson Hill
(Vice Chairman)
Jonathan D. Gray
(Global Head of Real estate)


Products
Private equity
Investment management
Asset management


Revenue
 US$ 7.484 billion (2014)



Net income

 US$ 1.584 billion (2014)


AUM
 US$ 311 billion (2015)[1][2]


Total assets
 US$ 31.510 billion (2014)



Number of employees

2,190 (2014)


Website
www.blackstone.com


The Blackstone Group L.P. is an American multinational private equity, alternative asset management and financial services firm based in New York City. As the largest alternative investment firm in the world,[3] Blackstone specializes in private equity, credit and hedge fund investment strategies.[4]
Blackstone's private equity business has been one of the largest investors in leveraged buyout transactions over the last decade, while its real estate business has actively acquired commercial real estate. Since its inception, Blackstone has completed investments in such notable companies as Hilton Worldwide, Merlin Entertainments Group, Performance Food Group, Equity Office Properties, Republic Services, AlliedBarton, United Biscuits, Freescale Semiconductor, Vivint,[5] and Travelport.[6]
Blackstone was founded in 1985 as a mergers and acquisitions boutique by Peter G. Peterson and Stephen A. Schwarzman, who had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. Over the course of two decades, Blackstone has evolved into one of the world's largest private equity investment firms.[3] In 2007, Blackstone completed a $4 billion initial public offering to become one of the first major private equity firms to list shares in its management company on a public exchange.[7][8] Blackstone is headquartered at 345 Park Avenue in Manhattan, New York City, with eight additional offices in the United States, as well as offices in London, Paris, Düsseldorf, Sydney, Tokyo, Hong Kong, Singapore, Beijing, Shanghai, Madrid, Mumbai, and Dubai.[9]



Contents


1 Business segments

1.1 Corporate private equity
1.2 Real estate
1.3 Marketable alternative asset management
1.4 Financial advisory services


2 History

2.1 Founding and early history
2.2 1990s
2.3 Early 2000s
2.4 Buyout boom (2005–2007)
2.5 Initial public offering in 2007
2.6 2008 to 2010
2.7 Investments since 2011


3 Self-dealing
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Business segments[edit]
Blackstone is organized into four business segments:[10]

Corporate private equity – Management of Blackstone's family of private equity funds investing in leveraged buyout transactions;
Investment Banking and Financial Advisory – Includes Blackstone's mergers and acquisitions advisory services, restructuring and reorganization advisory services, and fund placement services for alternative investment funds;
Marketable Alternative Asset Management – Management of Blackstone's funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, and closed-end mutual funds;
Real Estate – Management of Blackstone's family of real estate investment funds.

Corporate private equity[edit]
As of 2011[update], Blackstone is the world's fifth-largest private equity firm by committed capital, focusing primarily on leveraged buyouts of more mature companies.[7] The firm also invests through minority investments, corporate partnerships, and industry consolidations, and occasionally, start-up investments in new entrants into existing industries. The firm focuses on friendly investments in large capitalization companies.[10]
Blackstone's private equity business employs approximately 120 investment employees in New York City; London; Menlo Park, California; Mumbai; Hong Kong; and Beijing.[6]
Historically, Blackstone has primarily relied on private equity funds, pools of committed capital from pension funds, insurance companies, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investors.[11] As of the end of 2008, Blackstone had completed fundraising for six funds with total investor commitments of over $36 billion, including five traditional private equity fund and a separate fund focusing on telecommunications investments.
Below is a summary of Blackstone's private equity funds raised from its inception through the beginning of 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Capital Partners I
1987
$0.8


Blackstone Capital Partners II
1994
$1.27


Blackstone Capital Partners III
1997
$3.78


Blackstone Communications Partners I
2000
$2.02


Blackstone Capital Partners IV
2003
$6.45


Blackstone Capital Partners V
2006
$21.7


Blackstone Capital Partners VI
2010
$13.5


From 1987 to the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested approximately $20 billion in capital in 109 private equity transactions.[10]
Blackstone's most notable investments include Allied Waste,[13] AlliedBarton Security Services, Graham Packaging, Celanese, Nalco, HealthMarkets, Houghton Mifflin, American Axle, TRW Automotive, Catalent Pharma Solutions, Prime Hospitality, Legoland, Madame Tussauds,[14] Luxury Resorts (LXR), Pinnacle Foods, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Apria Healthcare, Travelport, The Weather Channel (United States) and The PortAventura Resort. In 2009 Blackstone purchased Busch Entertainment (comprising the Sea World Parks, Busch Garden Parks and the 2 water parks).[15]
In 2012, Blackstone acquired a controlling interest in Utah-based Vivint, Inc., a home automation, security, and energy company.[16]
Former notable investments include Universal Studios Parks, which was sold to Comcast.
Real estate[edit]
Blackstone began building its real estate investment business in 1992 with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses and has built it into a global operation with 122 investment professionals in the United States, Europe and Asia. The real estate business has raised approximately $28 billion for a variety of fund vehicles, including six US-focused funds and three International opportunity funds. Blackstone also raised a real estate special situations fund focusing on non-controlling debt and equity investment opportunities. The special situations fund invests directly in real estate as well as private and publicly traded real estate-related securities.[10][17]
The following is a summary of Blackstone's real estate funds raised from inception through November 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Real Estate Partners I
1994
$0.48


Blackstone Real Estate Partners II
1996
$1.3


Blackstone Real Estate Partners III
1999
$1.5


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe)
2001
€0.8


Blackstone Real Estate Partners IV
2003 (alt value 2004)[18]
$2.5 (alt value €6.7bn)[18]


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe) II
2006
€1.55


Blackstone Real Estate Partners V
2006
$5.25


Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI
2007
$10.9


Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations PE Fund
2008
$1.0


Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe III
2009
€3.1


From 1987 through the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested more than $13 billion in 212 real estate transactions and is a major owner of real estate throughout the US and Europe.[10] Blackstone's most notable real estate investments have included Equity Office Properties, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Trizec Properties, Center Parcs UK, La Quinta Inns & Suites, Motel 6, Wyndham Worldwide, Southern Cross Healthcare and Vicinity Centres.[19]
The purchase and subsequent profitable IPO of Southern Cross led to controversy in the UK. Part of the purchase involved splitting the business into a property company, NHP, and a care home business, which Blackstone claimed would become "the leading company in the elderly care market". In May 2011, Southern Cross, now independent, was almost bankrupt, jeopardising 31,000 elderly residents in 750 care homes. It denied blame, although Blackstone was widely accused in the media for selling on the company with an unsustainable business model and crippled with an impossible sale and leaseback strategy.[20][21]
After the subprime mortgage crisis, Blackstone Group LP has bought more than $5.5 billion single-family homes for rent, to be sold when the prices rise.[22]
Blackstone has agreed to sell a selection of Northern California office buildings for the sum of $3.5 billion, in the latest sale of real estate by the firm.[23]
Marketable alternative asset management[edit]
Main article: GSO Capital Partners
In 1990, Blackstone created a fund of hedge funds business to manage the internal assets for Blackstone and its senior managers. Over the years, this business evolved into Blackstone's marketable alternative asset management segment, which was opened to institutional investors. Among the investments included in this segment are funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, proprietary hedge funds and closed-end mutual funds.[10]
In March 2008, Blackstone acquired GSO Capital Partners, a credit-oriented alternative asset manager, for $620 million in cash and stock and up to $310 million through an earnout over the next five years based on certain earnings targets. The combination of Blackstone and GSO created one of the largest credit platforms in the alternative asset management business, with over $21 billion of total assets under management.[24] GSO was founded in 2005 by Bennett Goodman, Tripp Smith and Doug Ostrover. The GSO team had previously managed the leveraged finance businesses at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette and later Credit Suisse First Boston, after the acquisition of DLJ. Blackstone had existing relationships with the GSO team as an original investor in GSO's funds. Following the completion of the acquisition, Blackstone merged GSO's operations with its existing debt investment operations.[25][26]
Financial advisory services[edit]
Blackstone's financial advisory business is composed of three businesses:[10]

Corporate and Mergers and Acquisitions Advisory
Restructuring & Reorganization Advisory
Private Placement Advisory

Blackstone was founded by Peterson and Schwarzman in 1985 as a boutique investment banking firm that provides mergers and acquisitions advisory services. Among Blackstone's most notable corporate and mergers and acquisitions, advisory clients include Microsoft, Procter & Gamble, Verizon, Comcast, Sony and AIG.[27][28]
In 1991, with the collapse of the 1980s buyout boom, Blackstone began to offer advisory services in corporate restructurings as well. Blackstone's most notable restructuring clients have included General Motors[29] Xerox, Enron,[30] Bally Total Fitness and Global Crossing.
Blackstone's fund placement advisory group, The Park Hill Group, was formed in 2005 with a team of professionals from Atlantic-Pacific Capital and Credit Suisse. The group focuses on raising capital from institutional investors for private investment vehicles that invest in private equity, mezzanine, real estate, venture capital, and hedge funds.[31] Park Hill Group also provides secondary advisory services to investors seeking portfolio liquidity and unfunded commitment relief.[32]
In 2006 John Studzinski joined The Blackstone Group as the senior managing director in its investment and advisory group and as a member of the firm's executive committee.[33][34] He was recruited to oversee and develop Blackstone’s mergers-and-acquisitions advisory business, Blackstone Advisory Partners, in the United States and Europe, and to open an office in London.[34][35] His primary role as global head of Blackstone Advisory Partners was to oversee Blackstone's corporate M&A advisory services business in the U.S., and further develop the corporate M&A advisory business in Europe and Asia.[36][37] In early 2015, Blackstone began spinning off three of its divisions, including its M&A advisory group, to avoid any potential conflicts of interest with its primary private-equity business.[38][39][40] After assisting with the transition,[41] Studzinski became Vice Chairman of Investor Relations and Business Development at The Blackstone Group.[42][43] In this capacity, he holds responsibility for a number of sovereign and international institutional relationships, as well as ultra high-net-worth families outside the U.S.[42]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
The Blackstone Group was founded in 1985 by Peter G. Peterson & Stephen A. Schwarzman and Richard Bennett with $400,000 in seed capital.[44][45] The founders named their firm "Blackstone", which was a cryptogram derived from the names of the two founders (Schwarzman and Peterson): "Schwarz" is German for "black"; "Peter", or "Petra" in Greek, means "stone" or "rock".[46] The two founders had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. At Lehman, Schwarzman served as head of Lehman Brothers' global mergers and acquisitions business.[47] Prominent investment banker Roger C. Altman, another Lehman veteran, left his position as a managing director of Shearson Lehman Brothers to join Peterson and Schwarzman at Blackstone in 1987, but left in 1992 to join the Clinton Administration as Deputy Treasury Secretary.
Blackstone was originally formed as a mergers and acquisitions advisory boutique. Blackstone advised on the 1987 merger of investment banks E. F. Hutton & Co. and Shearson Lehman Brothers, collecting a $3.5 million fee.[48][49]




Blackstone co-founder Peter Peterson was former chairman of Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc.


From the outset in 1985, Schwarzman and Peterson planned to enter the private equity business, but had difficulty in raising their first fund because neither had ever led a leveraged buyout.[50] Blackstone finalized fundraising for its first private equity fund in the aftermath of the October 1987 stock market crash. After two years of providing strictly advisory services, Blackstone decided to pursue a merchant banking model after its founders determined that many situations required an investment partner rather than just an advisor. The largest investors in the first fund included Prudential Insurance Company, Nikko Securities and the General Motors pension fund.[51]
Blackstone also ventured into other businesses, most notably investment management. In 1987 Blackstone entered into a 50–50 partnership with the founders of BlackRock, Larry Fink and Ralph Schlosstein. The two founders, who had previously run the mortgage-backed securities divisions at First Boston and Lehman Brothers Kuhn Loeb, respectively, initially joined Blackstone to manage an investment fund and provide advice to financial institutions. They also planned to use a Blackstone fund to invest in financial institutions and help build an asset management business specializing in fixed income investments.[10][52]
As the business grew, Japanese bank Nikko Securities acquired a 20% interest in Blackstone for a $100 million investment in 1988 (valuing the firm at $500 million). Nikko's investment allowed for a major expansion of the firm and its investment activities.[53] The growth firm also recruited politician and investment banker David Stockman from Salomon Brothers in 1988. Stockman led many key deals in his time at the firm, but had a mixed record with his investments.[54] He left Blackstone in 1999 to start his own private equity firm, Heartland Industrial Partners, based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[55][56]
The firm advised CBS Corporation on its 1988 sale of CBS Records to Sony to form what would become Sony Music Entertainment.[57] In June 1989, Blackstone acquired freight railroad operator, CNW Corporation.[58] That same year, Blackstone partnered with Salomon Brothers to raise $600 million to acquire distressed thrifts in the midst of the savings and loan crisis.[59]
1990s[edit]




The Blackstone Group logo in use prior to the firm's rebranding as simply Blackstone


As the 1990s began, Blackstone continued its growth and expansion into new businesses. In 1990, Blackstone launched its fund of hedge funds business, initially intended to manage investments for Blackstone senior management. Also in 1990, Blackstone extended its ambitions to Europe, forming a partnership with J. O. Hambro Magan in the UK and Indosuez in France. In 1991, Blackstone created its Europe unit to enhance the firm's presence internationally.[60][61]
In 1991, Blackstone launched its real estate investment business with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses under the leadership of Henry Silverman. In 1990, Blackstone and Silverman acquired a 65% interest in Prime Motor Inn's Ramada and Howard Johnson franchises for $140 million, creating Hospitality Franchise Systems as a holding company.[62] In October 1991, Blackstone and Silverman added Days Inns of America for $250 million.[63] Then, in 1993, Hospitality Franchise Systems acquired Super 8 Motels for $125 million.[64] Silverman would ultimately leave Blackstone to serve as CEO of HFS, which would later become Cendant Corporation.
Blackstone made a number of notable investments in the early and mid-1990s, including Great Lakes Dredge and Dock Company (1991), Six Flags (1991), US Radio (1994), Centerplate (1995), MEGA Brands (1996). Also, in 1996, Blackstone partnered with the Loewen Group, the second largest funeral home and cemetery operator in North America, to acquire funeral home and cemetery businesses. The partnership's first acquisition was a $295 million buyout of Prime Succession from GTCR.[65][66][67]
Through the mid and late 1990s, Blackstone continued to grow. In 1997, Blackstone completed fundraising for its third private equity fund, with approximately $4 billion of investor commitments[68] and a $1.1 billion real estate investment fund.[69] In the following year, in 1998, Blackstone sold a 7% interest in its management company to AIG, replacing Nikko Securities as its largest investor and valuing Blackstone at $2.1 billion.[70] Then, in 1999, Blackstone launched its mezzanine capital business. Blackstone brought in five professionals, led by Howard Gellis from Nomura Holding America's Leveraged Capital Group to manage the business.[71]
Blackstone's investments in the late 1990s included AMF Group (1996), Haynes International (1997), American Axle (1997), Premcor (1997), CommNet Cellular (1998), Graham Packaging (1998), Centennial Communications (1999), Bresnan Communications (1999), PAETEC Holding Corp. (1999). Haynes and Republic Technologies International, a specialty steel maker in which Blackstone invested in 1996, both had problems and ultimately filed bankruptcy.[72]
Also, in 1997, Blackstone made its first investment in Allied Waste. Two years later, in 1999, Blackstone, together with Apollo Management provided capital for Allied Waste's acquisition of Browning-Ferris Industries in 1999 to create the second largest waste management company in the US. Blackstone's investment in Allied was one of its largest to that point in the firm's history.[13]
Its investments in telecommunications businesses—four cable TV systems in rural areas (TW Fanch 1 and 2, Bresnan Communications and Intermedia Partners IV) and a cell phone operator in the Rocky Mountain states (CommNet Cellular) were among the most successful of the era, generating $1.5 billion of profits for Blackstone's funds.[73]
Blackstone Real Estate Advisers, its real estate affiliate, bought the Watergate Complex in Washington D.C. in July 1998 for $39 million[74] and sold it to Monument Reality in August 2004.[75]
Early 2000s[edit]
Blackstone acquired the mortgage for 7 World Trade Center in October 2000 from the Teachers Insurance and Annuity Association.[76]




Schwarzman's Blackstone Group completed the first major IPO of a private equity firm in June 2007.[77]


In July 2002, Blackstone completed fundraising for a $6.45 billion private equity fund, Blackstone Capital Partners IV, the largest private equity fund ever raised to that point. More than $4 billion of the capital was raised by the end of 2001 and Blackstone was able to secure the remaining commitments despite adverse market conditions.[78]
With a significant amount of capital in its new fund, Blackstone was one of a handful of private equity investors capable of completing large transactions in the adverse conditions of the early 2000s recession. At the end of 2002, Blackstone, together with Thomas H. Lee Partners and Bain Capital, acquired Houghton Mifflin Company for $1.28 billion. The transaction represented one of the first large club deals, completed since the collapse of the Dot-com bubble.[79]
In 2002, Hamilton E. James joined global alternative asset manager Blackstone, where he currently serves as president and chief operating officer. He also serves on the firm's executive and management committees, and its board of directors.[80] In late 2002, Blackstone remained active acquiring TRW Automotive in a $4.7 billion buyout, the largest private equity deal announced that year (the deal was completed in early 2003). TRW's parent was acquired by Northrop Grumman, while Blackstone purchased its automotive parts business, a major supplier of automotive systems.[81][82] Blackstone also purchased a majority interest in Columbia House, a music buying club, in mid-2002.[83]
Blackstone made a significant investment in Financial Guaranty Insurance Company (FGIC), a monoline bond insurer alongside PMI Group, The Cypress Group and CIVC Partners. FGIC incurred heavy losses, along with other bond insurers in the 2008 credit crisis.[84]
Two years later, in 2005, Blackstone was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. Blackstone's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco at the end of the 1980s leveraged buyout boom. Also, at the time of its announcement, SunGard would be the largest buyout of a technology company in history, a distinction it would cede to the buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction is also notable in the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point.[85] The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[86][87]
In 2006, Blackstone launched its new long / short equity hedge fund business, Kailix Advisors. According to Blackstone, as of September 30, 2008, Kailix Advisors had $1.9 billion of assets under management. In December 2008, Blackstone announced that Kailix would be spun off to its management team to form a new fund as an independent entity backed by Blackstone.[26]
While Blackstone was active on the corporate investment side, it was also busy pursuing real estate investments. Blackstone acquired Prime Hospitality[88] and Extended Stay America in 2004. Blackstone followed these investments with the acquisition of La Quinta Inns & Suites in 2005. Blackstone's largest transaction, the buyout of Hilton Hotels Corporation occurred in 2007. Extended Stay Hotels was sold to The Lightstone Group in July 2007 and Prime Hospitality's Wellesley Inns were folded into La Quinta.[89] La Quinta Inns & Suites went public in 2014 and is now controlled by La Quinta Holdings as the parent organization.[90]
Buyout boom (2005–2007)[edit]
During the buyout boom of 2006 and 2007, Blackstone completed some of the largest leveraged buyouts. Blackstone's most notable transactions during this period included the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


TDC
2005
In December 2005, Blackstone together with a group of firms, including Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Permira, Apax Partners and Providence Equity Partners, acquired Tele-Denmark Communications. The firms acquired the former telecom monopoly in Denmark, under the banner Nordic Telephone Company (NTC) for approximately $11 billion.
[91]


Equity Office
2006
Blackstone completes the $37.7 billion acquisition of one of the largest owners of commercial office properties in the US. At the time of its announcement, the Equity Office buyout became the largest in history, surpassing the buyout of HCA. It would later be surpassed by KKR's buyout of TXU. Vornado Realty Trust bid against Blackstone, pushing up the final price.
[92][93]


Freescale Semiconductor
2006
A consortium led by Blackstone and including the Carlyle Group, Permira and the TPG Capital completed the $17.6 billion takeover of the semiconductor company. At the time of its announcement, Freescale would be the largest leveraged buyout of a technology company ever, surpassing the 2005 buyout of SunGard. The buyers were forced to pay an extra $800 million because KKR made a last minute bid as the original deal was about to be signed. Shortly after the deal closed in late 2006, cell phone sales at Motorola Corp., Freescale's former corporate parent and a major customer, began dropping sharply. In addition, in the recession of 2008–2009, Freescale's chip sales to automakers fell off, and the company came under great financial strain.
[94][95]


Michaels
2006
Blackstone, together with Bain Capital, acquired Michaels, the largest arts and crafts retailer in North America in a $6.0 billion leveraged buyout in October 2006. Bain and Blackstone narrowly beat out Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and TPG Capital in an auction for the company.
[96]


Nielsen Holdings
2006
Blackstone together with AlpInvest Partners, Carlyle Group, Hellman & Friedman, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and Thomas H. Lee Partners acquired the global information and media company formerly known as VNU.
[97][98][99]


Orangina[100]
2006
Blackstone, together with Lion Capital acquired Orangina, the bottler, distributor and franchisor of a number of carbonated and other soft drinks in Europe from Cadbury Schweppes for €1.85 billion
[101]


Travelport
2006
Travelport, the parent of the travel web site Orbitz.com, was acquired from Cendant by Blackstone and Technology Crossover Ventures in a deal valued at $4.3 billion. The sale of Travelport followed the spin-offs of Cendant's real estate and hospitality businesses, Realogy Corporation and Wyndham Worldwide Corporation, respectively, in July 2006. (Later in the year, TPG and Silver Lake would acquire Travelport's chief competitor Sabre Holdings.) Soon after the Travelport buyout, Travelport spun off part of its subsidiary Orbitz Worldwide in an IPO and bought a Travelport competitor, Worldspan.
[102][103][104]


United Biscuits
2006
In October 2006 Blackstone, together with PAI Partners announced the acquisition of the British biscuit producer. The deal was completed in December 2006.
[105][106]


RGIS Inventory Specialists
2007
In March 2007, RGIS announced that Blackstone Group purchased a controlling interest in the company, the terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
[107]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[108]


Hilton Worldwide
2007
Blackstone acquired the premium hotel operator for approximately $26 billion, representing a 25% premium to Hilton's all-time high stock price. The Hilton deal, announced on July 3, 2007 is often referred to as the deal that marked the "high water mark" and the beginning of the end of the multi-year boom in leveraged buyouts. The company restructured its debt in 2010.
[109][110][111]


Initial public offering in 2007[edit]
In 2004, Blackstone had explored the possibility of creating a business development company (BDC), Blackridge Investments, similar to vehicles pursued by Apollo Management.[112] However, Blackstone failed to raise capital through an initial public offering that summer, and the project was shelved.[113] It also planned to raise a fund on the Amsterdam stock exchange in 2006, but its rival, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., launched a $5 billion fund there that soaked up all demand for such funds, and Blackstone abandoned its project.[114]
By the summer of 2006, Blackstone had a more ambitious goal and secretly began laying the groundwork for an IPO of the firm itself, and managed to keep the project quiet for eight or nine months.[7][115] On March 22, 2007, Blackstone filed with the SEC[10] to raise $4 billion in an initial public offering. On June 3, 2007, Blackstone announced the acquisition of Alliant Insurance Services, Inc., one of the nation's largest insurance brokerage firms.[116] On June 21, Blackstone sold a 12.3% stake in its ownership for $4.13 billion in the largest U.S. IPO since 2002. Traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol BX, Blackstone priced at $31 per share on June 22, 2007.[8][117] In July 2007, less than two weeks after the Blackstone IPO, its rival private equity firm, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, filed with the SEC.[118] In October 2009, KKR listed its shares on the Euronext exchange and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange.[119]
2008 to 2010[edit]
Since the closure of the credit markets in 2007 and 2008, Blackstone has managed to close only a small number of sizable transactions. In January 2008, Blackstone made a small co-investment alongside TPG Capital and Apollo Management in their buyout of Harrah's Entertainment, although that transaction had been announced during the buyout boom period. Other notable investments that Blackstone completed in 2008 and 2009 included AlliedBarton, Performance Food Group,[120][121] Apria Healthcare and CMS Computers.
Among the firm's two largest investments since the buyout boom have been The Weather Channel and the announced acquisition of Busch Entertainment. In July 2008, Blackstone, together with NBC Universal and Bain Capital agreed to purchase The Weather Channel from Landmark Communications.[122][123] In October 2009, Anheuser-Busch InBev announced the sale of its Busch Entertainment Corporation theme parks division to Blackstone for $2.7 billion.[124][125] The Financial Times reported that Merlin Entertainments owned by Blackstone Group will file an IPO[126] in the 2nd quarter of 2010. Merlin will be listed on the London Stock Exchange. If true this would be the second of 8 reported IPOs Blackstone plans,[127] the first being Team Health Holdings, Inc.[128] Blackstone reported at the end of 2009 revenues of $1.8bln, compared to -$349mln revenues in 2008.[129] On August 13, 2010 Blackstone announced it would buy Dynegy, an energy firm, for nearly $5 billion.[130]
In 2010, Blackstone Alternative Asset Management, received Institutional Investor magazine's 8th Annual Hedge Fund Industry award for Large Fund of Hedge Funds of the Year.[131]
Investments since 2011[edit]

In February 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired 588 malls of Centro's U.S. shopping centers for $9.4 billion. Centro's Australian continues their operation independently.[132]
In August 2011 Blackstone Group LP bought Medical-Biller Emdeon Inc. for around $3 billion. Since Blackstone Group LP was the world's biggest private-equity firm, tender offer of Emdeon Inc. public company should be done with a cash payment of $19 a share, a 44 percent premium.[133]
In late 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired the German outdoor company Jack Wolfskin. Blackstone moved some of its accounting functions to India.
In 2012, Blackstone was part of a consortium that financed Knight Capital after a software glitch threatened Knight's ability to continue operations.
In October 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired G6 Hospitality better known as Motel 6 & Studio 6 motels for 1.9 billion.
In November 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired a controlling interest in Vivint, Vivint Solar, and 2GIG Technologies.[134]
In April 2013, the company confirmed that it backed out of the proposed Dell buyout.[135]
In September 2013, Blackstone announced a strategic investment in ThoughtFocus Technologies LLC, a leading IT Service provider. The investment will establish the 'Blackstone Center of Excellence', an IT outsourcing and offshore delivery center, to provide technology and other administrative service.[136]
In August 2013 Blackstone bought Strategic Partners, manager of secondaryfunds, from CreditSuisse, with which Blackstone is raising its 6th fund, targeting $4 billion.[137]
In February 2014, Blackstone purchased a 20 percent stake in the Italian luxury brand Versace for €150 million.[138][139]
In April 2014 Blackstone's charitable arm, the Blackstone Charitable Foundation, donated $4 million to create the Blackstone Entrepreneurs Network in Colorado. The program encourages increased collaboration among local business leaders with the goal of retaining high-growth companies in the state.[140]
In May 2014, Blackstone Group purchased the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas resort from Deutsche Bank for $1.73 billion.[141]
In August 2014, Blackstone Group was in advanced talks to acquire Royal Dutch Shell Plc (RDSA)'s 50 percent stake in a shale-gas field in Louisiana. Blackstone would pay about $1.2 billion for Shell’s half-interest in the Haynesville formation.[142]
In January 2015, Blackstone announced it would sell a Sydney-based office building to Dalian Wanda Group for around $327 million.[143]
In April 2015, Blackstone announced it would acquire Excel Trust Inc, a real estate investment trust, for around $2 billion.[144]
In October 2015, Blackstone agreed to purchase BioMed Realty Trust Inc for a sum of around $8 billion.[145]
In November 2015, Blackstone Group agreed to sell facility management firm GCA Services Group Inc to a consortium of Goldman Sachs’ private equity arm and Thomas H. Lee Partners.[146]
As of Q4 2015, the firm is in talks to sell of some of its trophy office assets in the Los Angeles market. Douglas Emmett Inc. is in advanced talks to purchase four buildings for more than $1 billion. The buildings total 1.7 million square feet and are located in the Westwood area.[147]
On February 10, 2017, Aon PLC agreed to sell its human resources outsourcing platform for $4.3 billion to Blackstone Group L.P., creating a new company.[148]
On June 19, 2017, Blackstone acquired the majority interest in The Office Group, valuing the whole company at $640 million.[149]

Self-dealing[edit]
In 2013, Bloomberg uncovered how the Blackstone Group was self-dealing after its affiliate GSO Capital Partners purchased debt and credit default swaps in Codere SA, a Spanish betting, online gambling and gaming company.[150]

In the first half of 2013, Blackstone GSO and another firm later purchased a €100 million bank loan (via secondary markets) that Codere already had on the books, and then convinced Codere to delay repayment on the debt related to the aforementioned credit default swaps. That delay triggered the CDS, resulting in upwards of $18.7 million in profit for GSO.[151]

The GSO director defended the move with "Codere (working with us...) had to trigger the credit default swaps, as it was the only way to compel certain bondholders to negotiate." and blamed credit default swap investors for their loss:

Unlike Blackstone, who invested directly into Codere, these financial investors [of hedge funds using credit default swaps] were not aligned with the interests of Codere, but instead through their use of credit default swaps, were betting on when the Company would default[...]having no interest in the outcome of the game.[151]

See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of outdoor industry parent companies
List of venture capital firms

References[edit]


^ Stephen Schwarzman speaks with Betty Liu and Erik Schatzke on "In the Loop" (April 16, 2015). Schwarzman Says Fundraising Environment Is 'Remarkable' (Television production). Bloomberg. Event occurs at 00:22 minutes in. Retrieved March 16, 2016. You've got assets now at three hundred billion dollars. 
^ "Blackstone Reports Third Quarter Results" (PDF). The Blackstone Group. January 31, 2013. Archived from the original (PDF) on October 30, 2014. 
^ a b Wiliam Alden (April 18, 2013). "Public Offering Values SeaWorld at $2.5 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 19, 2013. 
^ "The Blackstone Group". The New York Times. Retrieved 12 January 2016. 
^ Kim, Soyoung (September 19, 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 2013-03-23. 
^ a b Blackstone Group: Private Equity Archived February 4, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website). See also: Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website), Team (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20
^ a b c Blackstone Said to Prepare for I.P.O. New York Times, March 16, 2007
^ a b Anderson, Jenny. "Blackstone Founders Prepare to Count Their Billions." New York Times, June 12, 2007.
^ "Blackstone - Our Offices overview". Blackstone. 
^ a b c d e f g h i The Blackstone Group L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 22, 2007
^ New bosses, new rules. Los Angeles Times, August 12, 2007
^ a b Data collected from Preqin, a private equity database system
^ a b A trash hauler is buying a much bigger rival, a type of deal that makes Wall Street a bit nervous. New York Times, March 9, 1999
^ Equity Firm Attracted to Attractions. New York Times, March 6, 2007
^ Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Kim, Soyoung; Roumeliotis, Greg (9 September 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 4 January 2013. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Overview. (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 6, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ a b "Blackstone amasses more capital for latest Europe RE pool". AltAssets. 20 December 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-20. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Investment Portfolio ( at company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Alex Hawkes "Blackstone denies blame for Southern Cross's plight" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Nils Pratley "Was Southern Cross always sickly underneath?" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Karmin, Craig (August 12, 2013). "Blackstone to Buy Stakes in Apartment Complexes From GE Unit". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Alden, William (December 8, 2014). "Blackstone to Sell California Office Buildings for $3.5 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 2014-12-19. 
^ Blackstone to Buy GSO Capital. New York Times, January 10, 2008
^ Blackstone to Buy Hedge Fund to Strengthen Credit Operations. New York Times, January 11, 2008
^ a b Blackstone To Rationalize Single Manager Hedge Funds Businesses In Efficiency Move. Press Release, December 23, 2008
^ Schwarzman Unbowed. Bloomberg Markets, March 2009
^ Blackstone Financial Advisory: Selected Clients (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived February 16, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Moore, Heidi N. (December 12, 2008). "GM Hires Blackstone". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2008-12-12. 
^ "Blackstoin Restructuring & Reorganization: Selected Transactions". (Company website) Accessed 10/20/2012
^ Blackstone: Private Placement Advisory Overview (The Park Hill Group). Company website, Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Park Hill Group: About Us. Company website, Accessed 2011-1-26
^ Moyer, Liz. "Hitting A Brick Wall". Forbes. May 18, 2006.
^ a b "John Studzinski Joins Blackstone". The Blackstone Group. May 18, 2006.
^ Wachman, Richard. "Cracking the Studzinski code". The Observer. October 7, 2006.
^ John Studzinski CBE. FT Business of Luxury Summit, 30 May – 1 June 2012. Financial Times. 2012.
^ About John Studzinski. John Studzinski's blog.
^ "Blackstone to list advisory arm early 2015". Financial Times. October 2014.
^ Dezember, Ryan. "Blackstone Group to Spin Off Financial Advisory Business". Wall Street Journal. October 10, 2014.
^ Blackstone – History: 2014. Blackstone. Blackstone.com. Retrieved March 30, 2015.
^ Roumeliotis, Greg and Paritosh Bansal. "UPDATE 4-Blackstone gives up its roots in advisory unit spin-off". Reuters. October 10, 2014.
^ a b John Studzinski – Official profile, Blackstone.
^ "E.U. Estrangement Before The Divorce (a.k.a Volatility)". Fund Portfolio Management. January 23, 2015.
^ David Carey and John E. Morris, King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone (Crown 2010), pp. 45–56
^ Private equity power list: #1 The Blackstone Group. Fortune, July 2, 2007
^ Blackstone etymology. The Deal, June 26, 2007
^ Alden, William. "Blackstone's Chief Has a Warning for Wall Street's Entrepreneurs". DealBook. Retrieved 2017-01-27. 
^ Hutton-Shearson Deal Announced". New York Times, December 4, 1987.
^ "Hutton Sets Fees". New York Times, December 9, 1987
^ King of Capital, pp. 45-56
^ A Big Fund Ready to Capitalize on Hard Times. New York Times, November 13, 1987
^ "Mortgage Unit Leaders To Join Blackstone". New York Times, March 4, 1988
^ "Nikko Acquires 20% of Blackstone Group". New York Times, December 13, 1988
^ King of Capital, pp. 144–147
^ "Stockman Forming Own Buyout Concern". New York Times, September 17, 1999
^ "Stockman Is Charged With Fraud". New York Times, March 27, 2007
^ "Sony and CBS Records: What a Romance!". New York Times, September 18, 1988
^ "CNW Accepts Buyout Bid From Blackstone Group". New York Times, June 7, 1989
^ "2 Wall Street Firms Join To Buy Savings Units". New York Times, May 12, 1989
^ U.S. Mergers Firm Is Forming British Link. New York Times, April 23, 1990
^ Chairman Is Named For Blackstone Unit. New York Times, April 5, 1991
^ Prime to Sell Interest in Inns to Blackstone. New York Times, May 24, 1990
^ Blackstone Unit to Buy Days Inns. New York Times, October 1, 1991
^ Hospitality to Acquire Super 8 Motels. New York Times, February 17, 1993
^ The Loewen Group and Blackstone Capital Partners form corporate venture to acquire Prime Succession. Business Wire, June 17, 1996. Accessed 2009-02-20.
^ Loewen And Blackstone To Make Joint Purchase. New York Times, June 18, 1996
^ Loewen Buys Big Cemetery, And Its Suitor Criticizes Deal. New York Times, September 21, 1996
^ Blackstone Raises $4 Billion for Fund. New York Times, October 10, 1997
^ Red-Hot Revival in Real Estate; Overheating Is Feared With Surge in Vulture Investing. New York Times, November 6, 1997
^ A.I.G. Will Put $1.35 Billion Into Blackstone. New York Times, July 31, 1998
^ Blackstone to Form a New Financing Unit. New York Times, April 8, 1999
^ King of Capital, pp. 145-146
^ King of Capital, pp. 148–155
^ Cube, Christine (Nov 25, 2002). "Watergate Hotel For Sale". Washington Business Journal. 
^ Staff Report (Aug 19, 2004). "Monument Realty Buys Watergate Hotel". Commercial Real Estate Direct. 
^ "Blackstone Acquires Debt on 7 World Trade Center". Business Wire. October 17, 2000. 
^ Photographed at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland in January 2008.
^ Blackstone Amasses a Record Equity Fund. New York Times, July 17, 2002
^ Vivendi Finishes Sale of Houghton Mifflin To Investors. New York Times, January 1, 2003
^ Sender, Henny. "At Blackstone, James Builds A Following". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 March 2007. 
^ King of Capital, pp. 176, 197, 206-207
^ Blackstone Group May Purchase Auto Parts Business From TRW. New York Times, November 13, 2002
^ Blackstone Buys Majority Stake in Columbia House. New York Times, May 15, 2002
^ A Split-Up of Insurers of Bonds Is Considered. New York Times, February 16, 2008
^ King of Capital, p. 225
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal." Bloomberg L.P., March 29, 2005
^ Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?. New York Times, April 3, 2005
^ The Blackstone Group to Acquire Prime Hospitality Corp. Press Release, August 18, 2004. Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived March 8, 2005, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Private-Equity Firm Sees Room for Value in Hotels. Wall Street Journal, August 17, 2005
^ http://ir.lq.com/Cache/1500058950.PDF?Y=&O=PDF&D=&FID=1500058950&T=&IID=4424891
^ Equity Firms Buy Danish Phone Company. New York Times, December 1, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 239–254
^ Blackstone's Bid for Equity Office Prevails New York Times, February 8, 2007
^ King of Capital, 231-235
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Flynn, Laurie J. "Blackstone Alliance to Buy Chip Maker for $17.6 Billion." New York Times, September 16, 2006
^ Consortium Buys Michaels for $6 Billion. New York Times, July 1, 2006
^ VNU Shareholders Reject $8.9 Bln Offer From KKR Group. Bloomberg, March 8, 2006
^ Buyout Bid For Parent Of Nielsen. New York Times, January 17, 2006
^ VNU Agrees To Public Offer From Private Equity Group. Press Release, March 8, 2006
^ "Company News Headlines". NASDAQ.com. June 2, 2011. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Cadbury Sells Beverage Unit to Two Firms. New York Times, November 22, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 314-318
^ Sachdev, Ameet. " Orbitz travels to 4th owner: Blackstone Group to buy from Cendant.", Chicago Tribune, July 1, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Fineman, Josh. "Cendant to sell Orbitz to Blackstone for $4.3 Bln", Bloomberg.com, June 30, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Parkinson, Gary (October 26, 2006). "Private-equity companies snap up United Biscuits in a £1.6bn deal". The Independent. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ "Blackstone and PAI complete purchase of UB" (Press release). United Biscuits. December 15, 2006. Archived from the original on September 27, 2007. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ [1]. RGIS Press Release, March, 21st 2007
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer." New York Times, June 8, 2007.
^ Blackstone to Buy Hilton Hotels for $26 Billion. New York Times, July 4, 2007
^ High-Water Mark. New York Times, July 4, 2008
^ King of Capital, pp. 299–300
^ Private Firms Use Closed-End Funds to Tap the Market. New York Times, April 17, 2004
^ Blackstone Group Postpones Fund Offering. New York Times, July 16, 2004
^ King of Capital, pp. 221–223
^ King of Capital, pp. 255–267
^ Alliant Insurance Services, Inc. to be acquired by Blackstone and Management, June 3, 2007 Archived March 4, 2016, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and de la Merced, Michael J. "News Analysis Behind the Veil at Blackstone? Probably Another Veil." New York Times, March 19, 2007.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ KKR lists on Euronext; NYSE is next. Reuters, October 1, 2009[dead link]
^ Equity Firms Acquiring Food Supplier. Bloomberg, January 19, 2008
^ Blackstone, Wellspring to acquire Performance Food Group in $1.3bn deal. AltAssets, January 18, 2008 Archived June 11, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Michael J. de la Merced (July 7, 2008). "Weather Channel Is Sold to NBC and Equity Firms". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-09-17. 
^ Robert Marich. "The Weather Channel Sale Wraps". Broadcasting & Cable. Archived from the original on September 15, 2008. Retrieved 2008-09-26. 
^ Blackstone to buy A-B InBev's theme parks for $2.7 billion. MarketWatch, Oct. 7, 2009
^ InBev may sell US theme parks. Boston Globe, July 16, 2008[dead link]
^ "Blackstone's Merlin Entertainment to Go Public in '10, FT Says". Bloomberg. October 23, 2009. 
^ "Blackstone plans portfolio IPOs: source". Reuters. October 12, 2009. 
^ Wahba, Phil (October 6, 2009). "Blackstone-owned hospital staffing company files IPO". Reuters. 
^ Opalesque (26 February 2010). "Blackstone revenues in 2009 show strong bounce back from 2008". 
^ "Finance after the crisis: Survival of the richest". The Economist. The Economist Newspaper Limited. 396 (8696): 59. 21–27 August 2010. 
^ [2] Hedge Fund Industry Awards, The 8th Annual Hedge Fund Awards, Retrieved June 2011
^ Whitley, Angus; Saminather, Nichola (February 28, 2011). "Blackstone Said to Acquire Centro's U.S. Shopping Centers for $9.4 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ Nussbaum, Alex; Kelly, Jason (August 4, 2011). "Blackstone Group Agrees to Acquire Medical-Biller Emdeon for $3 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ De, Michael J. "The Blackstone Group News". New York Times. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Jolie O'Dell, VentureBeat. "Blackstone just backed out of its proposed Dell buyout." April 19, 2013. Retrieved on April 19, 2013.
^ Blackstone Announces Strategic Investment in ThoughtFocus Technologie. Wall Street Journal (2013-09-30). Retrieved on 2013-12-06.
^ Ryan, Dezember (April 24, 2014). "Bargain Bin Is Now Big Deal". WSJ. Retrieved 29 April 2014. 
^ Versace deal with Blackstone values group at 1 billion euros, Reuters, February 26, 2014
^ Zargani, Luisa (27 February 2014). "Versace Sells Minority Stake to Blackstone". Women's Wear Daily. Retrieved 27 February 2014. 
^ Vuong, Andy (April 20, 2014). "Blackstone grants $4 million to create Colorado entrepreneurs network". The Denver Post. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Arno Schuetze & Edward Taylor (May 15, 2014). "Deutsche Bank sells casino to Blackstone for $1.7 billion". Reuters. 
^ By David Carey, Bloomberg. "[3]." August 10, 2014. August 13, 2014.
^ Blackstone to sell prime Sydney property to Dalian Wanda for $327 million. Reuters, 26 January 2015
^ "Blackstone to buy Excel Trust for about $2 billion" (Press release). Reuters. 10 April 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to buy BioMed Realty in $8 billion deal". Reuters. 8 October 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to sell GCA Services to Thomas Lee, Goldman Sachs". Reuters. 16 November 2015. 
^ Brown, Eliot (24 November 2015). "Blackstone in Talks to Sell Four Los Angeles Office Towers". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2015-12-05. 
^ Jamerson, Joshua (February 10, 2017), Blackstone to Buy Aon’s Human Resources Outsourcing Platform for $4.3 Billion, New York City: The Wall Street Journal, retrieved February 12, 2017 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/uk-officegroup-m-a-blackstone-idUKKBN19A1J4
^ Stephanie Ruhle; Mary Childs; Julie Miecamp (22 October 2013). "Blackstone Unit Wins in No-Lose Codere Trade: Corporate Finance". Bloomberg News. 
^ a b Dan Primack (5 December 2013). "Blackstone responds to Jon Stewart". finance.fortune.cnn.com. 




David Carey, John E. Morris (2010). King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall, and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone.
The Making of a Wise Man. New York Times, November 28, 2004


External links[edit]

Official website







v
t
e


The Blackstone Group



Founders



Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman





Business Services



CMS Computers
RGIS
SunGard (minority shareholder)





Consumer/Retail



Michaels (Joint Control)
Performance Food Group
Pinnacle Foods
United Biscuits





Financial Services



BankUnited (minority stake)
HealthMarkets (minority stake)
FGIC (minority stake)





Healthcare



Biomet
Emcure Pharmaceuticals (investment)
Vanguard Health Systems





Industrial



Freescale (Joint Control)
Klöckner Pentaplast
TRW Automotive (Control)





Media/Telecommunications



eAccess (investment)
Nielsen Holdings (minority stake)
Axtel (minority stake)
Deutsche Telekom (minority stake)
TDC (minority stake)
The Weather Channel (minority stake)





Travel & Leisure



Hilton Worldwide
Center Parcs Europe (freehold)
Caesars Entertainment Corporation (minority stake)
Merlin Entertainments (minority stake)
SeaWorld Entertainment
Tragus Group
Travelport





Real estate



Extended Stay America (minority stake)
Equity Office
Luxury Resorts (LXR)
La Quinta Inns & Suites












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


The Weather Channel



Network information
and ownership



History
Landmark Communications (former)
NBCUniversal
Bain Capital
The Blackstone Group
List of meteorologists
International presence
Local on the 8s





Programs (list)





Live programs




AMHQ
PM Edition
Weather Center Live
Weather Geeks
Weather Underground
Weekend Recharge






Recorded programs




23.5° with Sam Champion
3 Scientists Walk Into a Bar
100 Biggest Weather Moments (2007 miniseries)
American Super/Natural
Fat Guys in the Woods
Highway Thru Hell
Natural Born Monsters
Prospectors
Raging Nature
Secrets of the Earth
So You Think You'd Survive?
Strangest Weather on Earth
Storm Stories
Tornado Alley
Weather Caught on Camera
Weather Gone Viral
Why Planes Crash








Weather Stars



III
4000
XL
IntelliStar





Related operations



Local Now
Weatherscan





Albums



The Best of Smooth Jazz
Smooth Jazz II










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=The_Blackstone_Group&oldid=788560248"					
Categories: Blackstone GroupCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies established in 1985Investment banks in the United StatesPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Good articlesPages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2011All articles containing potentially dated statements 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàDeutschEestiفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaTürkçe中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 03:13.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









The Blackstone Group - Wikipedia






















 







The Blackstone Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Blackstone Group)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Not to be confused with BlackRock Inc, an investment management firm.

The Blackstone Group L.P.





Type

Master limited partnership


Traded as
NYSE: BX


Industry
Financial services


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Founder
Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman


Headquarters
345 Park Avenue, Manhattan, New York City, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen A. Schwarzman
(Chairman and CEO)
Hamilton E. James
(President & COO)
J. Tomilson Hill
(Vice Chairman)
Jonathan D. Gray
(Global Head of Real estate)


Products
Private equity
Investment management
Asset management


Revenue
 US$ 7.484 billion (2014)



Net income

 US$ 1.584 billion (2014)


AUM
 US$ 311 billion (2015)[1][2]


Total assets
 US$ 31.510 billion (2014)



Number of employees

2,190 (2014)


Website
www.blackstone.com


The Blackstone Group L.P. is an American multinational private equity, alternative asset management and financial services firm based in New York City. As the largest alternative investment firm in the world,[3] Blackstone specializes in private equity, credit and hedge fund investment strategies.[4]
Blackstone's private equity business has been one of the largest investors in leveraged buyout transactions over the last decade, while its real estate business has actively acquired commercial real estate. Since its inception, Blackstone has completed investments in such notable companies as Hilton Worldwide, Merlin Entertainments Group, Performance Food Group, Equity Office Properties, Republic Services, AlliedBarton, United Biscuits, Freescale Semiconductor, Vivint,[5] and Travelport.[6]
Blackstone was founded in 1985 as a mergers and acquisitions boutique by Peter G. Peterson and Stephen A. Schwarzman, who had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. Over the course of two decades, Blackstone has evolved into one of the world's largest private equity investment firms.[3] In 2007, Blackstone completed a $4 billion initial public offering to become one of the first major private equity firms to list shares in its management company on a public exchange.[7][8] Blackstone is headquartered at 345 Park Avenue in Manhattan, New York City, with eight additional offices in the United States, as well as offices in London, Paris, Düsseldorf, Sydney, Tokyo, Hong Kong, Singapore, Beijing, Shanghai, Madrid, Mumbai, and Dubai.[9]



Contents


1 Business segments

1.1 Corporate private equity
1.2 Real estate
1.3 Marketable alternative asset management
1.4 Financial advisory services


2 History

2.1 Founding and early history
2.2 1990s
2.3 Early 2000s
2.4 Buyout boom (2005–2007)
2.5 Initial public offering in 2007
2.6 2008 to 2010
2.7 Investments since 2011


3 Self-dealing
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Business segments[edit]
Blackstone is organized into four business segments:[10]

Corporate private equity – Management of Blackstone's family of private equity funds investing in leveraged buyout transactions;
Investment Banking and Financial Advisory – Includes Blackstone's mergers and acquisitions advisory services, restructuring and reorganization advisory services, and fund placement services for alternative investment funds;
Marketable Alternative Asset Management – Management of Blackstone's funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, and closed-end mutual funds;
Real Estate – Management of Blackstone's family of real estate investment funds.

Corporate private equity[edit]
As of 2011[update], Blackstone is the world's fifth-largest private equity firm by committed capital, focusing primarily on leveraged buyouts of more mature companies.[7] The firm also invests through minority investments, corporate partnerships, and industry consolidations, and occasionally, start-up investments in new entrants into existing industries. The firm focuses on friendly investments in large capitalization companies.[10]
Blackstone's private equity business employs approximately 120 investment employees in New York City; London; Menlo Park, California; Mumbai; Hong Kong; and Beijing.[6]
Historically, Blackstone has primarily relied on private equity funds, pools of committed capital from pension funds, insurance companies, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investors.[11] As of the end of 2008, Blackstone had completed fundraising for six funds with total investor commitments of over $36 billion, including five traditional private equity fund and a separate fund focusing on telecommunications investments.
Below is a summary of Blackstone's private equity funds raised from its inception through the beginning of 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Capital Partners I
1987
$0.8


Blackstone Capital Partners II
1994
$1.27


Blackstone Capital Partners III
1997
$3.78


Blackstone Communications Partners I
2000
$2.02


Blackstone Capital Partners IV
2003
$6.45


Blackstone Capital Partners V
2006
$21.7


Blackstone Capital Partners VI
2010
$13.5


From 1987 to the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested approximately $20 billion in capital in 109 private equity transactions.[10]
Blackstone's most notable investments include Allied Waste,[13] AlliedBarton Security Services, Graham Packaging, Celanese, Nalco, HealthMarkets, Houghton Mifflin, American Axle, TRW Automotive, Catalent Pharma Solutions, Prime Hospitality, Legoland, Madame Tussauds,[14] Luxury Resorts (LXR), Pinnacle Foods, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Apria Healthcare, Travelport, The Weather Channel (United States) and The PortAventura Resort. In 2009 Blackstone purchased Busch Entertainment (comprising the Sea World Parks, Busch Garden Parks and the 2 water parks).[15]
In 2012, Blackstone acquired a controlling interest in Utah-based Vivint, Inc., a home automation, security, and energy company.[16]
Former notable investments include Universal Studios Parks, which was sold to Comcast.
Real estate[edit]
Blackstone began building its real estate investment business in 1992 with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses and has built it into a global operation with 122 investment professionals in the United States, Europe and Asia. The real estate business has raised approximately $28 billion for a variety of fund vehicles, including six US-focused funds and three International opportunity funds. Blackstone also raised a real estate special situations fund focusing on non-controlling debt and equity investment opportunities. The special situations fund invests directly in real estate as well as private and publicly traded real estate-related securities.[10][17]
The following is a summary of Blackstone's real estate funds raised from inception through November 2009:[12]


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($b)


Blackstone Real Estate Partners I
1994
$0.48


Blackstone Real Estate Partners II
1996
$1.3


Blackstone Real Estate Partners III
1999
$1.5


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe)
2001
€0.8


Blackstone Real Estate Partners IV
2003 (alt value 2004)[18]
$2.5 (alt value €6.7bn)[18]


Blackstone Real Estate Partners International (Europe) II
2006
€1.55


Blackstone Real Estate Partners V
2006
$5.25


Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI
2007
$10.9


Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations PE Fund
2008
$1.0


Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe III
2009
€3.1


From 1987 through the time of its IPO filing in 2007, Blackstone invested more than $13 billion in 212 real estate transactions and is a major owner of real estate throughout the US and Europe.[10] Blackstone's most notable real estate investments have included Equity Office Properties, Hilton Hotels Corporation, Trizec Properties, Center Parcs UK, La Quinta Inns & Suites, Motel 6, Wyndham Worldwide, Southern Cross Healthcare and Vicinity Centres.[19]
The purchase and subsequent profitable IPO of Southern Cross led to controversy in the UK. Part of the purchase involved splitting the business into a property company, NHP, and a care home business, which Blackstone claimed would become "the leading company in the elderly care market". In May 2011, Southern Cross, now independent, was almost bankrupt, jeopardising 31,000 elderly residents in 750 care homes. It denied blame, although Blackstone was widely accused in the media for selling on the company with an unsustainable business model and crippled with an impossible sale and leaseback strategy.[20][21]
After the subprime mortgage crisis, Blackstone Group LP has bought more than $5.5 billion single-family homes for rent, to be sold when the prices rise.[22]
Blackstone has agreed to sell a selection of Northern California office buildings for the sum of $3.5 billion, in the latest sale of real estate by the firm.[23]
Marketable alternative asset management[edit]
Main article: GSO Capital Partners
In 1990, Blackstone created a fund of hedge funds business to manage the internal assets for Blackstone and its senior managers. Over the years, this business evolved into Blackstone's marketable alternative asset management segment, which was opened to institutional investors. Among the investments included in this segment are funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt vehicles, proprietary hedge funds and closed-end mutual funds.[10]
In March 2008, Blackstone acquired GSO Capital Partners, a credit-oriented alternative asset manager, for $620 million in cash and stock and up to $310 million through an earnout over the next five years based on certain earnings targets. The combination of Blackstone and GSO created one of the largest credit platforms in the alternative asset management business, with over $21 billion of total assets under management.[24] GSO was founded in 2005 by Bennett Goodman, Tripp Smith and Doug Ostrover. The GSO team had previously managed the leveraged finance businesses at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette and later Credit Suisse First Boston, after the acquisition of DLJ. Blackstone had existing relationships with the GSO team as an original investor in GSO's funds. Following the completion of the acquisition, Blackstone merged GSO's operations with its existing debt investment operations.[25][26]
Financial advisory services[edit]
Blackstone's financial advisory business is composed of three businesses:[10]

Corporate and Mergers and Acquisitions Advisory
Restructuring & Reorganization Advisory
Private Placement Advisory

Blackstone was founded by Peterson and Schwarzman in 1985 as a boutique investment banking firm that provides mergers and acquisitions advisory services. Among Blackstone's most notable corporate and mergers and acquisitions, advisory clients include Microsoft, Procter & Gamble, Verizon, Comcast, Sony and AIG.[27][28]
In 1991, with the collapse of the 1980s buyout boom, Blackstone began to offer advisory services in corporate restructurings as well. Blackstone's most notable restructuring clients have included General Motors[29] Xerox, Enron,[30] Bally Total Fitness and Global Crossing.
Blackstone's fund placement advisory group, The Park Hill Group, was formed in 2005 with a team of professionals from Atlantic-Pacific Capital and Credit Suisse. The group focuses on raising capital from institutional investors for private investment vehicles that invest in private equity, mezzanine, real estate, venture capital, and hedge funds.[31] Park Hill Group also provides secondary advisory services to investors seeking portfolio liquidity and unfunded commitment relief.[32]
In 2006 John Studzinski joined The Blackstone Group as the senior managing director in its investment and advisory group and as a member of the firm's executive committee.[33][34] He was recruited to oversee and develop Blackstone’s mergers-and-acquisitions advisory business, Blackstone Advisory Partners, in the United States and Europe, and to open an office in London.[34][35] His primary role as global head of Blackstone Advisory Partners was to oversee Blackstone's corporate M&A advisory services business in the U.S., and further develop the corporate M&A advisory business in Europe and Asia.[36][37] In early 2015, Blackstone began spinning off three of its divisions, including its M&A advisory group, to avoid any potential conflicts of interest with its primary private-equity business.[38][39][40] After assisting with the transition,[41] Studzinski became Vice Chairman of Investor Relations and Business Development at The Blackstone Group.[42][43] In this capacity, he holds responsibility for a number of sovereign and international institutional relationships, as well as ultra high-net-worth families outside the U.S.[42]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
The Blackstone Group was founded in 1985 by Peter G. Peterson & Stephen A. Schwarzman and Richard Bennett with $400,000 in seed capital.[44][45] The founders named their firm "Blackstone", which was a cryptogram derived from the names of the two founders (Schwarzman and Peterson): "Schwarz" is German for "black"; "Peter", or "Petra" in Greek, means "stone" or "rock".[46] The two founders had previously worked together at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc. At Lehman, Schwarzman served as head of Lehman Brothers' global mergers and acquisitions business.[47] Prominent investment banker Roger C. Altman, another Lehman veteran, left his position as a managing director of Shearson Lehman Brothers to join Peterson and Schwarzman at Blackstone in 1987, but left in 1992 to join the Clinton Administration as Deputy Treasury Secretary.
Blackstone was originally formed as a mergers and acquisitions advisory boutique. Blackstone advised on the 1987 merger of investment banks E. F. Hutton & Co. and Shearson Lehman Brothers, collecting a $3.5 million fee.[48][49]




Blackstone co-founder Peter Peterson was former chairman of Lehman Brothers, Kuhn, Loeb Inc.


From the outset in 1985, Schwarzman and Peterson planned to enter the private equity business, but had difficulty in raising their first fund because neither had ever led a leveraged buyout.[50] Blackstone finalized fundraising for its first private equity fund in the aftermath of the October 1987 stock market crash. After two years of providing strictly advisory services, Blackstone decided to pursue a merchant banking model after its founders determined that many situations required an investment partner rather than just an advisor. The largest investors in the first fund included Prudential Insurance Company, Nikko Securities and the General Motors pension fund.[51]
Blackstone also ventured into other businesses, most notably investment management. In 1987 Blackstone entered into a 50–50 partnership with the founders of BlackRock, Larry Fink and Ralph Schlosstein. The two founders, who had previously run the mortgage-backed securities divisions at First Boston and Lehman Brothers Kuhn Loeb, respectively, initially joined Blackstone to manage an investment fund and provide advice to financial institutions. They also planned to use a Blackstone fund to invest in financial institutions and help build an asset management business specializing in fixed income investments.[10][52]
As the business grew, Japanese bank Nikko Securities acquired a 20% interest in Blackstone for a $100 million investment in 1988 (valuing the firm at $500 million). Nikko's investment allowed for a major expansion of the firm and its investment activities.[53] The growth firm also recruited politician and investment banker David Stockman from Salomon Brothers in 1988. Stockman led many key deals in his time at the firm, but had a mixed record with his investments.[54] He left Blackstone in 1999 to start his own private equity firm, Heartland Industrial Partners, based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[55][56]
The firm advised CBS Corporation on its 1988 sale of CBS Records to Sony to form what would become Sony Music Entertainment.[57] In June 1989, Blackstone acquired freight railroad operator, CNW Corporation.[58] That same year, Blackstone partnered with Salomon Brothers to raise $600 million to acquire distressed thrifts in the midst of the savings and loan crisis.[59]
1990s[edit]




The Blackstone Group logo in use prior to the firm's rebranding as simply Blackstone


As the 1990s began, Blackstone continued its growth and expansion into new businesses. In 1990, Blackstone launched its fund of hedge funds business, initially intended to manage investments for Blackstone senior management. Also in 1990, Blackstone extended its ambitions to Europe, forming a partnership with J. O. Hambro Magan in the UK and Indosuez in France. In 1991, Blackstone created its Europe unit to enhance the firm's presence internationally.[60][61]
In 1991, Blackstone launched its real estate investment business with the acquisition of a series of hotel businesses under the leadership of Henry Silverman. In 1990, Blackstone and Silverman acquired a 65% interest in Prime Motor Inn's Ramada and Howard Johnson franchises for $140 million, creating Hospitality Franchise Systems as a holding company.[62] In October 1991, Blackstone and Silverman added Days Inns of America for $250 million.[63] Then, in 1993, Hospitality Franchise Systems acquired Super 8 Motels for $125 million.[64] Silverman would ultimately leave Blackstone to serve as CEO of HFS, which would later become Cendant Corporation.
Blackstone made a number of notable investments in the early and mid-1990s, including Great Lakes Dredge and Dock Company (1991), Six Flags (1991), US Radio (1994), Centerplate (1995), MEGA Brands (1996). Also, in 1996, Blackstone partnered with the Loewen Group, the second largest funeral home and cemetery operator in North America, to acquire funeral home and cemetery businesses. The partnership's first acquisition was a $295 million buyout of Prime Succession from GTCR.[65][66][67]
Through the mid and late 1990s, Blackstone continued to grow. In 1997, Blackstone completed fundraising for its third private equity fund, with approximately $4 billion of investor commitments[68] and a $1.1 billion real estate investment fund.[69] In the following year, in 1998, Blackstone sold a 7% interest in its management company to AIG, replacing Nikko Securities as its largest investor and valuing Blackstone at $2.1 billion.[70] Then, in 1999, Blackstone launched its mezzanine capital business. Blackstone brought in five professionals, led by Howard Gellis from Nomura Holding America's Leveraged Capital Group to manage the business.[71]
Blackstone's investments in the late 1990s included AMF Group (1996), Haynes International (1997), American Axle (1997), Premcor (1997), CommNet Cellular (1998), Graham Packaging (1998), Centennial Communications (1999), Bresnan Communications (1999), PAETEC Holding Corp. (1999). Haynes and Republic Technologies International, a specialty steel maker in which Blackstone invested in 1996, both had problems and ultimately filed bankruptcy.[72]
Also, in 1997, Blackstone made its first investment in Allied Waste. Two years later, in 1999, Blackstone, together with Apollo Management provided capital for Allied Waste's acquisition of Browning-Ferris Industries in 1999 to create the second largest waste management company in the US. Blackstone's investment in Allied was one of its largest to that point in the firm's history.[13]
Its investments in telecommunications businesses—four cable TV systems in rural areas (TW Fanch 1 and 2, Bresnan Communications and Intermedia Partners IV) and a cell phone operator in the Rocky Mountain states (CommNet Cellular) were among the most successful of the era, generating $1.5 billion of profits for Blackstone's funds.[73]
Blackstone Real Estate Advisers, its real estate affiliate, bought the Watergate Complex in Washington D.C. in July 1998 for $39 million[74] and sold it to Monument Reality in August 2004.[75]
Early 2000s[edit]
Blackstone acquired the mortgage for 7 World Trade Center in October 2000 from the Teachers Insurance and Annuity Association.[76]




Schwarzman's Blackstone Group completed the first major IPO of a private equity firm in June 2007.[77]


In July 2002, Blackstone completed fundraising for a $6.45 billion private equity fund, Blackstone Capital Partners IV, the largest private equity fund ever raised to that point. More than $4 billion of the capital was raised by the end of 2001 and Blackstone was able to secure the remaining commitments despite adverse market conditions.[78]
With a significant amount of capital in its new fund, Blackstone was one of a handful of private equity investors capable of completing large transactions in the adverse conditions of the early 2000s recession. At the end of 2002, Blackstone, together with Thomas H. Lee Partners and Bain Capital, acquired Houghton Mifflin Company for $1.28 billion. The transaction represented one of the first large club deals, completed since the collapse of the Dot-com bubble.[79]
In 2002, Hamilton E. James joined global alternative asset manager Blackstone, where he currently serves as president and chief operating officer. He also serves on the firm's executive and management committees, and its board of directors.[80] In late 2002, Blackstone remained active acquiring TRW Automotive in a $4.7 billion buyout, the largest private equity deal announced that year (the deal was completed in early 2003). TRW's parent was acquired by Northrop Grumman, while Blackstone purchased its automotive parts business, a major supplier of automotive systems.[81][82] Blackstone also purchased a majority interest in Columbia House, a music buying club, in mid-2002.[83]
Blackstone made a significant investment in Financial Guaranty Insurance Company (FGIC), a monoline bond insurer alongside PMI Group, The Cypress Group and CIVC Partners. FGIC incurred heavy losses, along with other bond insurers in the 2008 credit crisis.[84]
Two years later, in 2005, Blackstone was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. Blackstone's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco at the end of the 1980s leveraged buyout boom. Also, at the time of its announcement, SunGard would be the largest buyout of a technology company in history, a distinction it would cede to the buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction is also notable in the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point.[85] The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[86][87]
In 2006, Blackstone launched its new long / short equity hedge fund business, Kailix Advisors. According to Blackstone, as of September 30, 2008, Kailix Advisors had $1.9 billion of assets under management. In December 2008, Blackstone announced that Kailix would be spun off to its management team to form a new fund as an independent entity backed by Blackstone.[26]
While Blackstone was active on the corporate investment side, it was also busy pursuing real estate investments. Blackstone acquired Prime Hospitality[88] and Extended Stay America in 2004. Blackstone followed these investments with the acquisition of La Quinta Inns & Suites in 2005. Blackstone's largest transaction, the buyout of Hilton Hotels Corporation occurred in 2007. Extended Stay Hotels was sold to The Lightstone Group in July 2007 and Prime Hospitality's Wellesley Inns were folded into La Quinta.[89] La Quinta Inns & Suites went public in 2014 and is now controlled by La Quinta Holdings as the parent organization.[90]
Buyout boom (2005–2007)[edit]
During the buyout boom of 2006 and 2007, Blackstone completed some of the largest leveraged buyouts. Blackstone's most notable transactions during this period included the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


TDC
2005
In December 2005, Blackstone together with a group of firms, including Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, Permira, Apax Partners and Providence Equity Partners, acquired Tele-Denmark Communications. The firms acquired the former telecom monopoly in Denmark, under the banner Nordic Telephone Company (NTC) for approximately $11 billion.
[91]


Equity Office
2006
Blackstone completes the $37.7 billion acquisition of one of the largest owners of commercial office properties in the US. At the time of its announcement, the Equity Office buyout became the largest in history, surpassing the buyout of HCA. It would later be surpassed by KKR's buyout of TXU. Vornado Realty Trust bid against Blackstone, pushing up the final price.
[92][93]


Freescale Semiconductor
2006
A consortium led by Blackstone and including the Carlyle Group, Permira and the TPG Capital completed the $17.6 billion takeover of the semiconductor company. At the time of its announcement, Freescale would be the largest leveraged buyout of a technology company ever, surpassing the 2005 buyout of SunGard. The buyers were forced to pay an extra $800 million because KKR made a last minute bid as the original deal was about to be signed. Shortly after the deal closed in late 2006, cell phone sales at Motorola Corp., Freescale's former corporate parent and a major customer, began dropping sharply. In addition, in the recession of 2008–2009, Freescale's chip sales to automakers fell off, and the company came under great financial strain.
[94][95]


Michaels
2006
Blackstone, together with Bain Capital, acquired Michaels, the largest arts and crafts retailer in North America in a $6.0 billion leveraged buyout in October 2006. Bain and Blackstone narrowly beat out Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and TPG Capital in an auction for the company.
[96]


Nielsen Holdings
2006
Blackstone together with AlpInvest Partners, Carlyle Group, Hellman & Friedman, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and Thomas H. Lee Partners acquired the global information and media company formerly known as VNU.
[97][98][99]


Orangina[100]
2006
Blackstone, together with Lion Capital acquired Orangina, the bottler, distributor and franchisor of a number of carbonated and other soft drinks in Europe from Cadbury Schweppes for €1.85 billion
[101]


Travelport
2006
Travelport, the parent of the travel web site Orbitz.com, was acquired from Cendant by Blackstone and Technology Crossover Ventures in a deal valued at $4.3 billion. The sale of Travelport followed the spin-offs of Cendant's real estate and hospitality businesses, Realogy Corporation and Wyndham Worldwide Corporation, respectively, in July 2006. (Later in the year, TPG and Silver Lake would acquire Travelport's chief competitor Sabre Holdings.) Soon after the Travelport buyout, Travelport spun off part of its subsidiary Orbitz Worldwide in an IPO and bought a Travelport competitor, Worldspan.
[102][103][104]


United Biscuits
2006
In October 2006 Blackstone, together with PAI Partners announced the acquisition of the British biscuit producer. The deal was completed in December 2006.
[105][106]


RGIS Inventory Specialists
2007
In March 2007, RGIS announced that Blackstone Group purchased a controlling interest in the company, the terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
[107]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[108]


Hilton Worldwide
2007
Blackstone acquired the premium hotel operator for approximately $26 billion, representing a 25% premium to Hilton's all-time high stock price. The Hilton deal, announced on July 3, 2007 is often referred to as the deal that marked the "high water mark" and the beginning of the end of the multi-year boom in leveraged buyouts. The company restructured its debt in 2010.
[109][110][111]


Initial public offering in 2007[edit]
In 2004, Blackstone had explored the possibility of creating a business development company (BDC), Blackridge Investments, similar to vehicles pursued by Apollo Management.[112] However, Blackstone failed to raise capital through an initial public offering that summer, and the project was shelved.[113] It also planned to raise a fund on the Amsterdam stock exchange in 2006, but its rival, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., launched a $5 billion fund there that soaked up all demand for such funds, and Blackstone abandoned its project.[114]
By the summer of 2006, Blackstone had a more ambitious goal and secretly began laying the groundwork for an IPO of the firm itself, and managed to keep the project quiet for eight or nine months.[7][115] On March 22, 2007, Blackstone filed with the SEC[10] to raise $4 billion in an initial public offering. On June 3, 2007, Blackstone announced the acquisition of Alliant Insurance Services, Inc., one of the nation's largest insurance brokerage firms.[116] On June 21, Blackstone sold a 12.3% stake in its ownership for $4.13 billion in the largest U.S. IPO since 2002. Traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol BX, Blackstone priced at $31 per share on June 22, 2007.[8][117] In July 2007, less than two weeks after the Blackstone IPO, its rival private equity firm, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, filed with the SEC.[118] In October 2009, KKR listed its shares on the Euronext exchange and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange.[119]
2008 to 2010[edit]
Since the closure of the credit markets in 2007 and 2008, Blackstone has managed to close only a small number of sizable transactions. In January 2008, Blackstone made a small co-investment alongside TPG Capital and Apollo Management in their buyout of Harrah's Entertainment, although that transaction had been announced during the buyout boom period. Other notable investments that Blackstone completed in 2008 and 2009 included AlliedBarton, Performance Food Group,[120][121] Apria Healthcare and CMS Computers.
Among the firm's two largest investments since the buyout boom have been The Weather Channel and the announced acquisition of Busch Entertainment. In July 2008, Blackstone, together with NBC Universal and Bain Capital agreed to purchase The Weather Channel from Landmark Communications.[122][123] In October 2009, Anheuser-Busch InBev announced the sale of its Busch Entertainment Corporation theme parks division to Blackstone for $2.7 billion.[124][125] The Financial Times reported that Merlin Entertainments owned by Blackstone Group will file an IPO[126] in the 2nd quarter of 2010. Merlin will be listed on the London Stock Exchange. If true this would be the second of 8 reported IPOs Blackstone plans,[127] the first being Team Health Holdings, Inc.[128] Blackstone reported at the end of 2009 revenues of $1.8bln, compared to -$349mln revenues in 2008.[129] On August 13, 2010 Blackstone announced it would buy Dynegy, an energy firm, for nearly $5 billion.[130]
In 2010, Blackstone Alternative Asset Management, received Institutional Investor magazine's 8th Annual Hedge Fund Industry award for Large Fund of Hedge Funds of the Year.[131]
Investments since 2011[edit]

In February 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired 588 malls of Centro's U.S. shopping centers for $9.4 billion. Centro's Australian continues their operation independently.[132]
In August 2011 Blackstone Group LP bought Medical-Biller Emdeon Inc. for around $3 billion. Since Blackstone Group LP was the world's biggest private-equity firm, tender offer of Emdeon Inc. public company should be done with a cash payment of $19 a share, a 44 percent premium.[133]
In late 2011 Blackstone Group LP acquired the German outdoor company Jack Wolfskin. Blackstone moved some of its accounting functions to India.
In 2012, Blackstone was part of a consortium that financed Knight Capital after a software glitch threatened Knight's ability to continue operations.
In October 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired G6 Hospitality better known as Motel 6 & Studio 6 motels for 1.9 billion.
In November 2012, the Blackstone Group acquired a controlling interest in Vivint, Vivint Solar, and 2GIG Technologies.[134]
In April 2013, the company confirmed that it backed out of the proposed Dell buyout.[135]
In September 2013, Blackstone announced a strategic investment in ThoughtFocus Technologies LLC, a leading IT Service provider. The investment will establish the 'Blackstone Center of Excellence', an IT outsourcing and offshore delivery center, to provide technology and other administrative service.[136]
In August 2013 Blackstone bought Strategic Partners, manager of secondaryfunds, from CreditSuisse, with which Blackstone is raising its 6th fund, targeting $4 billion.[137]
In February 2014, Blackstone purchased a 20 percent stake in the Italian luxury brand Versace for €150 million.[138][139]
In April 2014 Blackstone's charitable arm, the Blackstone Charitable Foundation, donated $4 million to create the Blackstone Entrepreneurs Network in Colorado. The program encourages increased collaboration among local business leaders with the goal of retaining high-growth companies in the state.[140]
In May 2014, Blackstone Group purchased the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas resort from Deutsche Bank for $1.73 billion.[141]
In August 2014, Blackstone Group was in advanced talks to acquire Royal Dutch Shell Plc (RDSA)'s 50 percent stake in a shale-gas field in Louisiana. Blackstone would pay about $1.2 billion for Shell’s half-interest in the Haynesville formation.[142]
In January 2015, Blackstone announced it would sell a Sydney-based office building to Dalian Wanda Group for around $327 million.[143]
In April 2015, Blackstone announced it would acquire Excel Trust Inc, a real estate investment trust, for around $2 billion.[144]
In October 2015, Blackstone agreed to purchase BioMed Realty Trust Inc for a sum of around $8 billion.[145]
In November 2015, Blackstone Group agreed to sell facility management firm GCA Services Group Inc to a consortium of Goldman Sachs’ private equity arm and Thomas H. Lee Partners.[146]
As of Q4 2015, the firm is in talks to sell of some of its trophy office assets in the Los Angeles market. Douglas Emmett Inc. is in advanced talks to purchase four buildings for more than $1 billion. The buildings total 1.7 million square feet and are located in the Westwood area.[147]
On February 10, 2017, Aon PLC agreed to sell its human resources outsourcing platform for $4.3 billion to Blackstone Group L.P., creating a new company.[148]
On June 19, 2017, Blackstone acquired the majority interest in The Office Group, valuing the whole company at $640 million.[149]

Self-dealing[edit]
In 2013, Bloomberg uncovered how the Blackstone Group was self-dealing after its affiliate GSO Capital Partners purchased debt and credit default swaps in Codere SA, a Spanish betting, online gambling and gaming company.[150]

In the first half of 2013, Blackstone GSO and another firm later purchased a €100 million bank loan (via secondary markets) that Codere already had on the books, and then convinced Codere to delay repayment on the debt related to the aforementioned credit default swaps. That delay triggered the CDS, resulting in upwards of $18.7 million in profit for GSO.[151]

The GSO director defended the move with "Codere (working with us...) had to trigger the credit default swaps, as it was the only way to compel certain bondholders to negotiate." and blamed credit default swap investors for their loss:

Unlike Blackstone, who invested directly into Codere, these financial investors [of hedge funds using credit default swaps] were not aligned with the interests of Codere, but instead through their use of credit default swaps, were betting on when the Company would default[...]having no interest in the outcome of the game.[151]

See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of outdoor industry parent companies
List of venture capital firms

References[edit]


^ Stephen Schwarzman speaks with Betty Liu and Erik Schatzke on "In the Loop" (April 16, 2015). Schwarzman Says Fundraising Environment Is 'Remarkable' (Television production). Bloomberg. Event occurs at 00:22 minutes in. Retrieved March 16, 2016. You've got assets now at three hundred billion dollars. 
^ "Blackstone Reports Third Quarter Results" (PDF). The Blackstone Group. January 31, 2013. Archived from the original (PDF) on October 30, 2014. 
^ a b Wiliam Alden (April 18, 2013). "Public Offering Values SeaWorld at $2.5 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 19, 2013. 
^ "The Blackstone Group". The New York Times. Retrieved 12 January 2016. 
^ Kim, Soyoung (September 19, 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 2013-03-23. 
^ a b Blackstone Group: Private Equity Archived February 4, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website). See also: Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. (company website), Team (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20
^ a b c Blackstone Said to Prepare for I.P.O. New York Times, March 16, 2007
^ a b Anderson, Jenny. "Blackstone Founders Prepare to Count Their Billions." New York Times, June 12, 2007.
^ "Blackstone - Our Offices overview". Blackstone. 
^ a b c d e f g h i The Blackstone Group L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 22, 2007
^ New bosses, new rules. Los Angeles Times, August 12, 2007
^ a b Data collected from Preqin, a private equity database system
^ a b A trash hauler is buying a much bigger rival, a type of deal that makes Wall Street a bit nervous. New York Times, March 9, 1999
^ Equity Firm Attracted to Attractions. New York Times, March 6, 2007
^ Blackstone Private Equity Investment by Transaction Size (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Kim, Soyoung; Roumeliotis, Greg (9 September 2012). "Blackstone buys security firm Vivint for over $2 billion". Reuters. Retrieved 4 January 2013. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Overview. (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 6, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ a b "Blackstone amasses more capital for latest Europe RE pool". AltAssets. 20 December 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-20. 
^ Blackstone Real Estate Investment Portfolio ( at company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Alex Hawkes "Blackstone denies blame for Southern Cross's plight" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Nils Pratley "Was Southern Cross always sickly underneath?" The Guardian, Thursday 2 June 2011
^ Karmin, Craig (August 12, 2013). "Blackstone to Buy Stakes in Apartment Complexes From GE Unit". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Alden, William (December 8, 2014). "Blackstone to Sell California Office Buildings for $3.5 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 2014-12-19. 
^ Blackstone to Buy GSO Capital. New York Times, January 10, 2008
^ Blackstone to Buy Hedge Fund to Strengthen Credit Operations. New York Times, January 11, 2008
^ a b Blackstone To Rationalize Single Manager Hedge Funds Businesses In Efficiency Move. Press Release, December 23, 2008
^ Schwarzman Unbowed. Bloomberg Markets, March 2009
^ Blackstone Financial Advisory: Selected Clients (company website). Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived February 16, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Moore, Heidi N. (December 12, 2008). "GM Hires Blackstone". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2008-12-12. 
^ "Blackstoin Restructuring & Reorganization: Selected Transactions". (Company website) Accessed 10/20/2012
^ Blackstone: Private Placement Advisory Overview (The Park Hill Group). Company website, Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Park Hill Group: About Us. Company website, Accessed 2011-1-26
^ Moyer, Liz. "Hitting A Brick Wall". Forbes. May 18, 2006.
^ a b "John Studzinski Joins Blackstone". The Blackstone Group. May 18, 2006.
^ Wachman, Richard. "Cracking the Studzinski code". The Observer. October 7, 2006.
^ John Studzinski CBE. FT Business of Luxury Summit, 30 May – 1 June 2012. Financial Times. 2012.
^ About John Studzinski. John Studzinski's blog.
^ "Blackstone to list advisory arm early 2015". Financial Times. October 2014.
^ Dezember, Ryan. "Blackstone Group to Spin Off Financial Advisory Business". Wall Street Journal. October 10, 2014.
^ Blackstone – History: 2014. Blackstone. Blackstone.com. Retrieved March 30, 2015.
^ Roumeliotis, Greg and Paritosh Bansal. "UPDATE 4-Blackstone gives up its roots in advisory unit spin-off". Reuters. October 10, 2014.
^ a b John Studzinski – Official profile, Blackstone.
^ "E.U. Estrangement Before The Divorce (a.k.a Volatility)". Fund Portfolio Management. January 23, 2015.
^ David Carey and John E. Morris, King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone (Crown 2010), pp. 45–56
^ Private equity power list: #1 The Blackstone Group. Fortune, July 2, 2007
^ Blackstone etymology. The Deal, June 26, 2007
^ Alden, William. "Blackstone's Chief Has a Warning for Wall Street's Entrepreneurs". DealBook. Retrieved 2017-01-27. 
^ Hutton-Shearson Deal Announced". New York Times, December 4, 1987.
^ "Hutton Sets Fees". New York Times, December 9, 1987
^ King of Capital, pp. 45-56
^ A Big Fund Ready to Capitalize on Hard Times. New York Times, November 13, 1987
^ "Mortgage Unit Leaders To Join Blackstone". New York Times, March 4, 1988
^ "Nikko Acquires 20% of Blackstone Group". New York Times, December 13, 1988
^ King of Capital, pp. 144–147
^ "Stockman Forming Own Buyout Concern". New York Times, September 17, 1999
^ "Stockman Is Charged With Fraud". New York Times, March 27, 2007
^ "Sony and CBS Records: What a Romance!". New York Times, September 18, 1988
^ "CNW Accepts Buyout Bid From Blackstone Group". New York Times, June 7, 1989
^ "2 Wall Street Firms Join To Buy Savings Units". New York Times, May 12, 1989
^ U.S. Mergers Firm Is Forming British Link. New York Times, April 23, 1990
^ Chairman Is Named For Blackstone Unit. New York Times, April 5, 1991
^ Prime to Sell Interest in Inns to Blackstone. New York Times, May 24, 1990
^ Blackstone Unit to Buy Days Inns. New York Times, October 1, 1991
^ Hospitality to Acquire Super 8 Motels. New York Times, February 17, 1993
^ The Loewen Group and Blackstone Capital Partners form corporate venture to acquire Prime Succession. Business Wire, June 17, 1996. Accessed 2009-02-20.
^ Loewen And Blackstone To Make Joint Purchase. New York Times, June 18, 1996
^ Loewen Buys Big Cemetery, And Its Suitor Criticizes Deal. New York Times, September 21, 1996
^ Blackstone Raises $4 Billion for Fund. New York Times, October 10, 1997
^ Red-Hot Revival in Real Estate; Overheating Is Feared With Surge in Vulture Investing. New York Times, November 6, 1997
^ A.I.G. Will Put $1.35 Billion Into Blackstone. New York Times, July 31, 1998
^ Blackstone to Form a New Financing Unit. New York Times, April 8, 1999
^ King of Capital, pp. 145-146
^ King of Capital, pp. 148–155
^ Cube, Christine (Nov 25, 2002). "Watergate Hotel For Sale". Washington Business Journal. 
^ Staff Report (Aug 19, 2004). "Monument Realty Buys Watergate Hotel". Commercial Real Estate Direct. 
^ "Blackstone Acquires Debt on 7 World Trade Center". Business Wire. October 17, 2000. 
^ Photographed at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland in January 2008.
^ Blackstone Amasses a Record Equity Fund. New York Times, July 17, 2002
^ Vivendi Finishes Sale of Houghton Mifflin To Investors. New York Times, January 1, 2003
^ Sender, Henny. "At Blackstone, James Builds A Following". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 March 2007. 
^ King of Capital, pp. 176, 197, 206-207
^ Blackstone Group May Purchase Auto Parts Business From TRW. New York Times, November 13, 2002
^ Blackstone Buys Majority Stake in Columbia House. New York Times, May 15, 2002
^ A Split-Up of Insurers of Bonds Is Considered. New York Times, February 16, 2008
^ King of Capital, p. 225
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal." Bloomberg L.P., March 29, 2005
^ Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?. New York Times, April 3, 2005
^ The Blackstone Group to Acquire Prime Hospitality Corp. Press Release, August 18, 2004. Accessed 2009-02-20 Archived March 8, 2005, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Private-Equity Firm Sees Room for Value in Hotels. Wall Street Journal, August 17, 2005
^ http://ir.lq.com/Cache/1500058950.PDF?Y=&O=PDF&D=&FID=1500058950&T=&IID=4424891
^ Equity Firms Buy Danish Phone Company. New York Times, December 1, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 239–254
^ Blackstone's Bid for Equity Office Prevails New York Times, February 8, 2007
^ King of Capital, 231-235
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Flynn, Laurie J. "Blackstone Alliance to Buy Chip Maker for $17.6 Billion." New York Times, September 16, 2006
^ Consortium Buys Michaels for $6 Billion. New York Times, July 1, 2006
^ VNU Shareholders Reject $8.9 Bln Offer From KKR Group. Bloomberg, March 8, 2006
^ Buyout Bid For Parent Of Nielsen. New York Times, January 17, 2006
^ VNU Agrees To Public Offer From Private Equity Group. Press Release, March 8, 2006
^ "Company News Headlines". NASDAQ.com. June 2, 2011. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Cadbury Sells Beverage Unit to Two Firms. New York Times, November 22, 2005
^ King of Capital, pp. 314-318
^ Sachdev, Ameet. " Orbitz travels to 4th owner: Blackstone Group to buy from Cendant.", Chicago Tribune, July 1, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Fineman, Josh. "Cendant to sell Orbitz to Blackstone for $4.3 Bln", Bloomberg.com, June 30, 2006. Accessed September 15, 2007.
^ Parkinson, Gary (October 26, 2006). "Private-equity companies snap up United Biscuits in a £1.6bn deal". The Independent. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ "Blackstone and PAI complete purchase of UB" (Press release). United Biscuits. December 15, 2006. Archived from the original on September 27, 2007. Retrieved 2007-04-12. 
^ [1]. RGIS Press Release, March, 21st 2007
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer." New York Times, June 8, 2007.
^ Blackstone to Buy Hilton Hotels for $26 Billion. New York Times, July 4, 2007
^ High-Water Mark. New York Times, July 4, 2008
^ King of Capital, pp. 299–300
^ Private Firms Use Closed-End Funds to Tap the Market. New York Times, April 17, 2004
^ Blackstone Group Postpones Fund Offering. New York Times, July 16, 2004
^ King of Capital, pp. 221–223
^ King of Capital, pp. 255–267
^ Alliant Insurance Services, Inc. to be acquired by Blackstone and Management, June 3, 2007 Archived March 4, 2016, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and de la Merced, Michael J. "News Analysis Behind the Veil at Blackstone? Probably Another Veil." New York Times, March 19, 2007.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ KKR lists on Euronext; NYSE is next. Reuters, October 1, 2009[dead link]
^ Equity Firms Acquiring Food Supplier. Bloomberg, January 19, 2008
^ Blackstone, Wellspring to acquire Performance Food Group in $1.3bn deal. AltAssets, January 18, 2008 Archived June 11, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Michael J. de la Merced (July 7, 2008). "Weather Channel Is Sold to NBC and Equity Firms". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-09-17. 
^ Robert Marich. "The Weather Channel Sale Wraps". Broadcasting & Cable. Archived from the original on September 15, 2008. Retrieved 2008-09-26. 
^ Blackstone to buy A-B InBev's theme parks for $2.7 billion. MarketWatch, Oct. 7, 2009
^ InBev may sell US theme parks. Boston Globe, July 16, 2008[dead link]
^ "Blackstone's Merlin Entertainment to Go Public in '10, FT Says". Bloomberg. October 23, 2009. 
^ "Blackstone plans portfolio IPOs: source". Reuters. October 12, 2009. 
^ Wahba, Phil (October 6, 2009). "Blackstone-owned hospital staffing company files IPO". Reuters. 
^ Opalesque (26 February 2010). "Blackstone revenues in 2009 show strong bounce back from 2008". 
^ "Finance after the crisis: Survival of the richest". The Economist. The Economist Newspaper Limited. 396 (8696): 59. 21–27 August 2010. 
^ [2] Hedge Fund Industry Awards, The 8th Annual Hedge Fund Awards, Retrieved June 2011
^ Whitley, Angus; Saminather, Nichola (February 28, 2011). "Blackstone Said to Acquire Centro's U.S. Shopping Centers for $9.4 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ Nussbaum, Alex; Kelly, Jason (August 4, 2011). "Blackstone Group Agrees to Acquire Medical-Biller Emdeon for $3 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ De, Michael J. "The Blackstone Group News". New York Times. Retrieved 2013-01-29. 
^ Jolie O'Dell, VentureBeat. "Blackstone just backed out of its proposed Dell buyout." April 19, 2013. Retrieved on April 19, 2013.
^ Blackstone Announces Strategic Investment in ThoughtFocus Technologie. Wall Street Journal (2013-09-30). Retrieved on 2013-12-06.
^ Ryan, Dezember (April 24, 2014). "Bargain Bin Is Now Big Deal". WSJ. Retrieved 29 April 2014. 
^ Versace deal with Blackstone values group at 1 billion euros, Reuters, February 26, 2014
^ Zargani, Luisa (27 February 2014). "Versace Sells Minority Stake to Blackstone". Women's Wear Daily. Retrieved 27 February 2014. 
^ Vuong, Andy (April 20, 2014). "Blackstone grants $4 million to create Colorado entrepreneurs network". The Denver Post. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Arno Schuetze & Edward Taylor (May 15, 2014). "Deutsche Bank sells casino to Blackstone for $1.7 billion". Reuters. 
^ By David Carey, Bloomberg. "[3]." August 10, 2014. August 13, 2014.
^ Blackstone to sell prime Sydney property to Dalian Wanda for $327 million. Reuters, 26 January 2015
^ "Blackstone to buy Excel Trust for about $2 billion" (Press release). Reuters. 10 April 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to buy BioMed Realty in $8 billion deal". Reuters. 8 October 2015. 
^ "Blackstone to sell GCA Services to Thomas Lee, Goldman Sachs". Reuters. 16 November 2015. 
^ Brown, Eliot (24 November 2015). "Blackstone in Talks to Sell Four Los Angeles Office Towers". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2015-12-05. 
^ Jamerson, Joshua (February 10, 2017), Blackstone to Buy Aon’s Human Resources Outsourcing Platform for $4.3 Billion, New York City: The Wall Street Journal, retrieved February 12, 2017 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/uk-officegroup-m-a-blackstone-idUKKBN19A1J4
^ Stephanie Ruhle; Mary Childs; Julie Miecamp (22 October 2013). "Blackstone Unit Wins in No-Lose Codere Trade: Corporate Finance". Bloomberg News. 
^ a b Dan Primack (5 December 2013). "Blackstone responds to Jon Stewart". finance.fortune.cnn.com. 




David Carey, John E. Morris (2010). King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall, and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone.
The Making of a Wise Man. New York Times, November 28, 2004


External links[edit]

Official website







v
t
e


The Blackstone Group



Founders



Peter George Peterson
Stephen A. Schwarzman





Business Services



CMS Computers
RGIS
SunGard (minority shareholder)





Consumer/Retail



Michaels (Joint Control)
Performance Food Group
Pinnacle Foods
United Biscuits





Financial Services



BankUnited (minority stake)
HealthMarkets (minority stake)
FGIC (minority stake)





Healthcare



Biomet
Emcure Pharmaceuticals (investment)
Vanguard Health Systems





Industrial



Freescale (Joint Control)
Klöckner Pentaplast
TRW Automotive (Control)





Media/Telecommunications



eAccess (investment)
Nielsen Holdings (minority stake)
Axtel (minority stake)
Deutsche Telekom (minority stake)
TDC (minority stake)
The Weather Channel (minority stake)





Travel & Leisure



Hilton Worldwide
Center Parcs Europe (freehold)
Caesars Entertainment Corporation (minority stake)
Merlin Entertainments (minority stake)
SeaWorld Entertainment
Tragus Group
Travelport





Real estate



Extended Stay America (minority stake)
Equity Office
Luxury Resorts (LXR)
La Quinta Inns & Suites












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


The Weather Channel



Network information
and ownership



History
Landmark Communications (former)
NBCUniversal
Bain Capital
The Blackstone Group
List of meteorologists
International presence
Local on the 8s





Programs (list)





Live programs




AMHQ
PM Edition
Weather Center Live
Weather Geeks
Weather Underground
Weekend Recharge






Recorded programs




23.5° with Sam Champion
3 Scientists Walk Into a Bar
100 Biggest Weather Moments (2007 miniseries)
American Super/Natural
Fat Guys in the Woods
Highway Thru Hell
Natural Born Monsters
Prospectors
Raging Nature
Secrets of the Earth
So You Think You'd Survive?
Strangest Weather on Earth
Storm Stories
Tornado Alley
Weather Caught on Camera
Weather Gone Viral
Why Planes Crash








Weather Stars



III
4000
XL
IntelliStar





Related operations



Local Now
Weatherscan





Albums



The Best of Smooth Jazz
Smooth Jazz II










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=The_Blackstone_Group&oldid=788560248"					
Categories: Blackstone GroupCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies established in 1985Investment banks in the United StatesPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Good articlesPages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2011All articles containing potentially dated statements 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàDeutschEestiفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaTürkçe中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 03:13.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 

















 























 



 Blackstone Completes Acquisition of Centro Properties Group US 
         










    










 






 











 









Blackstone Completes Acquisition of Centro Properties Group US

		  -  POSITIONS COMPANY TO DRIVE LEASING AND REDEVELOPMENT EFFORTS -
		

Jun 28, 2011, 14:18 ET
		  		  				
									 from   Centro Properties Group 











 
















































 

 




















 


NEW YORK, June 28, 2011 /PRNewswire/ -- BRE Retail Holdings Inc., an affiliate of Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. ("Blackstone"), today announced that it has closed the previously announced transaction to purchase the US assets and platform of Centro Properties Group and its managed funds (the "Company") for approximately $9.0 billion.  Included in the sale are 585 community and neighborhood shopping centers and related retail assets aggregating 92.1 million square feet across 39 states in the United States, as well as the Company's US property management platform comprising 18 offices and approximately 600 employees. 
The Company is the second largest owner of community and neighborhood shopping centers in the United States and has been a leader in redevelopment over the last decade.  It is the largest landlord (by gross leasable area) to The TJX Companies, The Kroger Company, Ahold USA, Dollar Tree, Inc. and Staples, Inc.  With this transaction, the Company is positioned to actively manage its portfolio, shifting from asset preservation to growth.  It anticipates directing additional financial resources towards fully re-engaging its proven redevelopment program.  
Michael Carroll, the current Chief Executive Officer of Centro Properties Group US, as well as the six additional members of the Company's Management Committee, will continue at the Company.  "This transaction is indicative of the strength of the Company's US platform, including the high quality and diversification of its asset base and operating capabilities," commented Carroll. "We are fortunate to have such a sophisticated investor as Blackstone as our partner.  Together, we look forward to building a premier retail real estate company."
He continued, "We are now capitalized to aggressively lease and reposition space and to support our retailers' growth strategies. When combined with the scale and breadth of our portfolio, there are few landlords as well positioned to be long-term partners with our retailers."
"We are extremely excited about this transaction, which enables us to expand our retail real estate presence with a leading platform," added A.J. Agarwal, Senior Managing Director of The Blackstone Group.  "The Company is well-positioned today with an attractive portfolio comprised of strategically located assets in dense, infill markets with productive grocer anchors.  We look forward to partnering with the Company's experienced management team to help them pursue the growth opportunity embedded within this portfolio." 
Blackstone's financial advisers were Wells Fargo, Deutsche Bank Securities and Barclays Capital and its legal advisers were Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP, DLA Piper, and Gilbert + Tobin.
About Centro Properties Group US:
Centro Properties Group US is one of the premier real estate companies in the United States focusing on the ownership and management of community and neighborhood shopping centers. As a comprehensive real estate company, it manages a national portfolio of 585 properties aggregating approximately 92.1 million square feet of gross leasable area, including 37 properties held through joint ventures. The portfolio is strategically located across 39 states and is primarily grocery or name-brand discount chain anchored. Centro Properties Group US is headquartered in New York, New York with multiple regional and local offices across the United States. Further information is available at www.centroprop.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
This press release may contain forward-looking statements and information within the meaning of the federal securities laws. All statements other than statements of historical fact are forward looking statements and include statements with respect to the Companies' beliefs, plans, objectives, goals, targets, expectations, anticipations, assumptions, estimates, intentions and future performance. You can identify these forward-looking statements through the Companies' use of words such as "believe," "anticipate," "expect," "may," "will," "assume," "should," "predict," "could," "should," "would," "intend," "target," "estimate," "project," "plan," "potential" and other similar words and expressions of the future or otherwise regarding the outlook for the Companies' future business and financial performance.  Such forward-looking statements are provided for your information only, and no reliance should be placed on them.  Forward looking information necessarily involves significant elements of subjective judgment, assumptions as to future events and analysis, which may or may not be correct, and is subject to inherent risks and uncertainties. There are usually differences between projected and actual results and these are often material. Each recipient should satisfy itself having regard to its own judgment, analysis and assessment as to future matters. This press release speaks only as of its date. 
 SOURCE  Centro Properties Group  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.centroprop.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  












Oct 15, 2007, 01:00 ET
Preview: Centro Announces Enhancements To US Platform






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 














Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. in New York, NY - (212) 583-5000






























 

Enter company name












Home


Favorites


Lists


Employers by Major


Employ Veterans


Locations


Blog


Sign In





















                            The Most Advanced Company Information Database
                        





















 








Enter company name



Op. city,state,zip,county














 






Companies

 




Lists






 








Enter company name



Op. city,state,zip,county














 






Companies

 




Industries

 
 




Lists















Home

 




My Favorites
My Favorites





Lists





List Builder





Employers by Major





Employ Veterans





Locations





Industries





Blogs







X
You must be a subscriber!


This feature is available to paying subscribers only. 

Click here to learn about our subscription plans.
            



















Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.

























Action 


Add to List
Add to Favorites
Share
































        Contact Information
    




Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.



345 Park Ave
New York, NY 10154






Contact:
Stephen A Schwarzman


Title:
Chief Executive Officer


Phone:


                        212-583-5000
                    



Website:

www.blackstone.com







There are 

228
                Companies located at 345 Park Ave, New York, NY 10154
            












 














            Map
        





View larger map









            Business Description
        



Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. is located in New York, New York. This organization primarily operates in the Financial Management for Business business / industry within the Engineering, Accounting, Research, and Management Services sector. This organization has been operating for approximately 15 years. Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. is estimated to generate $98.4 million in annual revenues, and employs approximately 20,000 people at this single location.









Sector:

Engineering, Accounting, Research, and Management Services



Category:

Management Services



Industry:

Financial Management for Business

Rental Agent, Real Estate




SIC Code:

8741, 6531











Name:
Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.


Year Founded:


2002






Location Type:
Single


Revenue:

$ 98,438,540



Employees:

20,000



Facility Size:

N/A



* Revenue & Employees are estimates









Demographics for Zipcode 10154






Percentage Population



0
White
0
Hispanic
0
Black
0
Asian
0
Native American
0
Hawaiian
0
Other


0 %
White
0 %
Hispanic
0 %
Black
0 %
Asian
0 %
Native American
0 %
Hawaiian
0 %
Other













Population




Population 
0




Female%0


Male%0




Median Age

0.0




Female0.0


Male0.0






























Questions & Answers









Who is the CEO of Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.?





The CEO of Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. is Stephen A Schwarzman.







Are there other companies located at 345 Park Ave, New York, NY?





There are 228 commercial tenants at 345 Park Ave, New York, NY.







What are the annual sales for Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.?





Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. generates approximately $98.4 million in annual sales.









What is the phone number for Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.?





The phone number for Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. is (212) 583-5000







Where is Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. located?





Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. is located at 345 Park Ave, New York, NY 10154.







What is the internet address for Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.?





The website (URL) for Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. is www.blackstone.com.







Is there a key contact at Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.?





Stephen A Schwarzman is the Chief Executive Officer at Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.. You can contact Stephen at (212) 583-5000.







How big is Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.?





Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. is estimated to generate $98.4 million in annual revenues, and employs approximately 20,000 people at this location.







How many people work at Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P.?





Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. has approximately 20,000 employees at this location.







How long has Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. been in business?





Blackstone Real Estate Partners VI L.P. has been in business for approximately 15 years.










 

































Generate 
More Revenue 
with 
Buzzfile 











Uncover and contact more high-value prospects in less time than with any other resource





Information on 18 million companies, 50 million contacts, 6 million buildings & 18,000 industries





Complete list of businesses in any building





Advanced search, filtering and list-building





































Nearby Resources









                        Restaurant
                    




                        Coffee
                    




                        Parking
                    






                        Hotel
                    




                        Taxi
                    




                        Pharmacy
                    






                        Bank
                    




                        Gas
                    




                        Grocery
                    


















Statistics for Zipcode 10154






Average House Value


                                $ 0
                            



Average Household Income


                                $ 0
                            



Number of Households

0



Persons per Household

0.00













Number of Businesses

231



Number of Employees

0



Land Area (square miles)

0.005



Water Area (square miles)

0.000



















×
Save as List






List Name





Classification

General Interest
Personal
Prospect
Trade / Industry




List Type

Companies
Places
Contacts




Description





Upload Image




X



Who can access this list?



Public - Everyone can view and edit (appears in search results)





Pre-approve members with following email domain(s):

Domains





Add







Remove





Can members edit this list?



                                    Yes
                                




                                    No
                                




                                        I will decide for each user / group
                                    



Username





Add








Remove












                                                Location
                                            







                                                    This list covers companies throughout the entire U.S.
                                                




                                                    This list covers a specific geographic area (you can select more than one state, city…)
                                                


City






County






State






Zipcode





Area Code





Add





Type
Criteria







Remove











                                                Sector, Category & Industry
                                            





                                                Control the types of companies that can be added to this list.
                                            

Sector

 



Category

 



Industry

 



SIC Code

 



Add





Type
Criteria







Remove



























Add to List






Add to Existing List












Create a new list



Cancel
Save
















×
Sign In




Not a member? Register Now 




Username





Password











                                        Remember me
                                    


Forgot Password?

















×
Subscriber Not Found




Not a subscriber? Contact Buzzfile Now.



                        We could not locate a subscriber with that email or username.
                        Try signing in with a different username or email, or Telecom support at [email protected] or 212-913-9151.
                    




Username





Password





















Remove Company Confirmation



I confirm that I, , with email address  am an owner, employee or representative, with authorization to approve the removal of the profile for:




I authorize Buzzfile to release my contact and other pertinent information to the necessary parties should this removal be contested.
I am requesting to remove this company profile.


Dear , 
Your request to remove the company profile has been denied for:




You are only permitted to claim ownership and remove one company profile. You have previously claimed ownership and removed the profile for:




You can contact us at [email protected] with any questions.



Cancel


















About Us


Partnerships


Terms of Use


Privacy Policy


Remove Company


Contact Us







 
 






















 
 




        Copyright © 2017 Buzzfile Media LLC. All Rights Reserved.
    

            45 Broadway, Ste 1420, New York, NY 10006
        












×
Error








Close










Alert






Close






























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Blackstone at the Cannery | New Homes in Hayward, CA | TRI Pointe Homes








































 














 


Northern California > Hayward
           > Blackstone at the Cannery
        

 



















View Gallery 



Now Selling
Blackstone at the Cannery





BlackstoneParks and RecreationSouthgate ParkCentennial ParkCannery ParkAlden E Oliver Sports ParkCity of Tracy Sports ComplexHayward PlungeGrocery and ServicesSafewayLucky's SupermarketsCostcoTargetHayward Public LibraryChase BankWells Fargo BankBank of AmericaUnited States Post OfficeThe Home DepotStarbucksEon CoffeeHayward AmtrakShopping Dining EntertainingSouthland MallUnion LandingCentury TheaterStonebraeMission Hills of Hayword Golf CourseBijou RestaurantVal's BurgerBuffalo Bill's BreweryEmergency and MedicalHayward PoliceHayword FirestationSaint Rose HospitalSaint Francis Urgent CareSchoolsBurbank Elementary SchoolWinton Middle SchoolHayward High School





 


Priced from the Low $600,000's
Here at Blackstone, it’s all about location, location, location.
Blackstone at The Cannery is perfectly located in the heart of the Bay Area for easy commuting to Silicon Valley and San Francisco. And just across the street, there’s an elementary school and an expansive park in which kids (and adults!) can play. Downtown Hayward, just a few minutes away, is enjoying an exciting revitalization with some great new restaurant additions.
These attached and detached single-family homes with private 2-car garages offer convenient living for active lifestyles.
 

Well-designed attached and detached homes with up to four bedrooms.
Living space ranging from approximately 1,344 to 1,995 square feet.
Balconies, porches and decks.
Located close to major freeways and bridges.
Lots of shopping choices, restaurants, offices and entertainment venues.



Location199 Burbank Street, Hayward, CA 94541

 Office Hours

Open Daily from 10 am - 6 pm



 


 Add to favorites
 Share
 Download Brochure
 Print
 Monthly Payment





Contact our New Home Specialist, Mariessa


(925) 804-2262NewHomesNorCal@TriPointeHomes.comBRE# 01733968Call for an AppointmentNew Home Gallery: (510) 340-9090 




Join the interest list 



 By providing your contact information, you consent to receive periodic emails, phone calls, text messages and other communications from us.  For mobile phones, standard text message and data charges apply. Consult our Privacy Policy for additional information, including unsubscribe options.














 

Mortgage Payment Calculator*
Your actual rate, payment, and costs could be higher. Get an official Loan Estimate before choosing a loan.




Enter Your Mortgage Amount $



Interest Rate (%)**




Amortization Period


1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
15 Years
25 Years
30 Years




Payment Frequency


Monthly
Semi-monthly
Weekly
Bi-weekly






**Assumptions. You are purchasing a single family home and primary residence. Rate is fixed. Debt-to-income ratio is less than 41% and excellent credit. These assumptions are subject to change without notice.




Your monthly payment would be*
$1750


Apply Here
*This mortgage calculator is for illustrative purposes only and is not a guarantee. The monthly payment illustration on this tool does not include amounts for property taxes, insurance premiums, homeowner’s association dues, or other factors that potentially could affect your monthly payment. Therefore, your actual monthly payment will be higher. Interest rates change frequently and without notice. Financing availability and terms will depend on your situation.




 

 

See all 45 photos

 

          Image 1 of 45




  
 

 


Floorplans for Blackstone at the Cannery Single-Family Detached



 


Residence 1
Starting from the high $700,000's
Single-Family Detached
Two Story, 3 Bedrooms, 2.5 Baths, Approximately 1,692 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage





 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 9




  
 


Residence 2
Starting from the high $700,000's
Single-Family Detached
Three Story, 3 Bedroom, Den, 3.5 Baths, 
Optional Bedroom 4 with Full Bath 
Approximately 1,922 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 7




  
 


Residence 3
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Detached
Three Story, 4 Bedrooms, 4 Baths, 
Optional Pocket Office, Optional Eat-In Kitchen Island
Approximately 1,995 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 8




  




*Prices subject to change


 


Floorplans for Blackstone at the Cannery Single-Family Attached



 


Residence 1
Starting from the low $600,000's
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 2 Bedrooms, 2.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,344 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage




 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 3




  
 


Residence 2
Sold Out
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 2.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,326 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 3




  
 


Residence 3
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 3.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,723 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 11




  
 


Residence 4
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 3.5 Baths, 
Approximately 1,716 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 3




  
 


Residence 5
Starting from the high $600,000's
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, Den, 4 Baths
Optional Bedroom Suite
Approximately 1,716 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 7




  
 


Residence 6
Temporarily Unavailable
Single-Family Attached
Three Story, 3 Bedrooms, 3.5 Baths
Approximately 1,915 Sq. Ft.
2 - Car Garage



 Download PDF
Interactive Floorplan


 

          Image 1 of 8




  




*Prices subject to change




Log in to add to Favorites
Log In

Create An Account




Share Blackstone at the Cannery




 






Explore the Area




 











 













 








Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft



















realestate | us.alhea.com
















 






















 

















X













 


				Cookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookies.
Learn more
Got it


Ads related to realestate


			No results were found for the search term: realestate        We suggest that you:

Check the spelling of your term.
Try a different word (a synonym of the original term you entered).
Try a more general term.


Social Sites for Realestatekapre.comdre.ca.govdpr.delaware.govrealtor.orgcentury21.comwilmingtonde.govintracoastalrealty.comrealestatece.com

				Web Results			



What’s Up Next in New York?
nytimes.com
Distant neighborhoods could become hot. Rent regulation is a question.



Home of the week update
latimes.com
A classic Tudor, with a surprise



Marc Anthony adds an address in Tarzana
latimes.com
Homes, wives, family rooms, ranges – who can keep up with Marc Anthony?



‘Piggyback’ Loans Revisited
nytimes.com
Many of the loans are now aimed at those with higher net worth.



Paying for Smoke Detectors
nytimes.com
Questions about who pays for smoke detectors; buying a rental building; and responsibility for roof repairs.



Looser Credit for Home Buyers
nytimes.com
Credit is becoming more available thanks to reduced F.H.A. insurance premiums and new programs from Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.



Townhouse Turnaround 
nytimes.com
A fully renovated 1840 townhouse at 460 West 22nd Street sold for $16 million.



REALESTATE: Block by Block | Ditmas Park
nytimes.com
Leafy streets and idiosyncratic houses distinguish the Brooklyn neighborhood of Ditmas Park.



REALESTATE: Block by Block | Jackson Heights
nytimes.com
The Queens neighborhood of Jackson Heights combines ethnic diversity with private gardens and still-affordable apartments.



Robin Klehr Avia
nytimes.com
Ms. Avia is a regional managing principal of the design firm Gensler, which was founded in San Francisco.











Ads related to realestate


Explore More Results About




                    Century 21 Real Estate                





                    Prudential Real Estate                







                    Coldwell Banker Real Estate                





                    Keller Williams Real Estate                






1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8

Next »















 

          Cookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookies.
Learn more
Got it




Related Searches 

								MLS Listings							



								Foreclosed Homes For Sale							



								Real Estate For Sale By Owner							



								Remax Real Estate Homes Sale							



								Keller Williams Real Estate							



								Coldwell Banker Real Estate							



								Prudential Real Estate							



								Century 21 Real Estate							

 
Top Alhea Searches

Vehicle Track
Dentist Low Cost
Virtual Server
Sensitive Skin Products
New Dodge Truck
Retirement Income Funds
Retirement Income Planning
Free Mouthwash
Free Deodorant Samples
Accredited High School Diploma Online











About Us |
          Privacy Policy |
          Terms of Use |
          Contact Us |
          Cookies
























real estate l - Housing Watch - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation









Web


Images
Images


















Search the Web


 





























Redfin Home - Redfin Home | reference.com



Ad
 ·
reference.com/​Redfin Home



Find the best articles from across the web and real people on Reference.com!





Browse Education



Browse Health



Browse Finance



Browse Vehicles





MLS.com - Free MLS Search - Real estate for sale in your area.



Ad
 ·
http:/​/​www.mls.com



Real estate for sale in your area. View 1000s of homes and photos.




Listing Of Property - See Property For Sale By Zip.



Ad
 ·
RealtyNow.com/​Property_For_Sale



See Property For Sale By Zip. Enter Zip To Find An Agent Near You





Single Family Homes



Browse by Neighborhood



Find Nearby Open Houses





Searches related toreal estate l



l&l real estate


d&l real estate faribault mn


florida real estate


ll realty gardnerville



real estate ii


d&l real estate listings


utah real estate


madison l real estate




Web Results

Real Estate & Homes for Sale | RealEstate.com

https://www.realestate.com


Realestate.com serves as the ultimate resource for first-time home buyers, offering user-friendly tools and expert advice at every stage in the process.


Zillow - Official Site

https://www.zillow.com


The leading real estate marketplace. Search millions of for-sale and rental listings, compare Zestimate® home values and connect with local professionals.



Homes for Sale



Rent



Recently Sold Homes



Rental Listings



Zestimates



Real Estate - Listings, Housing News and Advice from AOL ...

https://www.aol.com/real-estate


Read the latest real estate news, find homes for sale, and get advice from leading real estate experts for homebuyers, homeowners and sellers.


LA Times Real Estate - Official Site

www.latimes.com/business/realestate


Real estate news for Los Angeles, Southern California and beyond, including Hot Property (celebrity homes), home tours, and more.


Century 21 - Official Site

www.century21.com


Use CENTURY 21 to find real estate property listings, houses for sale, real estate agents, and a mortgage calculator. We can assist you with buying or selling a home.


Current Property Listings — L&K Real Estate

www.lkrealestate.com/property-search/current-property-listings


Real Estate Brokerage representing buyers and sellers at The Yellowstone Club, Spanish Peaks, Big Sky, and Moonlight Basin.


Realtor.com - Official Site

https://www.realtor.com


Search real estate property records, houses, condos, land and more on realtor.com®. Find property info from the most comprehensive source of home data online.


L & L Real Estate, L.L.C. - AL, FL, IN, LA, MD, MI, MO, NY ...

https://www.bizapedia.com/us/l-l-real-estate-llc.html


There are 11 companies that go by the name of L & L Real Estate, L.L.C. in Anderson IN, Baton Rouge LA, Bellmore NY, Cheyenne WY, Columbia SC, Cottage Grove ...


Local Real Estate — Coldwell Banker A.L.M. Realty ...

https://www.coldwellbankerrealestate.com/coldwell-banker-a.l.m...


Coldwell Banker A.L.M. Realty & Associates, Inc. can help meet your real estate needs. Browse our listings, see photos of homes, and connect with an agent today.


John L. Scott - Official Site

www.johnlscott.com


Searchable listings of homes for sale in Washington State, Idaho, and Oregon. Includes property details and photos, agency locator, and franchise opportunities.










Redfin Home - Redfin Home | reference.com



Ad
 ·
reference.com/​Redfin Home



Find the best articles from across the web and real people on Reference.com!





Browse Education



Browse Health



Browse Finance



Browse Vehicles





MLS.com - Free MLS Search - Real estate for sale in your area.



Ad
 ·
http:/​/​www.mls.com



Real estate for sale in your area. View 1000s of homes and photos.




Listing Of Property - See Property For Sale By Zip.



Ad
 ·
RealtyNow.com/​Property_For_Sale



See Property For Sale By Zip. Enter Zip To Find An Agent Near You





Single Family Homes



Browse by Neighborhood



Find Nearby Open Houses




Searches related toreal estate l



l&l real estate


d&l real estate faribault mn


florida real estate


ll realty gardnerville


real estate ii


d&l real estate listings


utah real estate


madison l real estate




12345Next
















Search the Web























© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network












L Blackstone's Phone Number, Email, Address - Spokeo






























































CONTACT US



{{vm.userEmail}}








{{dropdown_item.text}}





FREE TRIAL








{{dropdown_item.text}}






{{dropdown_item.text | uppercase}}




















{{search_results_type}}
Results








Recent



{{history.title}}




Example Searches



John Smith



email@example.com



123 Main St, Pasadena, CA



(626) 555-5555



John Smith, Pasadena, CA







Filter your results









Name







First Name



Middle Name



Last Name








Location







State


All States




City


All Cities









Age









{{ages}}
+









Contact







Phone number



Email address








Relative







First name



Last name








SEARCH SPOKEO










Show Basic Search




Show Advanced Search












































No results found for {{vm.NameSearch.search.display_name}}
with your specific filters:
{{filter}}
Try a more general search, or view similar matches below.







found

{{ vm.NameSearch.result.search_title_query[0] }}


Filters L Blackstone





Browse locations




{{ place.name }}
({{ place.count | number}})






SHOW ALL {{ vm.NameSearch.location_groups.groups.length }} LOCATIONS



SHOW FEWER LOCATIONS

















Person


{{ person.name }}, age {{person.age}}


{{ person.name }}



{{ alias }}



Locations
{{ location }}


Relatives
{{ relative }}
--


Includes








SEE RESULTS




















Facebook

Twitter

Google Plus

YouTube

LinkedIn



About
Careers
Affiliates
Blog
Privacy
Terms
Contact
FAQs

More



People Search
email lookup
reverse phone lookup
ADDRESS LOOKUP
DIRECTORY



Spokeo is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to make decisions about employment, tenant screening, or any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Copyright © 2006-2017 Spokeo, Inc.
















Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          
















real estate | www1.looksmart.com



 


















LOOK



















Loading results...


Ads related to: real estate
Are you looking for?
Real Estate Business Real Estate Investment

Real Estate Business Marketing For Real Estate

Real Estate Attorney Plano

Real Estate Attorney Milwaukee

Real Estate Classes Missouri

Real Estate Investing Coaching

Real Estate Invest Trust

Real Estate Flyers Template

Real Estate Auction Md

Real Estate Autions
Top Social Network Accounts for Real Estate@KaplanRE_EDU@Cal_BRE@Delaware_gov@realtors@Century21@wilmingtondegov@intracoastalrc@RealestateceComWeb Results









Ads related to: real estate







1

2

3

4

5

Next





Social Networks
Related Searches
 Real Estate Classes Missouri

 Real Estate Autions

 Real Estate Education California

 Real Estate Crm System

 Real Estate Degree

 Real Estate A La Carte

 Real Estate Brokerage Websites

 Commercial Real Estate The Woodlands


Real Estate


 Are you looking for real estate?
 Find and Review more Results on Alhea.com
alhea.com aff










Blog |
 Advertise |
 Signup |
 Login |
 Publishers |
 About Us |
 Media Kit |
 Investors |
 Privacy












 



	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads







































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































